Ohio, session 136, SB174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 109.65, 313.121, 1713.55, 1733.242, 2108.81, 2111.08, 2151.011, 2151.23, 2151.33, 2151.90, 2301.03, 2307.50, 2317.02, 2701.03, 2705.031, 2901.30, 3101.041, 3105.011, 3105.21, 3105.63, 3105.65, 3109.03, 3109.04, 3109.043, 3109.05, 3109.051, 3109.052, 3109.054, 3109.055, 3109.06, 3109.061, 3109.09, 3109.11, 3109.12, 3109.401, 3109.41, 3109.42, 3109.43, 3109.44, 3109.47, 3109.48, 3109.50, 3109.51, 3109.52, 3109.53, 3109.55, 3109.56, 3109.58, 3109.60, 3109.65, 3109.66, 3109.68, 3109.74, 3111.13, 3111.26, 3111.381, 3113.31, 3119.01, 3119.06, 3119.07, 3119.08, 3119.24, 3119.82, 3119.87, 3119.964, 3125.03, 3125.06, 3125.43, 3127.01, 3127.11, 3127.23, 3127.35, 3310.51, 3313.205, 3313.64, 3313.666, 3313.672, 3313.712, 3313.96, 3313.98, 3319.321, 3321.01, 3323.143, 3328.01, 3332.25, 3333.26, 3345.85, 3701.503, 3780.33, 3796.24, 3902.13, 3924.47, 5104.017, 5104.018, 5104.039, 5107.02, 5120.652, 5120.653, 5123.01, 5153.16, and 5180.14 be amended; sections 3109.043 (3109.0497), 3109.051 (3109.0515), 3109.054 (3109.0550), and 3109.055 (3109.0570) be amended for the purpose of adopting new section numbers as indicated in parentheses; and new sections 3109.041, 3109.042, 3109.054, and 3109.055 and sections 3109.044, 3109.045, 3109.046, 3109.047, 3109.048, 3109.049, 3109.0410, 3109.0411, 3109.0412, 3109.0414, 3109.0415, 3109.0416, 3109.0417, 3109.0418, 3109.0419, 3109.0420, 3109.0421, 3109.0422, 3109.0423, 3109.0424, 3109.0425, 3109.0426, 3109.0428, 3109.0430, 3109.0432, 3109.0433, 3109.0434, 3109.0435, 3109.0436, 3109.0439, 3109.0440, 3109.0441, 3109.0442, 3109.0445, 3109.0446, 3109.0449, 3109.0450, 3109.0451, 3109.0452, 3109.0453, 3109.0455, 3109.0456, 3109.0457, 3109.0458, 3109.0459, 3109.0461, 3109.0462, 3109.0463, 3109.0465, 3109.0466, 3109.0467, 3109.0468, 3109.0470, 3109.0471, 3109.0472, 3109.0473, 3109.0474, 3109.0475, 3109.0476, 3109.0477, 3109.0478, 3109.0479, 3109.0482, 3109.0483, 3109.0484, 3109.0485, 3109.0486, 3109.0487, 3109.0488, 3109.0489, 3109.0490, 3109.0491, 3109.0492, 3109.0493, 3109.0498, 3109.056, 3109.057, 3109.058, 3109.059, 3109.0510, 3109.0511, 3109.0512, 3109.0516, 3109.0517, 3109.0518, 3109.0519, 3109.0521, 3109.0522, 3109.0523, 3109.0524, 3109.0526, 3109.0527, 3109.0528, 3109.0529, 3119.071, and 3119.072 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 109.65. (A) As used in this section, "minor," "missing child," and "missing children" have the same meanings as in section 2901.30 of the Revised Code. (B) There is hereby created within the office of the attorney general the missing children clearinghouse. The attorney general shall administer the clearinghouse. The clearinghouse is established as a central repository of information to coordinate and improve the availability of information regarding missing children, which information shall be collected and disseminated by the clearinghouse to assist in the location of missing children. The clearinghouse shall act as an information repository separate from and in addition to law enforcement agencies within this state. (C) The missing children clearinghouse may perform any of the following functions: (1) The establishment of services to aid in the location of missing children that include, but are not limited to, any of the following services: (a) Assistance in the preparation and dissemination of flyers identifying and describing missing children and their abductors; (b) The development of informational forms for the reporting of missing children that may be used by parents, guardians, and law enforcement officials to facilitate the location of a missing child; (c) The provision of assistance to public and private organizations, boards of education, nonpublic schools, preschools, child care facilities, and law enforcement agencies in planning and implementing voluntary programs to fingerprint children. (2) The establishment and operation of a toll-free telephone line for supplemental reports of missing children and reports of sightings of missing children; (3) Upon the request of any person or entity and upon payment of any applicable fee established by the attorney general under division (H) of this section, the provision to the person or entity who makes the request of a copy of any information possessed by the clearinghouse that was acquired or prepared pursuant to division (E)(3) of this section; (4) The performance of liaison services between individuals and public and private agencies regarding procedures for handling and responding to missing children reports; (5) The participation as a member in any networks of other missing children centers or clearinghouses; (6) The creation and operation of an intrastate network of communication designed for the speedy collection and processing of information concerning missing children. (D) If a board of education is notified by school personnel that a missing child is attending any school under the board's jurisdiction, or if the principal or chief administrative officer of a nonpublic school is notified by school personnel that a missing child is attending that school, the board or the principal or chief administrative officer immediately shall give notice of that fact to the missing children clearinghouse and to the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the area where the missing child resides. (E)(1) The attorney general, in cooperation with the department of children and youth, shall establish a "missing child educational program" within the missing children clearinghouse that shall perform the functions specified in divisions (E)(1) to (3) of this section. The program shall operate under the supervision and control of the attorney general in accordance with procedures that the attorney general shall develop to implement divisions (E)(1) to (3) of this section. The attorney general shall cooperate with the department of education and workforce in developing and disseminating information acquired or prepared pursuant to division (E)(3) of this section. (2) Upon the request of any board of education in this state or any nonpublic school in this state, the missing child educational program shall provide to the board or school a reasonable number of copies of the information acquired or prepared pursuant to division (E)(3) of this section. Upon the request of any board of education in this state or any nonpublic school in this state that, pursuant to section 3313.96 of the Revised Code, is developing an information program concerning missing children issues and matters, the missing child educational program shall provide to the board or nonpublic school assistance in developing the information program. The assistance may include, but is not limited to, the provision of any or all of the following: (a) If the requesting entity is a board of education of a school district, sample policies on missing and exploited children issues to assist the board in complying with section 3313.205 of the Revised Code; (b) Suggested safety curricula regarding missing children issues, including child safety and abduction prevention issues; (c) Assistance in developing, with local law enforcement agencies, prosecuting attorneys, boards of education, school districts, and nonpublic schools, cooperative programs for fingerprinting children; (d) Other assistance to further the goals of the program. (3) The missing child educational program shall acquire or prepare informational materials relating to missing children issues and matters. These issues and matters include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) The types of missing children; (b) The reasons why and how minors become missing children, the potential adverse consequences of a minor becoming a missing child, and, in the case of minors who are considering running away from home or from the care, custody, and control of their parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or another person responsible for them, alternatives that may be available to address their concerns and problems; (c) Offenses under federal law that could relate to missing children and other provisions of federal law that focus on missing children; (d) Offenses under the Revised Code that could relate to missing children, including, but not limited to, kidnapping, abduction, unlawful restraint, child stealing, interference with custody, endangering children, domestic violence, abuse of a child and contributing to the dependency, neglect, unruliness, or delinquency of a child, sexual offenses, drug offenses, prostitution offenses, and obscenity offenses, and other provisions of the Revised Code that could relate to missing children; (e) Legislation being considered by the general assembly, legislatures of other states, the congress of the United States, and political subdivisions in this or any other state to address missing children issues; (f) Sources of information on missing children issues; (g) State, local, federal, and private systems for locating and identifying missing children; (h) Law enforcement agency programs, responsibilities, and investigative techniques in missing children matters; (i) Efforts on the community level in this and other states, concerning missing children issues and matters, by governmental entities and private organizations; (j) The identification of private organizations that, among their primary objectives, address missing children issues and matters; (k) How to avoid becoming a missing child and what to do if one becomes a missing child; (l) Efforts that schools, parents, and members of a community can undertake to reduce the risk that a minor will become a missing child and to quickly locate or identify a minor if he becomes a missing child, including, but not limited to, fingerprinting programs. (F) Each year the missing children clearinghouse shall issue a report describing its performance of the functions specified in division (E) of this section and shall provide a copy of the report to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the governor, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, and the director of children and youth. (G) Any state agency or political subdivision of this state that operates a missing children program or a clearinghouse for information about missing children shall coordinate its activities with the missing children clearinghouse. (H) The attorney general shall determine a reasonable fee to be charged for providing to any person or entity other than a state or local law enforcement agency of this or any other state, a law enforcement agency of the United States, a board of education of a school district in this state, a nonpublic school in this state, a governmental entity in this state, or a public library in this state, pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section, copies of any information acquired or prepared pursuant to division (E)(3) of this section. The attorney general shall collect the fee prior to sending or giving copies of any information to any person or entity for whom or which this division requires the fee to be charged and shall deposit the fee into the missing children fund created by division (I) of this section. (I) There is hereby created in the state treasury the missing children fund that shall consist of all moneys awarded to the state by donation, gift, or bequest, all other moneys received for purposes of this section, and all fees collected pursuant to this section or section 109.64 of the Revised Code. The attorney general shall use the moneys in the missing children fund only for purposes of the office of the attorney general acquiring or preparing information pursuant to division (E)(3) of this section. (J) The failure of the missing children clearinghouse to undertake any function or activity authorized in this section does not create a cause of action against the state. Sec. 313.121. (A) As used in this section, "parent" means either parent, except that if one parent has been designated is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child, "parent" means the designated residential parent and legal custodian, and if a person other than a parent is the child's legal guardian, "parent" means the legal guardian. (B) If a child under two years of age dies suddenly when in apparent good health, the death shall be reported immediately to the coroner of the county in which the death occurred, as required by section 313.12 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (C) of this section, the coroner or deputy coroner shall perform an autopsy on the child. The autopsy shall be performed in accordance with rules adopted by the director of health under section 313.122 of the Revised Code. The coroner or deputy coroner may perform research procedures and tests when performing the autopsy. If the child was one year of age or younger at the time of death and the death occurred suddenly and unexpectedly, the cause of which is not immediately obvious prior to investigation, the coroner, deputy coroner, or other individual who has been designated to investigate the child's death shall complete a sudden unexplained infant death investigation reporting form (SUIDI reporting form) developed by the United States centers for disease control and prevention or an alternative reporting form. The director of health may develop an alternative reporting form in consultation with the Ohio state coroners association. The individual who completes the reporting form shall retain the form and send a copy of it to the appropriate child fatality review board or regional child fatality review board established under section 307.621 of the Revised Code. If a coroner or deputy coroner completes the reporting form, a copy of the coroner's report described in section 313.09 of the Revised Code shall also be sent to the board. A completed reporting form and copies of completed reporting forms are not public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (C) A coroner or deputy coroner is not required to perform an autopsy if the coroner of the county in which the death occurred or a court with jurisdiction over the deceased body determines under section 313.131 of the Revised Code that an autopsy is contrary to the religious beliefs of the child. If the coroner or the court makes such a determination, the coroner shall notify the health district or department of health with jurisdiction in the area in which the child's parent resides. For purposes of this division, the religious beliefs of the parents of a child shall be considered to be the religious beliefs of the child. (D) If the child's parent makes a written or verbal request for the preliminary results of the autopsy after the results are available, the coroner, or a person designated by the coroner, shall give the parent an oral statement of the preliminary results. The coroner, within a reasonable time after the final results of the autopsy are reported, shall send written notice of the results to the state department of health, the health district or department with jurisdiction in the area in which the child's parent resides, and, upon the request of a parent of the child, to the child's attending physician. Upon the written request of a parent of the child and the payment of the transcript fee required by section 313.10 of the Revised Code, the coroner shall send written notice of the final results to that parent. The notice sent to the state department of health shall include all of the information specified in rules adopted under section 313.122 of the Revised Code. (E) On the occurrence of any of the following, the health district or department with jurisdiction in the area in which the child's parent resides shall offer the parent any counseling or other supportive services it has available: (1) When it learns through any source that an autopsy is being performed on a child under two years of age who died suddenly when in apparent good health; (2) When it receives notice that the final result of an autopsy performed pursuant to this section concluded that the child died of sudden infant death syndrome; (3) When it is notified by the coroner that, pursuant to division (C) of this section, an autopsy was not performed. (F) When a health district or department receives notice that the final result of an autopsy performed pursuant to this section concluded that the child died of sudden infant death syndrome or that, pursuant to division (C) of this section, an autopsy was not performed but sudden infant death syndrome may have been the cause of death, it shall offer the child's parent information about sudden infant death syndrome. The state department of health shall ensure that current information on sudden infant death syndrome is available for distribution by health districts and departments. Sec. 1713.55. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Nonprofit institution of higher education" or "institution" means a nonprofit college, university, or other institution that offers instruction in the arts and sciences, business administration, engineering, philosophy, literature, fine arts, law, medicine, nursing, social work, theology, and other recognized academic and professional fields of study, and awards degrees for fulfilling requirements of academic work beyond high school. (2) "On-campus student housing" means a dormitory or other student residence that is owned or operated by or located on the campus of a nonprofit institution of higher education. (3) "Parent" means either parent or legal custodian, except that if one parent has sole custodyis the designated parent and legal custodian, "parent" means the designated parent with custody and legal custodian. "Parent" also includes a guardian or, in the absence of a parent or guardian, another person who has accepted responsibility for the care of the student. (B) Beginning with the academic year that commences on or after July 1, 2005, a nonprofit institution of higher education shall not permit a student to reside in on-campus student housing unless the student, or, if the student is younger than eighteen years of age, the student's parent, discloses to the institution whether the student has been vaccinated against meningococcal meningitis and hepatitis B by submitting to the institution the meningitis and hepatitis B vaccination status statement described in division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code or a meningitis status statement form provided by the institution that meets the requirements of division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code. The statement may be submitted in written form or, if the institution has a secure web site, in electronic form. (C) On receipt of an application for residence in on-campus student housing, a nonprofit institution of higher education shall do both of the following: (1) Inform the student of the disclosure requirement; (2) Provide the student in either written or, if the school has a secure web site, electronic form the meningitis and hepatitis B vaccination status statement described in division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code or a meningitis status statement form provided by the institution that meets the requirements of division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code. (D) This section does not require an institution to provide or pay for a meningococcal meningitis or hepatitis B vaccination for any student. Sec. 1733.242. (A) On the terms and conditions the credit union prescribes, a credit union may do all of the following: (1) Provide safes, vaults, safe deposit boxes, night depositories, and other secure receptacles for the uses, purposes, and benefits of its members; (2) Receive tangible property and evidence of tangible or intangible property for safekeeping using the credit union's safes, vaults, secure receptacles, or safekeeping system; the safes, vaults, secure receptacles, or safekeeping system of another credit union; or the safekeeping system of a safekeeping agent or custodian. (B)(1) A credit union may enter into an agreement to rent a safe deposit box to a minor and accept the appointment of a minor as agent or deputy on any deposit or safe deposit box by any person, including a minor, maintaining the deposit or safe deposit box. (2) When a credit union enters into a safe deposit box rental agreement with a minor pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, all of the following apply: (a) The terms and conditions of the safe deposit box rental agreement are binding on the minor the same as a person of legal age who rents a safe deposit box. (b) The relationship between the credit union and the minor regarding the safe deposit box rental agreement is in all respects the same as if the minor were a person of legal age. (c) The credit union shall incur no liability for any transaction regarding the safe deposit box solely because of doing business with a minor. (3) Nothing in divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section shall be construed to limit the parental rights and parenting responsibilities provided under section 2111.08 of the Revised Code or to limit the rights of a guardian appointed pursuant to Chapter 2111. of the Revised Code. (C) The superintendent of financial institutions shall promulgate rules to qualify a credit union, safekeeping agent, or custodian that may receive from another credit union tangible property and evidence of tangible or intangible property for safekeeping pursuant to division (A) of this section. Sec. 2108.81. (A) If either of the following is true, division (B) of this section shall apply: (1) A person has not executed a written declaration pursuant to sections 2108.70 to 2108.73 of the Revised Code that remains in force at the time of the person's death. (2) Each person to whom the right of disposition has been assigned or reassigned pursuant to a written declaration is disqualified from exercising the right as described in section 2108.75 of the Revised Code. (B) Subject to division (A) of this section and sections 2108.75 and 2108.79 of the Revised Code, the right of disposition is assigned to the following persons, if mentally competent adults who can be located with reasonable effort, in the order of priority stated: (1) The deceased person's surviving spouse; (2) The sole surviving child of the deceased person or, if there is more than one surviving child, all of the surviving children, collectively; (3) The deceased person's surviving parent or parents, subject to division (C) of this section; (4) The deceased person's surviving sibling, whether of the whole or of the half blood or, if there is more than one sibling of the whole or of the half blood, all of the surviving siblings, collectively; (5) The deceased person's surviving grandparent or grandparents; (6) The deceased person's surviving grandchild, or if there is more than one surviving grandchild, all of the surviving grandchildren collectively; (7) The lineal descendants of the deceased person's grandparents, as described in division (I) of section 2105.06 of the Revised Code; (8) The person who was the deceased person's guardian at the time of the deceased person's death, if a guardian had been appointed; (9) Any other person willing to assume the right of disposition, including the personal representative of the deceased person's estate or the licensed funeral director with custody of the deceased person's body, after attesting in writing that a good faith effort has been made to locate the persons in divisions (B)(1) to (8) of this section. (10) If the deceased person was an indigent person or other person the final disposition of whose body is the financial and statutory responsibility of the state or a political subdivision of this state, the public officer or employee responsible for arranging the final disposition of the remains of the deceased person. (C)(1) If a parent was the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the deceased person at the time the deceased person reached the age of majority, that parent's right of disposition for the deceased person shall take precedence over the parent who was not the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the deceased person at that time. (2) Division (C)(1) of this section shall not apply if the parent with precedence is disqualified from the right of disposition for the deceased person under section 2108.75 of the Revised Code. (3) Section 2108.79 of the Revised Code shall not affect the precedence under division (C)(1) of this section; (4) For purposes of this section, a parent's status as a residential designated parent and legal custodian of a child shall be established by a court order or decree that allocates parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the child under a parenting plan and was in effect up to or at the time that the deceased person reached the age of majority, or by other uncontroverted evidence. No funeral director, embalmer, or crematory operator is required to investigate whether or not the person claiming to be the residential designated parent and legal custodian of a deceased person is in fact the residential designated parent and legal custodian. Sec. 2111.08. The wife and husband are the joint natural guardians of their minor children and are equally charged with their care, nurture, welfare, and education and the care and management of their estates. The wife and husband have equal powers, rights, and duties and neither parent has any right paramount to the right of the other concerning the parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the minor or the right to be the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the minor, the control of the services or the earnings of such minor, or any other matter affecting the minor; provided that if either parent, to the exclusion of the other, is maintaining and supporting the child, that parent shall have the paramount right to control the services and earnings of the child. Neither parent shall forcibly take a child from the guardianship of the parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child. If the wife and husband live apart, the court may award the guardianship of a minor to either parent, and the state in which the parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian or who otherwise has the lawful custody of the minor resides has jurisdiction to determine questions concerning the minor's guardianship. Sec. 2151.011. (A) As used in the Revised Code: (1) "Juvenile court" means whichever of the following is applicable that has jurisdiction under this chapter and Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code: (a) The division of the court of common pleas specified in section 2101.022 or 2301.03 of the Revised Code as having jurisdiction under this chapter and Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code or as being the juvenile division or the juvenile division combined with one or more other divisions; (b) The juvenile court of Cuyahoga county or Hamilton county that is separately and independently created by section 2151.08 or Chapter 2153. of the Revised Code and that has jurisdiction under this chapter and Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code; (c) If division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section does not apply, the probate division of the court of common pleas. (2) "Juvenile judge" means a judge of a court having jurisdiction under this chapter. (3) "Private child placing agency" means any association, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, that is certified under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code to accept temporary, permanent, or legal custody of children and place the children for either foster care or adoption. (4) "Private noncustodial agency" means any person, organization, association, or society certified by the department of children and youth that does not accept temporary or permanent legal custody of children, that is privately operated in this state, and that does one or more of the following: (a) Receives and cares for children for two or more consecutive weeks; (b) Participates in the placement of children in certified foster homes; (c) Provides adoption services in conjunction with a public children services agency or private child placing agency. (B) As used in this chapter: (1) "Adequate parental care" means the provision by a child's parent or parents, guardian, or custodian of adequate food, clothing, and shelter to ensure the child's health and physical safety and the provision by a child's parent or parents of specialized services warranted by the child's physical or mental needs. (2) "Adult" means an individual who is eighteen years of age or older. (3) "Agreement for temporary custody" means a voluntary agreement authorized by section 5103.15 of the Revised Code that transfers the temporary custody of a child to a public children services agency or a private child placing agency. (4) "Alternative response" means the public children services agency's response to a report of child abuse or neglect that engages the family in a comprehensive evaluation of child safety, risk of subsequent harm, and family strengths and needs and that does not include a determination as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred. (5) "Certified foster home" means a foster home, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, certified under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. (6) "Child" means a person who is under eighteen years of age, except that the juvenile court has jurisdiction over any person who is adjudicated an unruly child prior to attaining eighteen years of age until the person attains twenty-one years of age, and, for purposes of that jurisdiction related to that adjudication, a person who is so adjudicated an unruly child shall be deemed a "child" until the person attains twenty-one years of age. (7) "Child day camp," "child care," "child care center," "part-time child care center," "type A family child care home," "licensed type B family child care home," "type B family child care home," "administrator of a child care center," "administrator of a type A family child care home," and "in-home aide" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Child care provider" means an individual who is a child-care staff member or administrator of a child care center, a type A family child care home, or a type B family child care home, or an in-home aide or an individual who is licensed, is regulated, is approved, operates under the direction of, or otherwise is certified by the department of children and youth, department of developmental disabilities, or the early childhood programs of the department of education. (9) "Commit" means to vest custody as ordered by the court. (10) "Counseling" includes both of the following: (a) General counseling services performed by a public children services agency or shelter for victims of domestic violence to assist a child, a child's parents, and a child's siblings in alleviating identified problems that may cause or have caused the child to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child. (b) Psychiatric or psychological therapeutic counseling services provided to correct or alleviate any mental or emotional illness or disorder and performed by a licensed psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or a person licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code to engage in social work or professional counseling. (11) "Custodian" means a person who has legal custody of a child or a public children services agency or private child placing agency that has permanent, temporary, or legal custody of a child. (12) "Delinquent child" has the same meaning as in section 2152.02 of the Revised Code. (13) "Detention" means the temporary care of children pending court adjudication or disposition, or execution of a court order, in a public or private facility designed to physically restrict the movement and activities of children. (14) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as in section 5123.01 of the Revised Code. (15) "Differential response approach" means an approach that a public children services agency may use to respond to accepted reports of child abuse or neglect with either an alternative response or a traditional response. (16) "Foster caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (17) "Guardian" means a person, association, or corporation that is granted authority by a probate court pursuant to Chapter 2111. of the Revised Code to exercise parental rights and parenting responsibilities over a child to the extent provided in the court's order and subject to the residual parental rights of the child's parents. (18) "Habitual truant" means any child of compulsory school age who is absent without legitimate excuse for absence from the public school the child is supposed to attend for thirty or more consecutive hours, forty-two or more hours in one school month, or seventy-two or more hours in a school year. (19) "Intellectual disability" has the same meaning as in section 5123.01 of the Revised Code. (20) "Juvenile traffic offender" has the same meaning as in section 2152.02 of the Revised Code. (21) "Legal custody" means a legal status that vests in the custodian the right to have physical care and control of the child and to determine where and with whom the child shall live, and the right and duty to protect, train, and discipline the child and to provide the child with food, shelter, education, and medical care, all subject to any residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. An individual granted legal custody shall exercise the rights and responsibilities personally unless otherwise authorized by any section of the Revised Code or by the court. (22) A "legitimate excuse for absence from the public school the child is supposed to attend" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (a) The fact that the child in question has enrolled in and is attending another public or nonpublic school in this or another state; (b) The fact that the child in question is excused from attendance at school for any of the reasons specified in section 3321.04 or 3321.042 of the Revised Code; (c) The fact that the child in question has received an age and schooling certificate in accordance with section 3331.01 of the Revised Code. (23) "Mental illness" has the same meaning as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (24) "Mental injury" means any behavioral, cognitive, emotional, or mental disorder in a child caused by an act or omission that is described in section 2919.22 of the Revised Code and is committed by the parent or other person responsible for the child's care. (25) "Nonsecure care, supervision, or training" means care, supervision, or training of a child in a facility that does not confine or prevent movement of the child within the facility or from the facility. (26) "Of compulsory school age" has the same meaning as in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code. (27) "Organization" means any institution, public, semipublic, or private, and any private association, society, or agency located or operating in the state, incorporated or unincorporated, having among its functions the furnishing of protective services or care for children, or the placement of children in certified foster homes or elsewhere. (28) "Out-of-home care" means detention facilities, shelter facilities, certified children's crisis care facilities, certified foster homes, placement in a prospective adoptive home prior to the issuance of a final decree of adoption, organizations, certified organizations, child care centers, type A family child care homes, type B family child care homes, child care provided by in-home aides, group home providers, group homes, institutions, state institutions, residential facilities, residential care facilities, residential camps, day camps, private, nonprofit therapeutic wilderness camps, public schools, chartered nonpublic schools, educational service centers, hospitals, and medical clinics that are responsible for the care, physical custody, or control of children. (29) "Out-of-home care child abuse" means any of the following when committed by a person responsible for the care of a child in out-of-home care: (a) Engaging in sexual activity with a child in the person's care; (b) Denial to a child, as a means of punishment, of proper or necessary subsistence, education, medical care, or other care necessary for a child's health; (c) Use of restraint procedures on a child that cause injury or pain; (d) Administration of prescription drugs or psychotropic medication to the child without the written approval and ongoing supervision of a licensed physician; (e) Commission of any act, other than by accidental means, that results in any injury to or death of the child in out-of-home care or commission of any act by accidental means that results in an injury to or death of a child in out-of-home care and that is at variance with the history given of the injury or death. (30) "Out-of-home care child neglect" means any of the following when committed by a person responsible for the care of a child in out-of-home care: (a) Failure to provide reasonable supervision according to the standards of care appropriate to the age, mental and physical condition, or other special needs of the child; (b) Failure to provide reasonable supervision according to the standards of care appropriate to the age, mental and physical condition, or other special needs of the child, that results in sexual or physical abuse of the child by any person; (c) Failure to develop a process for all of the following: (i) Administration of prescription drugs or psychotropic drugs for the child; (ii) Assuring that the instructions of the licensed physician who prescribed a drug for the child are followed; (iii) Reporting to the licensed physician who prescribed the drug all unfavorable or dangerous side effects from the use of the drug. (d) Failure to provide proper or necessary subsistence, education, medical care, or other individualized care necessary for the health or well-being of the child; (e) Confinement of the child to a locked room without monitoring by staff; (f) Failure to provide ongoing security for all prescription and nonprescription medication; (g) Isolation of a child for a period of time when there is substantial risk that the isolation, if continued, will impair or retard the mental health or physical well-being of the child. (31) "Permanent custody" means a legal status that vests in a public children services agency or a private child placing agency, all parenting responsibilities and parental rights, duties, and obligations, including the right to consent to adoption, and divests the natural parents or adoptive parents of all parenting responsibilities and parental rights, privileges, and obligations, including all residual rights and obligations. (32) "Permanent surrender" means the act of the parents or, if a child has only one parent, of the parent of a child, by a voluntary agreement authorized by section 5103.15 of the Revised Code, to transfer the permanent custody of the child to a public children services agency or a private child placing agency. (33) "Person" means an individual, association, corporation, or partnership and the state or any of its political subdivisions, departments, or agencies. (34) "Person responsible for a child's care in out-of-home care" means any of the following: (a) Any foster caregiver, in-home aide, or provider; (b) Any administrator, employee, or agent of any of the following: a public or private detention facility; shelter facility; certified children's crisis care facility; organization; certified organization; child care center; type A family child care home; licensed type B family child care home; group home; institution; state institution; residential facility; residential care facility; residential camp; day camp; school district; community school; chartered nonpublic school; educational service center; hospital; or medical clinic; (c) Any person who supervises or coaches children as part of an extracurricular activity sponsored by a school district, public school, or chartered nonpublic school; (d) Any other person who performs a similar function with respect to, or has a similar relationship to, children. (35) "Physical impairment" means having one or more of the following conditions that substantially limit one or more of an individual's major life activities, including self-care, receptive and expressive language, learning, mobility, and self-direction: (a) A substantial impairment of vision, speech, or hearing; (b) A congenital orthopedic impairment; (c) An orthopedic impairment caused by disease, rheumatic fever or any other similar chronic or acute health problem, or amputation or another similar cause. (36) "Placement for adoption" means the arrangement by a public children services agency or a private child placing agency with a person for the care and adoption by that person of a child of whom the agency has permanent custody. (37) "Placement in foster care" means the arrangement by a public children services agency or a private child placing agency for the out-of-home care of a child of whom the agency has temporary custody or permanent custody. (38) "Planned permanent living arrangement" means an order of a juvenile court pursuant to which both of the following apply: (a) The court gives legal custody of a child to a public children services agency or a private child placing agency without the termination of parental rights. (b) The order permits the agency to make an appropriate placement of the child and to enter into a written agreement with a foster care provider or with another person or agency with whom the child is placed. (39) "Practice of social work" and "practice of professional counseling" have the same meanings as in section 4757.01 of the Revised Code. (40) "Private, nonprofit therapeutic wilderness camp" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (41) "Sanction, service, or condition" means a sanction, service, or condition created by court order following an adjudication that a child is an unruly child that is described in division (A)(4) of section 2152.19 of the Revised Code. (42) "Protective supervision" means an order of disposition pursuant to which the court permits an abused, neglected, dependent, or unruly child to remain in the custody of the child's parents, guardian, or custodian and stay in the child's home, subject to any conditions and limitations upon the child, the child's parents, guardian, or custodian, or any other person that the court prescribes, including supervision as directed by the court for the protection of the child. (43) "Psychiatrist" has the same meaning as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (44) "Psychologist" has the same meaning as in section 4732.01 of the Revised Code. (45) "Resource caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (46) "Resource family" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (47) "Residential camp" means a program in which the care, physical custody, or control of children is accepted overnight for recreational or recreational and educational purposes. (48) "Residential care facility" means an institution, residence, or facility that is licensed by the department of mental health and addiction services under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code and that provides care for a child. (49) "Residential facility" means a home or facility that is licensed by the department of developmental disabilities under section 5123.19 of the Revised Code and in which a child with a developmental disability resides. (50) "Residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities" means those rights, privileges, and responsibilities remaining with the natural parent after the transfer of legal custody of the child, including, but not necessarily limited to, the privilege of reasonable visitation, consent to adoption, the privilege to determine the child's religious affiliation, and the responsibility for support. (51) "School day" means the school day established by the board of education of the applicable school district pursuant to section 3313.481 of the Revised Code. (52) "School year" has the same meaning as in section 3313.62 of the Revised Code. (53) "Secure correctional facility" means a facility under the direction of the department of youth services that is designed to physically restrict the movement and activities of children and used for the placement of children after adjudication and disposition. (54) "Sexual activity" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (55) "Shelter" means the temporary care of children in physically unrestricted facilities pending court adjudication or disposition. (56) "Shelter for victims of domestic violence" has the same meaning as in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code. (57) "Temporary custody" means legal custody of a child who is removed from the child's home, which custody may be terminated at any time at the discretion of the court or, if the legal custody is granted in an agreement for temporary custody, by the person who executed the agreement. (58) "Traditional response" means a public children services agency's response to a report of child abuse or neglect that encourages engagement of the family in a comprehensive evaluation of the child's current and future safety needs and a fact-finding process to determine whether child abuse or neglect occurred and the circumstances surrounding the alleged harm or risk of harm. (C) For the purposes of this chapter, a child shall be presumed abandoned when the parents of the child have failed to visit or maintain contact with the child for more than ninety days, regardless of whether the parents resume contact with the child after that period of ninety days. Sec. 2151.23. (A) The juvenile court has exclusive original jurisdiction under the Revised Code as follows: (1) Concerning any child who on or about the date specified in the complaint, indictment, or information is alleged to have violated section 2151.87 of the Revised Code or an order issued under that section or to be a juvenile traffic offender or a delinquent, unruly, abused, neglected, or dependent child and, based on and in relation to the allegation pertaining to the child, concerning the parent, guardian, or other person having care of a child who is alleged to be an unruly child for being an habitual truant or who is alleged to be a delinquent child for violating a court order regarding the child's prior adjudication as an unruly child for being an habitual truant; (2) Subject to divisions (G), (I), (K), and (V) of section 2301.03 of the Revised Code, to determine the custody of any child not a ward of another court of this state; (3) To hear and determine any application for a writ of habeas corpus involving the custody of a child; (4) To exercise the powers and jurisdiction given the probate division of the court of common pleas in Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code, if the court has probable cause to believe that a child otherwise within the jurisdiction of the court is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, as defined in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code; (5) To hear and determine all criminal cases charging adults with the violation of any section of this chapter; (6) To hear and determine all criminal cases in which an adult is charged with a violation of division (C) of section 2919.21, division (B)(1) of section 2919.22, section 2919.222, division (B) of section 2919.23, or section 2919.24 of the Revised Code, provided the charge is not included in an indictment that also charges the alleged adult offender with the commission of a felony arising out of the same actions that are the basis of the alleged violation of division (C) of section 2919.21, division (B)(1) of section 2919.22, section 2919.222, division (B) of section 2919.23, or section 2919.24 of the Revised Code; (7) Under the interstate compact on juveniles in section 2151.56 of the Revised Code; (8) Concerning any child who is to be taken into custody pursuant to section 2151.31 of the Revised Code, upon being notified of the intent to take the child into custody and the reasons for taking the child into custody; (9) To hear and determine requests for the extension of temporary custody agreements, and requests for court approval of permanent custody agreements, that are filed pursuant to section 5103.15 of the Revised Code; (10) To hear and determine applications for consent to marry pursuant to section 3101.04 of the Revised Code; (11) Subject to divisions (G), (I), (K), and (V) of section 2301.03 of the Revised Code, to hear and determine a request for an order for the support of any child if the request is not ancillary to an action for divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or legal separation, a criminal or civil action involving an allegation of domestic violence, or an action for support brought under Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code; (12) Concerning an action commenced under section 121.38 of the Revised Code; (13) To hear and determine violations of section 3321.38 of the Revised Code; (14) To exercise jurisdiction and authority over the parent, guardian, or other person having care of a child alleged to be a delinquent child, unruly child, or juvenile traffic offender, based on and in relation to the allegation pertaining to the child; (15) To conduct the hearings, and to make the determinations, adjudications, and orders authorized or required under sections 2152.82 to 2152.86 and Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code regarding a child who has been adjudicated a delinquent child and to refer the duties conferred upon the juvenile court judge under sections 2152.82 to 2152.86 and Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code to magistrates appointed by the juvenile court judge in accordance with Juvenile Rule 40; (16) To hear and determine a petition for a protection order against a child under section 2151.34 or 3113.31 of the Revised Code and to enforce a protection order issued or a consent agreement approved under either section against a child until a date certain but not later than the date the child attains nineteen years of age; (17) Concerning emancipated young adults under sections 2151.45 to 2151.455 of the Revised Code; (18) To hear and determine a request for a court order to examine and interview a child who may be an abused, neglected, or dependent child under section 2151.25 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in divisions (G), (I), and (P) of section 2301.03 of the Revised Code, the juvenile court has original jurisdiction under the Revised Code: (1) To hear and determine all cases of misdemeanors charging adults with any act or omission with respect to any child, which act or omission is a violation of any state law or any municipal ordinance; (2) To determine the paternity of any child alleged to have been born out of wedlock pursuant to sections 3111.01 to 3111.18 of the Revised Code; (3) Under the uniform interstate family support act in Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code; (4) To hear and determine an application for an order for the support of any child, if the child is not a ward of another court of this state; (5) To hear and determine an action commenced under section 3111.28 of the Revised Code; (6) To hear and determine a motion filed under section 3119.961 of the Revised Code; (7) To receive filings under section 3109.74 of the Revised Code, and to hear and determine actions arising under sections 3109.51 to 3109.80 of the Revised Code. (8) To enforce an order for the return of a child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction pursuant to section 3127.32 of the Revised Code; (9) To grant any relief normally available under the laws of this state to enforce a child custody determination made by a court of another state and registered in accordance with section 3127.35 of the Revised Code. (C) The juvenile court, except as to juvenile courts that are a separate division of the court of common pleas or a separate and independent juvenile court, has jurisdiction to hear, determine, and make a record of any action for divorce or legal separation that involves the custody or care of children and that is filed in the court of common pleas and certified by the court of common pleas with all the papers filed in the action to the juvenile court for trial, provided that no certification of that nature shall be made to any juvenile court unless the consent of the juvenile judge first is obtained. After a certification of that nature is made and consent is obtained, the juvenile court shall proceed as if the action originally had been begun in that court, except as to awards for spousal support or support due and unpaid at the time of certification, over which the juvenile court has no jurisdiction. (D) The juvenile court, except as provided in division (I) of section 2301.03 of the Revised Code, has jurisdiction to hear and determine all matters as to custody and support of children duly certified by the court of common pleas to the juvenile court after a divorce decree has been granted, including jurisdiction to modify the judgment and decree of the court of common pleas as the same relate to the custody and support of children. (E) The juvenile court, except as provided in division (I) of section 2301.03 of the Revised Code, has jurisdiction to hear and determine the case of any child certified to the court by any court of competent jurisdiction if the child comes within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court as defined by this section. (F)(1) The juvenile court shall exercise its jurisdiction in child custody matters in accordance with sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 and 3127.01 to 3127.53 of the Revised Code and, as applicable, sections 5103.20 to 5103.22 or 5103.23 to 5103.237 of the Revised Code. (2) The juvenile court shall exercise its jurisdiction in child support matters in accordance with section 3109.05 of the Revised Code. (G) Any juvenile court that makes or modifies an order for child support shall comply with Chapters 3119., 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code. If any person required to pay child support under an order made by a juvenile court on or after April 15, 1985, or modified on or after December 1, 1986, is found in contempt of court for failure to make support payments under the order, the court that makes the finding, in addition to any other penalty or remedy imposed, shall assess all court costs arising out of the contempt proceeding against the person and require the person to pay any reasonable attorney's fees of any adverse party, as determined by the court, that arose in relation to the act of contempt. (H) If a child who is charged with an act that would be an offense if committed by an adult was fourteen years of age or older and under eighteen years of age at the time of the alleged act and if the case is transferred for criminal prosecution pursuant to section 2152.12 of the Revised Code, except as provided in section 2152.121 of the Revised Code, the juvenile court does not have jurisdiction to hear or determine the case subsequent to the transfer. The court to which the case is transferred for criminal prosecution pursuant to that section has jurisdiction subsequent to the transfer to hear and determine the case in the same manner as if the case originally had been commenced in that court, subject to section 2152.121 of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, jurisdiction to accept a plea of guilty or another plea authorized by Criminal Rule 11 or another section of the Revised Code and jurisdiction to accept a verdict and to enter a judgment of conviction pursuant to the Rules of Criminal Procedure against the child for the commission of the offense that was the basis of the transfer of the case for criminal prosecution, whether the conviction is for the same degree or a lesser degree of the offense charged, for the commission of a lesser-included offense, or for the commission of another offense that is different from the offense charged. Section 2152.022 of the Revised Code applies with respect to the transfer of a case for criminal prosecution as described in this division and the determination of jurisdiction after the transfer and, as described in division (B) of that section, the juvenile court retains jurisdiction over charges included in the complaint or complaints containing the allegation that is the basis of the transfer that are not transferred. (I) If a person under eighteen years of age allegedly commits an act that would be a felony if committed by an adult and if the person is not taken into custody or apprehended for that act until after the person attains twenty-one years of age, the juvenile court does not have jurisdiction to hear or determine any portion of the case charging the person with committing that act. In those circumstances, divisions (A) and (B) of section 2152.12 of the Revised Code do not apply regarding the act, and the case charging the person with committing the act shall be a criminal prosecution commenced and heard in the appropriate court having jurisdiction of the offense as if the person had been eighteen years of age or older when the person committed the act. All proceedings pertaining to the act shall be within the jurisdiction of the court having jurisdiction of the offense, and that court has all the authority and duties in the case that it has in other criminal cases in that court. (J) In exercising its exclusive original jurisdiction under division (A)(16) of this section with respect to any proceedings brought under section 2151.34 or 3113.31 of the Revised Code in which the respondent is a child, the juvenile court retains all dispositionary powers consistent with existing rules of juvenile procedure and may also exercise its discretion to adjudicate proceedings as provided in sections 2151.34 and 3113.31 of the Revised Code, including the issuance of protection orders or the approval of consent agreements under those sections. Sec. 2151.33. (A) Pending hearing of a complaint filed under section 2151.27 of the Revised Code or a motion filed or made under division (B) of this section and the service of citations, the juvenile court may make any temporary disposition of any child that it considers necessary to protect the best interest of the child and that can be made pursuant to division (B) of this section. Upon the certificate of one or more reputable practicing physicians, certified nurse-midwives, clinical nurse specialists, or certified nurse practitioners, the court may summarily provide for emergency medical and surgical treatment that appears to be immediately necessary to preserve the health and well-being of any child concerning whom a complaint or an application for care has been filed, pending the service of a citation upon the child's parents, guardian, or custodian. The court may order the parents, guardian, or custodian, if the court finds the parents, guardian, or custodian able to do so, to reimburse the court for the expense involved in providing the emergency medical or surgical treatment. Any person who disobeys the order for reimbursement may be adjudged in contempt of court and punished accordingly. If the emergency medical or surgical treatment is furnished to a child who is found at the hearing to be a nonresident of the county in which the court is located and if the expense of the medical or surgical treatment cannot be recovered from the parents, legal guardian, or custodian of the child, the board of county commissioners of the county in which the child has a legal settlement shall reimburse the court for the reasonable cost of the emergency medical or surgical treatment out of its general fund. (B)(1) After a complaint, petition, writ, or other document initiating a case dealing with an alleged or adjudicated abused, neglected, or dependent child is filed and upon the filing or making of a motion pursuant to division (C) of this section, the court, prior to the final disposition of the case, may issue any of the following temporary orders to protect the best interest of the child: (a) An order granting temporary custody of the child to a particular party; (b) An order for the taking of the child into custody pursuant to section 2151.31 of the Revised Code pending the outcome of the adjudicatory and dispositional hearings; (c) An order granting, limiting, or eliminating parenting time under a parenting plan or companionship or visitation rights with respect to the child; (d) An order requiring a party to vacate a residence that will be lawfully occupied by the child; (e) An order requiring a party to attend an appropriate counseling program that is reasonably available to that party; (f) Any other order that restrains or otherwise controls the conduct of any party which conduct would not be in the best interest of the child. (2) Prior to the final disposition of a case subject to division (B)(1) of this section, the court shall do both of the following: (a) Issue an order pursuant to Chapters 3119. to 3125. of the Revised Code requiring the parents, guardian, or person charged with the child's support to pay support for the child. (b) Issue an order requiring the parents, guardian, or person charged with the child's support to continue to maintain any health insurance coverage for the child that existed at the time of the filing of the complaint, petition, writ, or other document, or to obtain health insurance coverage in accordance with sections 3119.29 to 3119.56 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) A court may issue an order pursuant to division (B) of this section upon its own motion or if a party files a written motion or makes an oral motion requesting the issuance of the order and stating the reasons for it. Any notice sent by the court as a result of a motion pursuant to this division shall contain a notice that any party to a juvenile proceeding has the right to be represented by counsel and to have appointed counsel if the person is indigent. (2) If a child is taken into custody pursuant to section 2151.31 of the Revised Code and placed in shelter care, the public children services agency or private child placing agency with which the child is placed in shelter care shall file or make a motion as described in division (C)(1) of this section before the end of the next day immediately after the date on which the child was taken into custody and, at a minimum, shall request an order for temporary custody under division (B)(1)(a) of this section. (3) A court that issues an order pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) of this section shall comply with section 2151.419 of the Revised Code. (D) The court may grant an ex parte order upon its own motion or a motion filed or made pursuant to division (C) of this section requesting such an order if it appears to the court that the best interest and the welfare of the child require that the court issue the order immediately. The court, if acting on its own motion, or the person requesting the granting of an ex parte order, to the extent possible, shall give notice of its intent or of the request to the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child who is the subject of the request. If the court issues an ex parte order, the court shall hold a hearing to review the order within seventy-two hours after it is issued or before the end of the next day after the day on which it is issued, whichever occurs first. The court shall give written notice of the hearing to all parties to the action and shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child prior to the hearing. The written notice shall be given by all means that are reasonably likely to result in the party receiving actual notice and shall include all of the following: (1) The date, time, and location of the hearing; (2) The issues to be addressed at the hearing; (3) A statement that every party to the hearing has a right to counsel and to court-appointed counsel, if the party is indigent; (4) The name, telephone number, and address of the person requesting the order; (5) A copy of the order, except when it is not possible to obtain it because of the exigent circumstances in the case. If the court does not grant an ex parte order pursuant to a motion filed or made pursuant to division (C) of this section or its own motion, the court shall hold a shelter care hearing on the motion within ten days after the motion is filed. The court shall give notice of the hearing to all affected parties in the same manner as set forth in the Juvenile Rules. (E) The court, pending the outcome of the adjudicatory and dispositional hearings, shall not issue an order granting temporary custody of a child to a public children services agency or private child placing agency pursuant to this section, unless the court determines and specifically states in the order that the continued residence of the child in the child's current home will be contrary to the child's best interest and welfare and the court complies with section 2151.419 of the Revised Code. (F) Each public children services agency and private child placing agency that receives temporary custody of a child pursuant to this section shall exercise due diligence to identify and provide notice to all adult grandparents and other adult relatives of the child, including any adult relatives suggested by the parents, within thirty days of the child's removal from the custody of the child's parents, in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 671(a)(29). The agency shall also maintain in the child's case record written documentation that it has placed the child, to the extent that it is consistent with the best interest, welfare, and special needs of the child, in the most family-like setting available and in close proximity to the home of the parents, custodian, or guardian of the child. (G) For good cause shown, any court order that is issued pursuant to this section may be reviewed by the court at any time upon motion of any party to the action or upon the motion of the court. (H)(1) Pending the hearing of a complaint filed under section 2151.27 of the Revised Code or a motion filed or made under division (B) of this section and the service of citations, a public children services agency may request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check with respect to each parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement whose actions resulted in a temporary disposition under division (A) of this section. The public children services agency may request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as part of the criminal records check of each parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement. (2) Each public children services agency authorized by division (H) of this section to request a criminal records check shall do both of the following: (a) Provide to each parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement for whom a criminal records check is requested a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a standard fingerprint impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section and obtain the completed form and impression sheet from the parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement; (b) Forward the completed form and impression sheet to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. (3) A parent, guardian, custodian, prospective custodian, or prospective placement who is given a form and fingerprint impression sheet under division (H)(2)(a) of this section and who fails to complete the form or provide fingerprint impressions may be held in contempt of court. Sec. 2151.90. (A) As used in sections 2151.90 to 2151.9011 of the Revised Code: (1) "Host family" means any individual who provides care in the individual's private residence for a child or single-family group, at the request of the child's custodial parents, designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or legal custodian, under a host family agreement. The individual also may provide care for the individual's own child or children. The term "host family" excludes a foster home. (2) "Qualified organization" means a private association, organization, corporation, nonprofit, or other entity that is not a Title IV-E reimbursable setting and that has established a program that does all of the following: (a) Provides resources and services to assist, support, and educate parents, host families, children, or any person hosting a child under a host family agreement on a temporary basis; (b) Requires a criminal records check on the intended host family and all adults residing in the host family's household; (c) Requires a background check in the central registry of abuse and neglect of this state from the department of children and youth for the intended host family and all adults residing in the host family's household; (d) Ensures that the host family is trained on the rights, duties, responsibilities, and limitations as outlined in the host family agreement; (e) Conduct in-home supervision of a child who is the subject of the host family agreement while the agreement is in force as follows: (i) For hostings of fewer than thirty days, within two business days of placement and then at least once a week thereafter; (ii) For hostings of thirty days but less than ninety days, within two business days of placement and then twice a month; (iii) For hostings of ninety days or more, within two business days of placement and then an option for less frequent supervision, as determined in accordance with the best interests of the child. (f) Plans for the return of the child who is the subject of the host family agreement to the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian. "Qualified organization" excludes any entity that accepts public money intended for foster care or kinship care funding or the placement of children by a public children services agency, private noncustodial agency, or private child placing agency. (3) "Temporary basis" means a period of time not to exceed one year, except as provided in section 2151.901 of the Revised Code. (B) A child may be hosted by a host family only when all of the following conditions are satisfied: (1) The hosting is done on a temporary basis. (2) The hosting is done under a host family agreement entered into with a qualified organization's assistance. (3) Either one or both of the child's parents, or the child's guardian or legal custodian, are incarcerated, incapacitated, receiving medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment, on active military service, or subject to other circumstances under which the hosting is appropriate. (4) The host family provides care only to that child or only to a single-family group, in addition to the host family's own child or children if applicable. Sec. 2301.03. (A) In Franklin county, the judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 1, 1953, January 2, 1953, January 5, 1969, January 5, 1977, January 2, 1997, January 9, 2019, and January 3, 2021, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Franklin county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. They shall have all the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, all parentage proceedings under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction, and all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases shall be assigned to them. In addition to the judge's regular duties, the judge who is senior in point of service shall serve on the children services board and the county advisory board and shall be the administrator of the domestic relations division and its subdivisions and departments. (B) In Hamilton county: (1) The judge of the court of common pleas, whose term begins on January 1, 1957, and successors, and the judge of the court of common pleas, whose term begins on February 14, 1967, and successors, shall be the juvenile judges as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, with the powers and jurisdiction conferred by those chapters. (2) The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 5, 1957, January 16, 1981, and July 1, 1991, and successors, shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, and shall have assigned to them all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases coming before the court. On or after the first day of July and before the first day of August of 1991 and each year thereafter, a majority of the judges of the division of domestic relations shall elect one of the judges of the division as administrative judge of that division. If a majority of the judges of the division of domestic relations are unable for any reason to elect an administrative judge for the division before the first day of August, a majority of the judges of the Hamilton county court of common pleas, as soon as possible after that date, shall elect one of the judges of the division of domestic relations as administrative judge of that division. The term of the administrative judge shall begin on the earlier of the first day of August of the year in which the administrative judge is elected or the date on which the administrative judge is elected by a majority of the judges of the Hamilton county court of common pleas and shall terminate on the date on which the administrative judge's successor is elected in the following year. In addition to the judge's regular duties, the administrative judge of the division of domestic relations shall be the administrator of the domestic relations division and its subdivisions and departments and shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the division engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, including any referees considered necessary by the judges in the discharge of their various duties. The administrative judge of the division of domestic relations also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division, and shall fix the duties of its personnel. The duties of the personnel, in addition to those provided for in other sections of the Revised Code, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases and counseling and conciliation services that may be made available to persons requesting them, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division. The board of county commissioners shall appropriate the sum of money each year as will meet all the administrative expenses of the division of domestic relations, including reasonable expenses of the domestic relations judges and the division counselors and other employees designated to conduct the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, conciliation and counseling, and all matters relating to those cases and counseling, and the expenses involved in the attendance of division personnel at domestic relations and welfare conferences designated by the division, and the further sum each year as will provide for the adequate operation of the division of domestic relations. The compensation and expenses of all employees and the salary and expenses of the judges shall be paid by the county treasurer from the money appropriated for the operation of the division, upon the warrant of the county auditor, certified to by the administrative judge of the division of domestic relations. The summonses, warrants, citations, subpoenas, and other writs of the division may issue to a bailiff, constable, or staff investigator of the division or to the sheriff of any county or any marshal, constable, or police officer, and the provisions of law relating to the subpoenaing of witnesses in other cases shall apply insofar as they are applicable. When a summons, warrant, citation, subpoena, or other writ is issued to an officer, other than a bailiff, constable, or staff investigator of the division, the expense of serving it shall be assessed as a part of the costs in the case involved. (3) The judge of the court of common pleas of Hamilton county whose term begins on January 3, 1997, and the successors to that judge shall each be elected and designated as the drug court judge of the court of common pleas of Hamilton county. Eligibility for admission of a case into the drug court shall be set forth in a local rule adopted by the court of common pleas of Hamilton county. The local rule specifying eligibility shall not permit referral to the drug court of a case that involves a felony of the first or second degree, a violation of any prohibition contained in Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code that is a felony of the third degree, or a violation of section 2903.01 or 2903.02 of the Revised Code. (4) If the administrative judge of the court of common pleas of Hamilton county determines that the volume of cases pending before the drug court judge does not constitute a sufficient caseload for the drug court judge, the administrative judge, in accordance with the Rules of Superintendence for Courts of Common Pleas, shall assign individual cases to the drug court judge from the general docket of the court. If the assignments so occur, the administrative judge shall cease the assignments when the administrative judge determines that the volume of cases pending before the drug court judge constitutes a sufficient caseload for the drug court judge. (C)(1) In Lorain county: (a) The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 3, 1959, January 4, 1989, and January 2, 1999, and successors, and the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on February 9, 2009, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Lorain county and shall be elected and designated as the judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 3, 1959, January 4, 1989, and January 2, 1999, and successors, shall have all of the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, all parentage proceedings over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction, and all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases shall be assigned to them, except cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas. From February 9, 2009, through September 28, 2009, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on February 9, 2009, shall have all the powers relating to juvenile courts, and cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, parentage proceedings over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction, and divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases shall be assigned to that judge, except cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas. (b) From January 1, 2006, through September 28, 2009, the judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, in addition to the powers and jurisdiction set forth in division (C)(1)(a) of this section, shall have jurisdiction over matters that are within the jurisdiction of the probate court under Chapter 2101. and other provisions of the Revised Code. (c) The judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, whose term begins on February 9, 2009, is the successor to the probate judge who was elected in 2002 for a term that began on February 9, 2003. After September 28, 2009, the judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, whose term begins on February 9, 2009, shall be the probate judge. (2)(a) From February 9, 2009, through September 28, 2009, with respect to Lorain county, all references in law to the probate court shall be construed as references to the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, and all references to the probate judge shall be construed as references to the judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. (b) From February 9, 2009, through September 28, 2009, with respect to Lorain county, all references in law to the clerk of the probate court shall be construed as references to the judge who is serving pursuant to Rule 4 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio as the administrative judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. (D) In Lucas county: (1) The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 1, 1955, and January 3, 1965, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Lucas county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. All divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases shall be assigned to them. The judge of the division of domestic relations, senior in point of service, shall be considered as the presiding judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, and shall be charged exclusively with the assignment and division of the work of the division and the employment and supervision of all other personnel of the domestic relations division. (2) The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 5, 1977, and January 2, 1991, and successors shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Lucas county, shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, and shall be the juvenile judges as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code with the powers and jurisdictions conferred by those chapters. In addition to the judge's regular duties, the judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, senior in point of service, shall be the administrator of the juvenile division and its subdivisions and departments and shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the division engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating juvenile cases, including any referees considered necessary by the judges of the division in the discharge of their various duties. The judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, senior in point of service, also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowance, hours, leaves of absence, and vacation of the personnel of the division and shall fix the duties of the personnel of the division. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties include the handling, servicing, and investigation of juvenile cases and counseling and conciliation services that may be made available to persons requesting them, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division. (3) If one of the judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, or one of the judges of the juvenile division is sick, absent, or unable to perform that judge's judicial duties or the volume of cases pending in that judge's division necessitates it, the duties shall be performed by the judges of the other of those divisions. (E) In Mahoning county: (1) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term began on January 1, 1955, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Mahoning county, shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, and shall be assigned all the divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases coming before the court. In addition to the judge's regular duties, the judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, shall be the administrator of the domestic relations division and its subdivisions and departments and shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the division engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, including any referees considered necessary in the discharge of the various duties of the judge's office. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix the duties of the personnel of the division. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases and counseling and conciliation services that may be made available to persons requesting them, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division. (2) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term began on January 2, 1969, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Mahoning county, shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, and shall be the juvenile judge as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, with the powers and jurisdictions conferred by those chapters. In addition to the judge's regular duties, the judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, shall be the administrator of the juvenile division and its subdivisions and departments and shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the division engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating juvenile cases, including any referees considered necessary by the judge in the discharge of the judge's various duties. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacation of the personnel of the division and shall fix the duties of the personnel of the division. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, include the handling, servicing, and investigation of juvenile cases and counseling and conciliation services that may be made available to persons requesting them, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division. (3) If a judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations or juvenile division, is sick, absent, or unable to perform that judge's judicial duties, or the volume of cases pending in that judge's division necessitates it, that judge's duties shall be performed by another judge of the court of common pleas. (F) In Montgomery county: (1) The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 2, 1953, and January 4, 1977, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Montgomery county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. These judges shall have assigned to them all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases. The judge of the division of domestic relations, senior in point of service, shall be charged exclusively with the assignment and division of the work of the division and shall have charge of the employment and supervision of the personnel of the division engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, including any necessary referees, except those employees who may be appointed by the judge, junior in point of service, under this section and sections 2301.12 and 2301.18 of the Revised Code. The judge of the division of domestic relations, senior in point of service, also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacation of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. (2) The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 1, 1953, and January 1, 1993, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Montgomery county, shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, and shall be, and have the powers and jurisdiction of, the juvenile judge as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code. In addition to the judge's regular duties, the judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, senior in point of service, shall be the administrator of the juvenile division and its subdivisions and departments and shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the juvenile division, including any necessary referees, who are engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating juvenile cases. The judge, senior in point of service, also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacation of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of juvenile cases and of any counseling and conciliation services that are available upon request to persons, whether or not they are parties to an action pending in the division. If one of the judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, or one of the judges of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, is sick, absent, or unable to perform that judge's duties or the volume of cases pending in that judge's division necessitates it, the duties of that judge may be performed by the judge or judges of the other of those divisions. (G) In Richland county: (1) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 1, 1957, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Richland county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. That judge shall be assigned and hear all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all domestic violence cases arising under section 3113.31 of the Revised Code, and all post-decree proceedings arising from any case pertaining to any of those matters. The division of domestic relations has concurrent jurisdiction with the juvenile division of the court of common pleas of Richland county to determine the care, custody, or control of any child not a ward of another court of this state, and to hear and determine a request for an order for the support of any child if the request is not ancillary to an action for divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or legal separation, a criminal or civil action involving an allegation of domestic violence, or an action for support brought under Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code. Except in cases that are subject to the exclusive original jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the judge of the division of domestic relations shall be assigned and hear all cases pertaining to paternity or parentage, the care, custody, or control of children, parenting time companionship or visitation, child support, or the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of childrenunder a parenting plan, all proceedings arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all proceedings arising under the uniform interstate family support act contained in Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, and all post-decree proceedings arising from any case pertaining to any of those matters. In addition to the judge's regular duties, the judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, shall be the administrator of the domestic relations division and its subdivisions and departments. The judge shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the domestic relations division, including any magistrates the judge considers necessary for the discharge of the judge's duties. The judge shall also designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, vacation, and other employment-related matters of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. (2) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 3, 2005, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Richland county, shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, and shall be, and have the powers and jurisdiction of, the juvenile judge as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code. Except in cases that are subject to the exclusive original jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the judge of the juvenile division shall not have jurisdiction or the power to hear, and shall not be assigned, any case pertaining to paternity or parentage, the care, custody, or control of children, parenting time companionship or visitation, child support, or the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan or any post-decree proceeding arising from any case pertaining to any of those matters. The judge of the juvenile division shall not have jurisdiction or the power to hear, and shall not be assigned, any proceeding under the uniform interstate family support act contained in Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code. In addition to the judge's regular duties, the judge of the juvenile division shall be the administrator of the juvenile division and its subdivisions and departments. The judge shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the juvenile division who are engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating juvenile cases, including any magistrates whom the judge considers necessary for the discharge of the judge's various duties. The judge of the juvenile division also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacation of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, include the handling, servicing, and investigation of juvenile cases and providing any counseling, conciliation, and mediation services that the court makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the court, who request the services. (H)(1) In Stark county, the judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 1, 1953, January 2, 1959, and January 1, 1993, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Stark county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, family court division. They shall have all the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, all parentage proceedings over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction, and all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, except cases that are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas for some special reason, shall be assigned to the judges. (2) The judge of the family court division, second most senior in point of service, shall have charge of the employment and supervision of the personnel of the division engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, and necessary referees required for the judge's respective court. (3) The judge of the family court division, senior in point of service, shall be charged exclusively with the administration of sections 2151.13, 2151.16, 2151.17, and 2152.71 of the Revised Code and with the assignment and division of the work of the division and the employment and supervision of all other personnel of the division, including, but not limited to, that judge's necessary referees, but excepting those employees who may be appointed by the judge second most senior in point of service. The senior judge further shall serve in every other position in which the statutes permit or require a juvenile judge to serve. (4) On and after September 29, 2015, all references in law to "the division of domestic relations," "the domestic relations division," "the domestic relations court," "the judge of the division of domestic relations," or "the judge of the domestic relations division" shall be construed, with respect to Stark county, as being references to "the family court division" or "the judge of the family court division." (I) In Summit county: (1) The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 4, 1967, and January 6, 1993, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Summit county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judges of the division of domestic relations shall have assigned to them and hear all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases that come before the court. Except in cases that are subject to the exclusive original jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the judges of the division of domestic relations shall have assigned to them and hear all cases pertaining to paternity, custody, companionship or visitation, child support, or the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and all post-decree proceedings arising from any case pertaining to any of those matters. The judges of the division of domestic relations shall have assigned to them and hear all proceedings under the uniform interstate family support act contained in Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code. The judge of the division of domestic relations, senior in point of service, shall be the administrator of the domestic relations division and its subdivisions and departments and shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the division, including any necessary referees, who are engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases. That judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases and of any counseling and conciliation services that are available upon request to all persons, whether or not they are parties to an action pending in the division. (2) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 1, 1955, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Summit county, shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, and shall be, and have the powers and jurisdiction of, the juvenile judge as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code. Except in cases that are subject to the exclusive original jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the judge of the juvenile division shall not have jurisdiction or the power to hear, and shall not be assigned, any case pertaining to paternity, custody, companionship or visitation, child support, or the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan or any post-decree proceeding arising from any case pertaining to any of those matters. The judge of the juvenile division shall not have jurisdiction or the power to hear, and shall not be assigned, any proceeding under the uniform interstate family support act contained in Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code. The juvenile judge shall be the administrator of the juvenile division and its subdivisions and departments and shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the juvenile division, including any necessary referees, who are engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating juvenile cases. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacation of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of juvenile cases and of any counseling and conciliation services that are available upon request to persons, whether or not they are parties to an action pending in the division. (J) In Trumbull county, the judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 1, 1953, and January 2, 1977, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Trumbull county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. They shall have all the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, all parentage proceedings over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction, and all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases shall be assigned to them, except cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas. (K) In Butler county: (1) The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 1, 1957, and January 4, 1993, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Butler county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judges of the division of domestic relations shall have assigned to them all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases coming before the court, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas. The judges of the division of domestic relations also have concurrent jurisdiction with judges of the juvenile division of the court of common pleas of Butler county with respect to and may hear cases to determine the custody, support, or custody and support of a child who is born of issue of a marriage and who is not the ward of another court of this state, cases commenced by a party of the marriage to obtain an order requiring support of any child when the request for that order is not ancillary to an action for divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or legal separation, a criminal or civil action involving an allegation of domestic violence, an action for support under Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, or an action that is within the exclusive original jurisdiction of the juvenile division of the court of common pleas of Butler county and that involves an allegation that the child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child, and post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those types of cases. The judge senior in point of service shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of all other personnel of the domestic relations division. The judge senior in point of service also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (2) The judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 3, 1987, and January 2, 2003, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Butler county, shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, and shall be the juvenile judges as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, with the powers and jurisdictions conferred by those chapters. Except in cases that are subject to the exclusive original jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the judges of the juvenile division shall not have jurisdiction or the power to hear and shall not be assigned, but shall have the limited ability and authority to certify, any case commenced by a party of a marriage to determine the custody, support, or custody and support of a child who is born of issue of the marriage and who is not the ward of another court of this state when the request for the order in the case is not ancillary to an action for divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or legal separation. The judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, who is senior in point of service, shall be the administrator of the juvenile division and its subdivisions and departments. The judge, senior in point of service, shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the juvenile division who are engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating juvenile cases, including any referees whom the judge considers necessary for the discharge of the judge's various duties. The judge, senior in point of service, also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacation of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, include the handling, servicing, and investigation of juvenile cases and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (3) If a judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations or juvenile division, is sick, absent, or unable to perform that judge's judicial duties or the volume of cases pending in the judge's division necessitates it, the duties of that judge shall be performed by the other judges of the domestic relations and juvenile divisions. (L)(1) In Cuyahoga county, the judges of the court of common pleas whose terms begin on January 8, 1961, January 9, 1961, January 18, 1975, January 19, 1975, and January 13, 1987, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Cuyahoga county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. They shall have all the powers relating to all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, except in cases that are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas for some special reason. (2) The administrative judge is administrator of the domestic relations division and its subdivisions and departments and has the following powers concerning division personnel: (a) Full charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision; (b) Sole determination of compensation, duties, expenses, allowances, hours, leaves, and vacations. (3) "Division personnel" include persons employed or referees engaged in hearing, servicing, investigating, counseling, or conciliating divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation and annulment matters. (M) In Lake county: (1) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 2, 1961, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Lake county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all the divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases coming before the court, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas. The judge shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of all other personnel of the domestic relations division. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (2) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 4, 1979, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Lake county, shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, and shall be the juvenile judge as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, with the powers and jurisdictions conferred by those chapters. The judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, shall be the administrator of the juvenile division and its subdivisions and departments. The judge shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the juvenile division who are engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating juvenile cases, including any referees whom the judge considers necessary for the discharge of the judge's various duties. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacation of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, include the handling, servicing, and investigation of juvenile cases and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (3) If a judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations or juvenile division, is sick, absent, or unable to perform that judge's judicial duties or the volume of cases pending in the judge's division necessitates it, the duties of that judge shall be performed by the other judges of the domestic relations and juvenile divisions. (N) In Erie county: (1) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 2, 1971, and the successors to that judge whose terms begin before January 2, 2007, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judge of the court of common pleas of Erie county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall have all the powers relating to juvenile courts, and shall be assigned all cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, parentage proceedings over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction, and divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, except cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge. On or after January 2, 2007, the judge of the court of common pleas who is elected in 2006 shall be the successor to the judge of the domestic relations division whose term expires on January 1, 2007, shall be designated as judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, and shall be the juvenile judge as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code with the powers and jurisdictions conferred by those chapters. (2) The judge of the court of common pleas, general division, whose term begins on January 1, 2005, and successors, the judge of the court of common pleas, general division whose term begins on January 2, 2005, and successors, and the judge of the court of common pleas, general division, whose term begins February 9, 2009, and successors, shall have assigned to them, in addition to all matters that are within the jurisdiction of the general division of the court of common pleas, all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases coming before the court, and all matters that are within the jurisdiction of the probate court under Chapter 2101., and other provisions, of the Revised Code. (O) In Greene county: (1) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 1, 1961, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Greene county and shall be elected and designated as the judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, annulment, uniform reciprocal support enforcement, and domestic violence cases and all other cases related to domestic relations, except cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas. The judge shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of all other personnel of the division. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel of the division, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases and the provision of counseling and conciliation services that the division considers necessary and makes available to persons who request the services, whether or not the persons are parties in an action pending in the division. The compensation for the personnel shall be paid from the overall court budget and shall be included in the appropriations for the existing judges of the general division of the court of common pleas. (2) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 1, 1995, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Greene county, shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, and, on or after January 1, 1995, shall be the juvenile judge as provided in Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code with the powers and jurisdiction conferred by those chapters. The judge of the court of common pleas, juvenile division, shall be the administrator of the juvenile division and its subdivisions and departments. The judge shall have charge of the employment, assignment, and supervision of the personnel of the juvenile division who are engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating juvenile cases, including any referees whom the judge considers necessary for the discharge of the judge's various duties. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacation of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, include the handling, servicing, and investigation of juvenile cases and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the court makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the court, who request the services. (3) If one of the judges of the court of common pleas, general division, is sick, absent, or unable to perform that judge's judicial duties or the volume of cases pending in the general division necessitates it, the duties of that judge of the general division shall be performed by the judge of the division of domestic relations and the judge of the juvenile division. (P) In Portage county, the judge of the court of common pleas, whose term begins January 2, 1987, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Portage county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, all proceedings arising under the uniform interstate family support act contained in Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, all proceedings arising under sections 3119.96 to 3119.967 of the Revised Code, all proceedings arising under the uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement act contained in Chapter 3127. of the Revised Code, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas. The judge shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of all other personnel of the domestic relations division. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, proceedings arising under the uniform interstate family support act contained in Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, proceedings arising under sections 3119.96 to 3119.967 of the Revised Code, and proceedings arising under the uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement act contained in Chapter 3127. of the Revised Code, and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (Q) In Clermont county, the judge of the court of common pleas, whose term begins January 2, 1987, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Clermont county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases coming before the court, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas. The judge shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of all other personnel of the domestic relations division. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (R) In Warren county, the judge of the court of common pleas, whose term begins January 1, 1987, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Warren county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases coming before the court, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to some other judge of the court of common pleas. The judge shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of all other personnel of the domestic relations division. The judge also shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix their duties. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (S) In Licking county, the judges of the court of common pleas, whose terms begin on January 1, 1991, and January 1, 2005, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Licking county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judges shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to another judge of the court of common pleas. The administrative judge of the division of domestic relations shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of the personnel of the division. The administrative judge of the division of domestic relations shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix the duties of the personnel of the division. The duties of the personnel of the division, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, and proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (T) In Allen county, the judge of the court of common pleas, whose term begins January 1, 1993, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Allen county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to another judge of the court of common pleas. The judge shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of the personnel of the division. The judge shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix the duties of the personnel of the division. The duties of the personnel of the division, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, and proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (U) In Medina county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins January 1, 1995, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Medina county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to another judge of the court of common pleas. The judge shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of the personnel of the division. The judge shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix the duties of the personnel of the division. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, and proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and providing counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (V) In Fairfield county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins January 2, 1995, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Fairfield county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to another judge of the court of common pleas. The judge also has concurrent jurisdiction with the probate-juvenile division of the court of common pleas of Fairfield county with respect to and may hear cases to determine the custody of a child, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code, who is not the ward of another court of this state, cases that are commenced by a parent, guardian, or custodian of a child, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code, to obtain an order requiring a parent of the child to pay child support for that child when the request for that order is not ancillary to an action for divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or legal separation, a criminal or civil action involving an allegation of domestic violence, an action for support under Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, or an action that is within the exclusive original jurisdiction of the probate-juvenile division of the court of common pleas of Fairfield county and that involves an allegation that the child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child, and post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those types of cases. The judge of the domestic relations division shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of the personnel of the division. The judge shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix the duties of the personnel of the division. The duties of the personnel of the division, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, and proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, regardless of whether the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. When the judge hears a case to determine the custody of a child, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code, who is not the ward of another court of this state or a case that is commenced by a parent, guardian, or custodian of a child, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code, to obtain an order requiring a parent of the child to pay child support for that child when the request for that order is not ancillary to an action for divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or legal separation, a criminal or civil action involving an allegation of domestic violence, an action for support under Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, or an action that is within the exclusive original jurisdiction of the probate-juvenile division of the court of common pleas of Fairfield county and that involves an allegation that the child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child, the duties of the personnel of the domestic relations division also include the handling, servicing, and investigation of those types of cases. (W)(1) In Clark county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 2, 1995, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Clark county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, domestic relations division. The judge shall have all the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code and all parentage proceedings under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction shall be assigned to the judge of the division of domestic relations. All divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, annulment, uniform reciprocal support enforcement, and other cases related to domestic relations shall be assigned to the domestic relations division, and the presiding judge of the court of common pleas shall assign the cases to the judge of the domestic relations division and the judges of the general division. (2) In addition to the judge's regular duties, the judge of the division of domestic relations shall serve on the children services board and the county advisory board. (3) If the judge of the court of common pleas of Clark county, division of domestic relations, is sick, absent, or unable to perform that judge's judicial duties or if the presiding judge of the court of common pleas of Clark county determines that the volume of cases pending in the division of domestic relations necessitates it, the duties of the judge of the division of domestic relations shall be performed by the judges of the general division or probate division of the court of common pleas of Clark county, as assigned for that purpose by the presiding judge of that court, and the judges so assigned shall act in conjunction with the judge of the division of domestic relations of that court. (X) In Scioto county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins January 2, 1995, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as other judges of the court of common pleas of Scioto county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to another judge of the court of common pleas. The judge shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of the personnel of the division. The judge shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix the duties of the personnel of the division. The duties of the personnel, in addition to other statutory duties, include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, and proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and providing counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (Y) In Auglaize county, the judge of the probate and juvenile divisions of the Auglaize county court of common pleas also shall be the administrative judge of the domestic relations division of the court and shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases coming before the court. The judge shall have all powers as administrator of the domestic relations division and shall have charge of the personnel engaged in handling, servicing, or investigating divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, including any referees considered necessary for the discharge of the judge's various duties. (Z)(1) In Marion county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on February 9, 1999, and the successors to that judge, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Marion county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, domestic relations-juvenile-probate division. Except as otherwise specified in this division, that judge, and the successors to that judge, shall have all the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings shall be assigned to that judge and the successors to that judge. Except as provided in division (Z)(2) of this section and notwithstanding any other provision of any section of the Revised Code, on and after February 9, 2003, the judge of the court of common pleas of Marion county whose term begins on February 9, 1999, and the successors to that judge, shall have all the powers relating to the probate division of the court of common pleas of Marion county in addition to the powers previously specified in this division, and shall exercise concurrent jurisdiction with the judge of the probate division of that court over all matters that are within the jurisdiction of the probate division of that court under Chapter 2101., and other provisions, of the Revised Code in addition to the jurisdiction of the domestic relations-juvenile-probate division of that court otherwise specified in division (Z)(1) of this section. (2) The judge of the domestic relations-juvenile-probate division of the court of common pleas of Marion county or the judge of the probate division of the court of common pleas of Marion county, whichever of those judges is senior in total length of service on the court of common pleas of Marion county, regardless of the division or divisions of service, shall serve as the clerk of the probate division of the court of common pleas of Marion county. (3) On and after February 9, 2003, all references in law to "the probate court," "the probate judge," "the juvenile court," or "the judge of the juvenile court" shall be construed, with respect to Marion county, as being references to both "the probate division" and "the domestic relations-juvenile-probate division" and as being references to both "the judge of the probate division" and "the judge of the domestic relations- juvenile-probate division." On and after February 9, 2003, all references in law to "the clerk of the probate court" shall be construed, with respect to Marion county, as being references to the judge who is serving pursuant to division (Z)(2) of this section as the clerk of the probate division of the court of common pleas of Marion county. (AA) In Muskingum county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 2, 2003, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Muskingum county and shall be elected and designated as the judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall be assigned all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to another judge of the court of common pleas. The judge shall be charged with the assignment and division of the work of the division and with the employment and supervision of the personnel of the division. The judge shall designate the title, compensation, expense allowances, hours, leaves of absence, and vacations of the personnel of the division and shall fix the duties of the personnel of the division. The duties of the personnel of the division, in addition to other statutory duties, shall include the handling, servicing, and investigation of divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, and proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation and providing any counseling and conciliation services that the division makes available to persons, whether or not the persons are parties to an action pending in the division, who request the services. (BB) In Henry county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 1, 2005, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judge of the court of common pleas of Henry county and shall be elected and designated as the judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall have all of the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapter 2151. or 2152. of the Revised Code, all parentage proceedings arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction, all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings shall be assigned to that judge, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to the other judge of the court of common pleas. (CC)(1) In Logan county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins January 2, 2005, and the successors to that judge, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Logan county and shall be elected and designated as judge of the court of common pleas, family court division. Except as otherwise specified in this division, that judge, and the successors to that judge, shall have all the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings shall be assigned to that judge and the successors to that judge. Notwithstanding any other provision of any section of the Revised Code, on and after January 2, 2005, the judge of the court of common pleas of Logan county whose term begins on January 2, 2005, and the successors to that judge, shall have all the powers relating to the probate division of the court of common pleas of Logan county in addition to the powers previously specified in this division and shall exercise concurrent jurisdiction with the judge of the probate division of that court over all matters that are within the jurisdiction of the probate division of that court under Chapter 2101., and other provisions, of the Revised Code in addition to the jurisdiction of the family court division of that court otherwise specified in division (CC)(1) of this section. (2) The judge of the family court division of the court of common pleas of Logan county or the probate judge of the court of common pleas of Logan county who is elected as the administrative judge of the family court division of the court of common pleas of Logan county pursuant to Rule 4 of the Rules of Superintendence shall be the clerk of the family court division of the court of common pleas of Logan county. (3) On and after April 5, 2019, all references in law to "the probate court," "the probate judge," "the juvenile court," or "the judge of the juvenile court" shall be construed, with respect to Logan county, as being references to both "the probate division" and the "family court division" and as being references to both "the judge of the probate division" and the "judge of the family court division." On and after April 5, 2019, all references in law to "the clerk of the probate court" shall be construed, with respect to Logan county, as being references to the judge who is serving pursuant to division (CC)(2) of this section as the clerk of the family court division of the court of common pleas of Logan county. (DD)(1) In Champaign county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins February 9, 2003, and the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins February 10, 2009, and the successors to those judges, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Champaign county and shall be elected and designated as judges of the court of common pleas, domestic relations-juvenile-probate division. Except as otherwise specified in this division, those judges, and the successors to those judges, shall have all the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapters 2151. and 2152. of the Revised Code, all cases arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code, all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings shall be assigned to those judges and the successors to those judges. Notwithstanding any other provision of any section of the Revised Code, on and after February 9, 2009, the judges designated by this division as judges of the court of common pleas of Champaign county, domestic relations-juvenile-probate division, and the successors to those judges, shall have all the powers relating to probate courts in addition to the powers previously specified in this division and shall exercise jurisdiction over all matters that are within the jurisdiction of probate courts under Chapter 2101., and other provisions, of the Revised Code in addition to the jurisdiction of the domestic relations-juvenile-probate division otherwise specified in division (DD)(1) of this section. (2) On and after February 9, 2009, all references in law to "the probate court," "the probate judge," "the juvenile court," or "the judge of the juvenile court" shall be construed with respect to Champaign county as being references to the "domestic relations-juvenile-probate division" and as being references to the "judge of the domestic relations-juvenile-probate division." On and after February 9, 2009, all references in law to "the clerk of the probate court" shall be construed with respect to Champaign county as being references to the judge who is serving pursuant to Rule 4 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio as the administrative judge of the court of common pleas, domestic relations-juvenile-probate division. (EE) In Delaware county, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 1, 2017, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judges of the court of common pleas of Delaware county and shall be elected and designated as the judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. Divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, including any post-decree proceedings, and cases involving questions of paternity, custody, companionship or visitation, child support, and the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of childrenunder a parenting plan, regardless of whether those matters arise in post-decree proceedings or involve children born between unmarried persons, shall be assigned to that judge, except cases that for some special reason are assigned to another judge of the court of common pleas. (FF) In Hardin county: (1) The judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on January 1, 2023, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judge of the court of common pleas of Hardin county and shall be elected and designated as the judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations. The judge shall have all of the powers relating to juvenile courts, and all cases under Chapter 2151. or 2152. of the Revised Code, all parentage proceedings arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction, all divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and annulment cases, civil protection orders issued under sections 2903.214 and 3113.31 of the Revised Code, all proceedings involving child support, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children under a parenting plan and the designation for the children of a place of residence and legal custodian, parenting time, and companionship or visitation, and all post-decree proceedings and matters arising from those cases and proceedings shall be assigned to that judge, except in cases that for some special reason are assigned to the other judge of the court of common pleas. (2) The judge of the court of common pleas, general division, whose term begins on February 9, 2027, and successors, shall have assigned to the judge, in addition to all matters that are within the jurisdiction of the general division of the court of common pleas, all matters that are within the jurisdiction of the probate court under Chapter 2101., and other provisions, of the Revised Code. (GG) In Adams county: (1) Subject to division (GG)(2) of this section, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on February 9, 2027, and successors, shall have the same qualifications, exercise the same powers and jurisdiction, and receive the same compensation as the other judge of the court of common pleas of Adams county. (2) Beginning on February 9, 2029, the judge of the court of common pleas whose term begins on February 9, 2027, and successors shall be designated as the judge of the court of common pleas, probate and juvenile division. The judge shall have all of the powers relating to juvenile courts, all cases under Chapter 2151. or 2152. of the Revised Code, all parentage proceedings arising under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code over which the juvenile court has jurisdiction, all of the powers relating to probate courts, and all matters that are within the jurisdiction of the probate court under Chapter 2101., and other provisions, of the Revised Code. On and after February 9, 2029, all references in law to "the probate court," "the probate judge," "the juvenile court," or "the judge of the juvenile court" shall be construed, with respect to Adams county, as being references to "the probate and juvenile division" and as being references to "the judge of the probate and juvenile division." (HH) If a judge of the court of common pleas, division of domestic relations, or juvenile judge, of any of the counties mentioned in this section is sick, absent, or unable to perform that judge's judicial duties or the volume of cases pending in the judge's division necessitates it, the duties of that judge shall be performed by another judge of the court of common pleas of that county, assigned for that purpose by the presiding judge of the court of common pleas of that county to act in place of or in conjunction with that judge, as the case may require. Sec. 2307.50. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Child stealing crime" means a violation of sections 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.03, and 2919.23 of the Revised Code or section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to the effective date of this amendment. (2) "Minor" means a person under eighteen years of age. (3) "Parental or guardianship interest" means that a parent of a minor is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the minor and has the rights and responsibilities corresponding to that capacity, that a parent of a minor is the parent other than the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the minor and has a right of access to the minor, that the parents of a minor have parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the minor and are the residential designated parents and legal custodians of the child, or that any other person has a right of custody or access to a minor as his the minor's guardian or other custodian. (B) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, if a minor is the victim of a child stealing crime and if, as a result of that crime, the minor's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, parent who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or other custodian is deprived of a parental or guardianship interest in the minor, the parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, parent who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or other custodian may maintain a civil action against the offender to recover damages for interference with the parental or guardianship interest. In the civil action, the plaintiffs may recover all of the following: (1) Full compensatory damages, including, but not limited to, damages for the mental suffering and anguish incurred by the plaintiffs, damages for the loss of society of the minor, and, if applicable, damages for the loss of the minor's services and damages for expenses incurred by the plaintiffs in locating or recovering the minor; (2) Punitive damages; (3) Reasonable attorney's fees; (4) Costs of bringing the civil action. (C) In a civil action brought pursuant to this section, the trier of fact may determine that the minor was the victim of a child stealing crime and that the defendant committed the crime, regardless of whether the defendant has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a child stealing crime. (D) This section does not create a civil action for one parent against the other parent who commits a child stealing crime against the parent's own child. Sec. 2317.02. The following persons shall not testify in certain respects: (A)(1) An attorney, concerning a communication made to the attorney by a client in that relation or concerning the attorney's advice to a client, except that the attorney may testify by express consent of the client or, if the client is deceased, by the express consent of the surviving spouse or the executor or administrator of the estate of the deceased client. However, if the client voluntarily reveals the substance of attorney-client communications in a nonprivileged context or is deemed by section 2151.421 of the Revised Code to have waived any testimonial privilege under this division, the attorney may be compelled to testify on the same subject. The testimonial privilege established under this division does not apply concerning either of the following: (a) A communication between a client in a capital case, as defined in section 2901.02 of the Revised Code, and the client's attorney if the communication is relevant to a subsequent ineffective assistance of counsel claim by the client alleging that the attorney did not effectively represent the client in the case; (b) A communication between a client who has since died and the deceased client's attorney if the communication is relevant to a dispute between parties who claim through that deceased client, regardless of whether the claims are by testate or intestate succession or by inter vivos transaction, and the dispute addresses the competency of the deceased client when the deceased client executed a document that is the basis of the dispute or whether the deceased client was a victim of fraud, undue influence, or duress when the deceased client executed a document that is the basis of the dispute. (2) An attorney, concerning a communication made to the attorney by a client in that relationship or the attorney's advice to a client, except that if the client is an insurance company, the attorney may be compelled to testify, subject to an in camera inspection by a court, about communications made by the client to the attorney or by the attorney to the client that are related to the attorney's aiding or furthering an ongoing or future commission of bad faith by the client, if the party seeking disclosure of the communications has made a prima-facie showing of bad faith, fraud, or criminal misconduct by the client. (B)(1) A physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist concerning a communication made to the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist by a patient in that relation or the advice of a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist given to a patient, except as otherwise provided in this division, division (B)(2), and division (B)(3) of this section, and except that, if the patient is deemed by section 2151.421 of the Revised Code to have waived any testimonial privilege under this division, the physician or advanced practice registered nurse may be compelled to testify on the same subject. The testimonial privilege established under this division does not apply, and a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist may testify or may be compelled to testify, in any of the following circumstances: (a) In any civil action, in accordance with the discovery provisions of the Rules of Civil Procedure in connection with a civil action, or in connection with a claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code, under any of the following circumstances: (i) If the patient or the guardian or other legal representative of the patient gives express consent; (ii) If the patient is deceased, the spouse of the patient or the executor or administrator of the patient's estate gives express consent; (iii) If a medical claim, dental claim, chiropractic claim, or optometric claim, as defined in section 2305.113 of the Revised Code, an action for wrongful death, any other type of civil action, or a claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code is filed by the patient, the personal representative of the estate of the patient if deceased, or the patient's guardian or other legal representative. (b) In any civil action concerning court-ordered treatment or services received by a patient, if the court-ordered treatment or services were ordered as part of a case plan journalized under section 2151.412 of the Revised Code or the court-ordered treatment or services are necessary or relevant to dependency, neglect, or abuse or temporary or permanent custody proceedings under Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code. (c) In any criminal action concerning any test or the results of any test that determines the presence or concentration of alcohol, a drug of abuse, a combination of them, a controlled substance, or a metabolite of a controlled substance in the patient's whole blood, blood serum or plasma, breath, urine, oral fluid, or other bodily substance at any time relevant to the criminal offense in question. (d) In any criminal action against a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist. In such an action, the testimonial privilege established under this division does not prohibit the admission into evidence, in accordance with the Rules of Evidence, of a patient's medical or dental records or other communications between a patient and the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist that are related to the action and obtained by subpoena, search warrant, or other lawful means. A court that permits or compels a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist to testify in such an action or permits the introduction into evidence of patient records or other communications in such an action shall require that appropriate measures be taken to ensure that the confidentiality of any patient named or otherwise identified in the records is maintained. Measures to ensure confidentiality that may be taken by the court include sealing its records or deleting specific information from its records. (e)(i) If the communication was between a patient who has since died and the deceased patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist, the communication is relevant to a dispute between parties who claim through that deceased patient, regardless of whether the claims are by testate or intestate succession or by inter vivos transaction, and the dispute addresses the competency of the deceased patient when the deceased patient executed a document that is the basis of the dispute or whether the deceased patient was a victim of fraud, undue influence, or duress when the deceased patient executed a document that is the basis of the dispute. (ii) If neither the spouse of a patient nor the executor or administrator of that patient's estate gives consent under division (B)(1)(a)(ii) of this section, testimony or the disclosure of the patient's medical records by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, dentist, or other health care provider under division (B)(1)(e)(i) of this section is a permitted use or disclosure of protected health information, as defined in 45 C.F.R. 160.103, and an authorization or opportunity to be heard shall not be required. (iii) Division (B)(1)(e)(i) of this section does not require a mental health professional to disclose psychotherapy notes, as defined in 45 C.F.R. 164.501. (iv) An interested person who objects to testimony or disclosure under division (B)(1)(e)(i) of this section may seek a protective order pursuant to Civil Rule 26. (v) A person to whom protected health information is disclosed under division (B)(1)(e)(i) of this section shall not use or disclose the protected health information for any purpose other than the litigation or proceeding for which the information was requested and shall return the protected health information to the covered entity or destroy the protected health information, including all copies made, at the conclusion of the litigation or proceeding. (2)(a) If any law enforcement officer submits a written statement to a health care provider that states that an official criminal investigation has begun regarding a specified person or that a criminal action or proceeding has been commenced against a specified person, that requests the provider to supply to the officer copies of any records the provider possesses that pertain to any test or the results of any test administered to the specified person to determine the presence or concentration of alcohol, a drug of abuse, a combination of them, a controlled substance, or a metabolite of a controlled substance in the person's whole blood, blood serum or plasma, breath, oral fluid, or urine at any time relevant to the criminal offense in question, and that conforms to section 2317.022 of the Revised Code, the provider, except to the extent specifically prohibited by any law of this state or of the United States, shall supply to the officer a copy of any of the requested records the provider possesses. If the health care provider does not possess any of the requested records, the provider shall give the officer a written statement that indicates that the provider does not possess any of the requested records. (b) If a health care provider possesses any records of the type described in division (B)(2)(a) of this section regarding the person in question at any time relevant to the criminal offense in question, in lieu of personally testifying as to the results of the test in question, the custodian of the records may submit a certified copy of the records, and, upon its submission, the certified copy is qualified as authentic evidence and may be admitted as evidence in accordance with the Rules of Evidence. Division (A) of section 2317.422 of the Revised Code does not apply to any certified copy of records submitted in accordance with this division. Nothing in this division shall be construed to limit the right of any party to call as a witness the person who administered the test to which the records pertain, the person under whose supervision the test was administered, the custodian of the records, the person who made the records, or the person under whose supervision the records were made. (3)(a) If the testimonial privilege described in division (B)(1) of this section does not apply as provided in division (B)(1)(a)(iii) of this section, a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist may be compelled to testify or to submit to discovery under the Rules of Civil Procedure only as to a communication made to the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist by the patient in question in that relation, or the advice of the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist given to the patient in question, that related causally or historically to physical or mental injuries that are relevant to issues in the medical claim, dental claim, chiropractic claim, or optometric claim, action for wrongful death, other civil action, or claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code. (b) If the testimonial privilege described in division (B)(1) of this section does not apply to a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist as provided in division (B)(1)(c) of this section, the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist, in lieu of personally testifying as to the results of the test in question, may submit a certified copy of those results, and, upon its submission, the certified copy is qualified as authentic evidence and may be admitted as evidence in accordance with the Rules of Evidence. Division (A) of section 2317.422 of the Revised Code does not apply to any certified copy of results submitted in accordance with this division. Nothing in this division shall be construed to limit the right of any party to call as a witness the person who administered the test in question, the person under whose supervision the test was administered, the custodian of the results of the test, the person who compiled the results, or the person under whose supervision the results were compiled. (4) The testimonial privilege described in division (B)(1) of this section is not waived when a communication is made by a physician or advanced practice registered nurse to a pharmacist or when there is communication between a patient and a pharmacist in furtherance of the physician-patient or advanced practice registered nurse-patient relation. (5)(a) As used in divisions (B)(1) to (4) of this section, "communication" means acquiring, recording, or transmitting any information, in any manner, concerning any facts, opinions, or statements necessary to enable a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist to diagnose, treat, prescribe, or act for a patient. A "communication" may include, but is not limited to, any medical or dental, office, or hospital communication such as a record, chart, letter, memorandum, laboratory test and results, x-ray, photograph, financial statement, diagnosis, or prognosis. (b) As used in division (B)(2) of this section, "health care provider" means a hospital, ambulatory care facility, long-term care facility, pharmacy, emergency facility, or health care practitioner. (c) As used in division (B)(5)(b) of this section: (i) "Ambulatory care facility" means a facility that provides medical, diagnostic, or surgical treatment to patients who do not require hospitalization, including a dialysis center, ambulatory surgical facility, cardiac catheterization facility, diagnostic imaging center, extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy center, home health agency, inpatient hospice, birthing center, radiation therapy center, emergency facility, and an urgent care center. "Ambulatory health care facility" does not include the private office of a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or dentist, whether the office is for an individual or group practice. (ii) "Emergency facility" means a hospital emergency department or any other facility that provides emergency medical services. (iii) "Health care practitioner" has the same meaning as in section 4769.01 of the Revised Code. (iv) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in section 3727.01 of the Revised Code. (v) "Long-term care facility" means a nursing home, residential care facility, or home for the aging, as those terms are defined in section 3721.01 of the Revised Code; a residential facility licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code that provides accommodations, supervision, and personal care services for three to sixteen unrelated adults; a nursing facility, as defined in section 5165.01 of the Revised Code; a skilled nursing facility, as defined in section 5165.01 of the Revised Code; and an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities, as defined in section 5124.01 of the Revised Code. (vi) "Pharmacy" has the same meaning as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (d) As used in divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, "drug of abuse" has the same meaning as in section 4506.01 of the Revised Code. (6) Divisions (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section apply to doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathic medicine, doctors of podiatry, advanced practice registered nurses, and dentists. (7) Nothing in divisions (B)(1) to (6) of this section affects, or shall be construed as affecting, the immunity from civil liability conferred by section 307.628 of the Revised Code or the immunity from civil liability conferred by section 2305.33 of the Revised Code upon physicians or advanced practice registered nurses who report an employee's use of a drug of abuse, or a condition of an employee other than one involving the use of a drug of abuse, to the employer of the employee in accordance with division (B) of that section. As used in division (B)(7) of this section, "employee," "employer," and "physician" have the same meanings as in section 2305.33 of the Revised Code and "advanced practice registered nurse" has the same meaning as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) A cleric, when the cleric remains accountable to the authority of that cleric's church, denomination, or sect, concerning a confession made, or any information confidentially communicated, to the cleric for a religious counseling purpose in the cleric's professional character. The cleric may testify by express consent of the person making the communication, except when the disclosure of the information is in violation of a sacred trust and except that, if the person voluntarily testifies or is deemed by division (A)(4)(c) of section 2151.421 of the Revised Code to have waived any testimonial privilege under this division, the cleric may be compelled to testify on the same subject except when disclosure of the information is in violation of a sacred trust. (2) As used in division (C) of this section: (a) "Cleric" means a member of the clergy, rabbi, priest, Christian Science practitioner, or regularly ordained, accredited, or licensed minister of an established and legally cognizable church, denomination, or sect. (b) "Sacred trust" means a confession or confidential communication made to a cleric in the cleric's ecclesiastical capacity in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which the cleric belongs, including, but not limited to, the Catholic Church, if both of the following apply: (i) The confession or confidential communication was made directly to the cleric. (ii) The confession or confidential communication was made in the manner and context that places the cleric specifically and strictly under a level of confidentiality that is considered inviolate by canon law or church doctrine. (D) Husband or wife, concerning any communication made by one to the other, or an act done by either in the presence of the other, during coverture, unless the communication was made, or act done, in the known presence or hearing of a third person competent to be a witness; and such rule is the same if the marital relation has ceased to exist; (E) A person who assigns a claim or interest, concerning any matter in respect to which the person would not, if a party, be permitted to testify; (F) A person who, if a party, would be restricted under section 2317.03 of the Revised Code, when the property or thing is sold or transferred by an executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, heir, devisee, or legatee, shall be restricted in the same manner in any action or proceeding concerning the property or thing. (G)(1) A school guidance counselor who holds a valid educator license from the state board of education as provided for in section 3319.22 of the Revised Code, a person licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code as a licensed professional clinical counselor, licensed professional counselor, social worker, independent social worker, marriage and family therapist or independent marriage and family therapist, or registered under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code as a social work assistant concerning a confidential communication received from a client in that relation or the person's advice to a client unless any of the following applies: (a) The communication or advice indicates clear and present danger to the client or other persons. For the purposes of this division, cases in which there are indications of present or past child abuse or neglect of the client constitute a clear and present danger. (b) The client gives express consent to the testimony. (c) If the client is deceased, the surviving spouse or the executor or administrator of the estate of the deceased client gives express consent. (d) The client voluntarily testifies, in which case the school guidance counselor or person licensed or registered under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code may be compelled to testify on the same subject. (e) The court in camera determines that the information communicated by the client is not germane to the counselor-client, marriage and family therapist-client, or social worker-client relationship. (f) A court, in an action brought against a school, its administration, or any of its personnel by the client, rules after an in-camera inspection that the testimony of the school guidance counselor is relevant to that action. (g) The testimony is sought in a civil action and concerns court-ordered treatment or services received by a patient as part of a case plan journalized under section 2151.412 of the Revised Code or the court-ordered treatment or services are necessary or relevant to dependency, neglect, or abuse or temporary or permanent custody proceedings under Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code. (2) Nothing in division (G)(1) of this section shall relieve a school guidance counselor or a person licensed or registered under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code from the requirement to report information concerning child abuse or neglect under section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. (H) A neutral facilitator, including a mediator, acting under a mediation dispute resolution order issued under division (A) of section 3109.052 of the Revised Code or otherwise issued in any proceeding for divorce, dissolution, legal separation, annulment, or the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children, in any action or proceeding, other than a criminal, delinquency, child abuse, child neglect, or dependent child action or proceeding, that is brought by or against either parent who takes part in mediation in accordance with the order and that pertains to the mediation process, to any information discussed or presented in the mediation process, to the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the parents' children, or to the awarding of parenting time rights under a parenting plan in relation to their children; (I) A communications assistant, acting within the scope of the communication assistant's authority, when providing telecommunications relay service pursuant to section 4931.06 of the Revised Code or Title II of the "Communications Act of 1934," 104 Stat. 366 (1990), 47 U.S.C. 225, concerning a communication made through a telecommunications relay service. Nothing in this section shall limit the obligation of a communications assistant to divulge information or testify when mandated by federal law or regulation or pursuant to subpoena in a criminal proceeding. Nothing in this section shall limit any immunity or privilege granted under federal law or regulation. (J)(1) A chiropractor in a civil proceeding concerning a communication made to the chiropractor by a patient in that relation or the chiropractor's advice to a patient, except as otherwise provided in this division. The testimonial privilege established under this division does not apply, and a chiropractor may testify or may be compelled to testify, in any civil action, in accordance with the discovery provisions of the Rules of Civil Procedure in connection with a civil action, or in connection with a claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code, under any of the following circumstances: (a) If the patient or the guardian or other legal representative of the patient gives express consent. (b) If the patient is deceased, the spouse of the patient or the executor or administrator of the patient's estate gives express consent. (c) If a medical claim, dental claim, chiropractic claim, or optometric claim, as defined in section 2305.113 of the Revised Code, an action for wrongful death, any other type of civil action, or a claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code is filed by the patient, the personal representative of the estate of the patient if deceased, or the patient's guardian or other legal representative. (2) If the testimonial privilege described in division (J)(1) of this section does not apply as provided in division (J)(1)(c) of this section, a chiropractor may be compelled to testify or to submit to discovery under the Rules of Civil Procedure only as to a communication made to the chiropractor by the patient in question in that relation, or the chiropractor's advice to the patient in question, that related causally or historically to physical or mental injuries that are relevant to issues in the medical claim, dental claim, chiropractic claim, or optometric claim, action for wrongful death, other civil action, or claim under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code. (3) The testimonial privilege established under this division does not apply, and a chiropractor may testify or be compelled to testify, in any criminal action or administrative proceeding. (4) As used in this division, "communication" means acquiring, recording, or transmitting any information, in any manner, concerning any facts, opinions, or statements necessary to enable a chiropractor to diagnose, treat, or act for a patient. A communication may include, but is not limited to, any chiropractic, office, or hospital communication such as a record, chart, letter, memorandum, laboratory test and results, x-ray, photograph, financial statement, diagnosis, or prognosis. (K)(1) Except as provided under division (K)(2) of this section, a critical incident stress management team member concerning a communication received from an individual who receives crisis response services from the team member, or the team member's advice to the individual, during a debriefing session. (2) The testimonial privilege established under division (K)(1) of this section does not apply if any of the following are true: (a) The communication or advice indicates clear and present danger to the individual who receives crisis response services or to other persons. For purposes of this division, cases in which there are indications of present or past child abuse or neglect of the individual constitute a clear and present danger. (b) The individual who received crisis response services gives express consent to the testimony. (c) If the individual who received crisis response services is deceased, the surviving spouse or the executor or administrator of the estate of the deceased individual gives express consent. (d) The individual who received crisis response services voluntarily testifies, in which case the team member may be compelled to testify on the same subject. (e) The court in camera determines that the information communicated by the individual who received crisis response services is not germane to the relationship between the individual and the team member. (f) The communication or advice pertains or is related to any criminal act. (3) As used in division (K) of this section: (a) "Crisis response services" means consultation, risk assessment, referral, and on-site crisis intervention services provided by a critical incident stress management team to individuals affected by crisis or disaster. (b) "Critical incident stress management team member" or "team member" means an individual specially trained to provide crisis response services as a member of an organized community or local crisis response team that holds membership in the Ohio critical incident stress management network. (c) "Debriefing session" means a session at which crisis response services are rendered by a critical incident stress management team member during or after a crisis or disaster. (L)(1) Subject to division (L)(2) of this section and except as provided in division (L)(3) of this section, an employee assistance professional, concerning a communication made to the employee assistance professional by a client in the employee assistance professional's official capacity as an employee assistance professional. (2) Division (L)(1) of this section applies to an employee assistance professional who meets either or both of the following requirements: (a) Is certified by the employee assistance certification commission to engage in the employee assistance profession; (b) Has education, training, and experience in all of the following: (i) Providing workplace-based services designed to address employer and employee productivity issues; (ii) Providing assistance to employees and employees' dependents in identifying and finding the means to resolve personal problems that affect the employees or the employees' performance; (iii) Identifying and resolving productivity problems associated with an employee's concerns about any of the following matters: health, marriage, family, finances, substance abuse or other addiction, workplace, law, and emotional issues; (iv) Selecting and evaluating available community resources; (v) Making appropriate referrals; (vi) Local and national employee assistance agreements; (vii) Client confidentiality. (3) Division (L)(1) of this section does not apply to any of the following: (a) A criminal action or proceeding involving an offense under sections 2903.01 to 2903.06 of the Revised Code if the employee assistance professional's disclosure or testimony relates directly to the facts or immediate circumstances of the offense; (b) A communication made by a client to an employee assistance professional that reveals the contemplation or commission of a crime or serious, harmful act; (c) A communication that is made by a client who is an unemancipated minor or an adult adjudicated to be incompetent and indicates that the client was the victim of a crime or abuse; (d) A civil proceeding to determine an individual's mental competency or a criminal action in which a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity is entered; (e) A civil or criminal malpractice action brought against the employee assistance professional; (f) When the employee assistance professional has the express consent of the client or, if the client is deceased or disabled, the client's legal representative; (g) When the testimonial privilege otherwise provided by division (L)(1) of this section is abrogated under law. Sec. 2701.03. (A) If a judge of the court of common pleas allegedly is interested in a proceeding pending before the court, allegedly is related to or has a bias or prejudice for or against a party to a proceeding pending before the court or a party's counsel, or allegedly otherwise is disqualified to preside in a proceeding pending before the court, any party to the proceeding or the party's counsel may file an affidavit of disqualification with the clerk of the supreme court in accordance with division (B) of this section. (B) An affidavit of disqualification filed under section 2101.39, 2501.13, 2701.031, or 2743.041 of the Revised Code or division (A) of this section shall be filed with the clerk of the supreme court not less than seven calendar days before the day on which the next hearing in the proceeding is scheduled and shall include all of the following: (1) The specific allegations on which the claim of interest, bias, prejudice, or disqualification is based and the facts to support each of those allegations or, in relation to an affidavit filed against a judge of a court of appeals, a specific allegation that the judge presided in the lower court in the same proceeding and the facts to support that allegation; (2) The jurat of a notary public or another person authorized to administer oaths or affirmations; (3) A certificate indicating that a copy of the affidavit has been served on the probate judge, judge of a court of appeals, judge of a court of common pleas, judge of a municipal or county court, or judge of the court of claims against whom the affidavit is filed and on all other parties or their counsel; (4) The date of the next scheduled hearing in the proceeding or, if there is no hearing scheduled, a statement that there is no hearing scheduled. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, when an affidavit of disqualification is presented to the clerk of the supreme court for filing under division (B) of this section, all of the following apply: (a) The clerk of the supreme court shall accept the affidavit for filing and shall forward the affidavit to the chief justice of the supreme court. (b) The supreme court shall send notice of the filing of the affidavit to the probate court served by the judge if the affidavit is filed against a probate court judge, to the clerk of the court of appeals served by the judge if the affidavit is filed against a judge of a court of appeals, to the clerk of the court of common pleas served by the judge if the affidavit is filed against a judge of a court of common pleas, to the clerk of the municipal or county court served by the judge if the affidavit is filed against a judge of a municipal or county court, or to the clerk of the court of claims if the affidavit is filed against a judge of the court of claims. (c) Upon receipt of the notice under division (C)(1)(b) of this section, the probate court, the clerk of the court of appeals, the clerk of the court of common pleas, the clerk of the municipal or county court, or the clerk of the court of claims shall enter the fact of the filing of the affidavit on the docket of the probate court, the docket of the court of appeals, the docket in the proceeding in the court of common pleas, the docket of in the proceeding in the municipal or county court, or the docket of in the proceeding in the court of claims. (2) The clerk of the supreme court shall not accept an affidavit of disqualification presented for filing under division (B) of this section if it is not timely presented for filing or does not satisfy the requirements of divisions (B)(2), (3), and (4) of this section. (D)(1) Except as provided in divisions (D)(2) to (4) of this section, if the clerk of the supreme court accepts an affidavit of disqualification for filing under divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the affidavit deprives the judge against whom the affidavit was filed of any authority to preside in the proceeding until the chief justice of the supreme court, or a justice of the supreme court designated by the chief justice, rules on the affidavit pursuant to division (E) of this section. (2) A judge against whom an affidavit of disqualification has been filed under divisions (B) and (C) of this section may do any of the following that is applicable: (a) If, based on the scheduled hearing date, the affidavit was not timely filed, the judge may preside in the proceeding. (b) If the proceeding is a domestic relations proceeding, the judge may issue any temporary order relating to spousal support pendente lite and the support, maintenance, and allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children. (c) If the proceeding pertains to a complaint brought pursuant to Chapter 2151. or 2152. of the Revised Code, the judge may issue any temporary order pertaining to the relation and conduct of any other person toward a child who is the subject of a complaint as the interest and welfare of the child may require. (3) A judge against whom an affidavit of disqualification has been filed under divisions (B) and (C) of this section may determine a matter that does not affect a substantive right of any of the parties. (4) If the clerk of the supreme court accepts an affidavit of disqualification for filing under divisions (B) and (C) of this section, if the chief justice of the supreme court, or a justice of the supreme court designated by the chief justice, denies the affidavit of disqualification pursuant to division (E) of this section, and if, after the denial, a second or subsequent affidavit of disqualification regarding the same judge and the same proceeding is filed by the same party who filed or on whose behalf was filed the affidavit that was denied or by counsel for the same party who filed or on whose behalf was filed the affidavit that was denied, the judge against whom the second or subsequent affidavit is filed may preside in the proceeding prior to the ruling of the chief justice of the supreme court, or a justice designated by the chief justice, on the second or subsequent affidavit. (E) If the clerk of the supreme court accepts an affidavit of disqualification for filing under divisions (B) and (C) of this section and if the chief justice of the supreme court, or any justice of the supreme court designated by the chief justice, determines that the interest, bias, prejudice, or disqualification alleged in the affidavit does not exist, the chief justice or the designated justice shall issue an entry denying the affidavit of disqualification. If the chief justice of the supreme court, or any justice of the supreme court designated by the chief justice, determines that the interest, bias, prejudice, or disqualification alleged in the affidavit exists, the chief justice or the designated justice shall issue an entry that disqualifies that judge from presiding in the proceeding and either order that the proceeding be assigned to another judge of the court of which the disqualified judge is a member pursuant to the court's random assignment process, to a judge of another court, or to a retired judge. Sec. 2705.031. (A) As used in this section, "Title IV-D case" has the same meaning as in section 3125.01 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Any party who has a legal claim to any support ordered for a child, spouse, or former spouse may initiate a contempt action for failure to pay the support. In Title IV-D cases, the contempt action for failure to pay support also may be initiated by an attorney retained by the party who has the legal claim, the prosecuting attorney, or an attorney of the department of job and family services or the child support enforcement agency. (2) Any parent who is granted parenting time rights under a parenting time order or decree issued pursuant to plan as described in section 3109.051 3109.044 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, or any person who is granted companionship or visitation rights under a companionship or visitation order or decree issued pursuant to section 3109.0513109.054, 3109.11, or 3109.12 of the Revised Code or pursuant to any other provision of the Revised Code, or any other person who is subject to any parenting time or visitation order or decree, may initiate a contempt action for a failure to comply with, or an interference with, the order or decree. (C) In any contempt action initiated pursuant to division (B) of this section, the accused shall appear upon the summons and order to appear that is issued by the court. The summons shall include all of the following: (1) Notice that failure to appear may result in the issuance of an order of arrest, and in cases involving alleged failure to pay support, the issuance of an order for the payment of support by withholding an amount from the personal earnings of the accused or by withholding or deducting an amount from some other asset of the accused; (2) Notice that the accused has a right to counsel, and that if indigent, the accused must apply for a public defender or court appointed counsel within three business days after receipt of the summons; (3) Notice that the court may refuse to grant a continuance at the time of the hearing for the purpose of the accused obtaining counsel, if the accused fails to make a good faith effort to retain counsel or to obtain a public defender; (4) Notice of the potential penalties that could be imposed upon the accused, if the accused is found guilty of contempt for failure to pay support or for a failure to comply with, or an interference with, a parenting time under a parenting plan or a companionship or visitation order or decree; (5) Notice that the court may grant limited driving privileges under section 4510.021 of the Revised Code pursuant to a request made by the accused, if the driver's license was suspended based on a notice issued pursuant to section 3123.54 of the Revised Code by the child support enforcement agency and if the request is accompanied by a recent noncertified copy of a driver's abstract from the registrar of motor vehicles. (D) If the accused is served as required by the Rules of Civil Procedure or by any special statutory proceedings that are relevant to the case, the court may order the attachment of the person of the accused upon failure to appear as ordered by the court. (E) The imposition of any penalty for contempt under section 2705.05 of the Revised Code shall not eliminate any obligation of the accused to pay any past, present, or future support obligation or any obligation of the accused to comply with or refrain from interfering with the parenting time under a parenting plan or a companionship or visitation order or decree. The court shall have jurisdiction to make a finding of contempt for the failure to pay support and to impose the penalties set forth in section 2705.05 of the Revised Code in all cases in which past due support is at issue even if the duty to pay support has terminated, and shall have jurisdiction to make a finding of contempt for a failure to comply with, or an interference with, a parenting time under a parenting plan or a companionship or visitation order or decree and to impose the penalties set forth in section 2705.05 of the Revised Code in all cases in which the failure or interference is at issue even if the parenting time or companionship or visitation order or decree no longer is in effect. Sec. 2901.30. (A) As used in sections 2901.30 to 2901.32 of the Revised Code: (1) "Information" means information that can be integrated into the computer system and that relates to the physical or mental description of a minor including, but not limited to, height, weight, color of hair and eyes, use of eyeglasses or contact lenses, skin coloring, physical or mental disabilities, special medical conditions or needs, abnormalities, problems, scars and marks, and distinguishing characteristics, and other information that could assist in identifying a minor including, but not limited to, full name and nickname, date and place of birth, age, names and addresses of parents and other relatives, fingerprints, dental records, photographs, social security number, driver's license number, credit card numbers, bank account numbers, and clothing. (2) "Minor" means a person under eighteen years of age. (3) "Missing children" or "missing child" means either of the following: (a) A minor who has run away from or who otherwise is missing from the home of, or the care, custody, and control of, the minor's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or other person having responsibility for the care of the minor; (b) A minor who is missing and about whom there is reason to believe the minor could be the victim of a violation of section 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.03, or 2919.23 of the Revised Code or of a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996. (B) When a law enforcement agency in this state that has jurisdiction in the matter is informed that a minor is or may be a missing child and that the person providing the information wishes to file a missing child report, the law enforcement agency shall take that report. Upon taking the report, the law enforcement agency shall take prompt action upon it, including, but not limited to, concerted efforts to locate the missing child. No law enforcement agency in this state shall have a rule or policy that prohibits or discourages the filing of or the taking of action upon a missing child report, within a specified period following the discovery or formulation of a belief that a minor is or could be a missing child. (C) If a missing child report is made to a law enforcement agency in this state that has jurisdiction in the matter, the law enforcement agency shall gather readily available information about the missing child and integrate it into the national crime information center computer immediately following the making of the report. The law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to acquire additional information about the missing child following the transmittal of the initially available information, and promptly integrate any additional information acquired into such computer systems. Whenever a law enforcement agency integrates information about a missing child into the national crime information center computer, the law enforcement agency promptly shall notify the missing child's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or legal custodian, or any other person responsible for the care of the missing child, that it has so integrated the information. The parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or other person responsible for the care of the missing child shall provide available information upon request, and may provide information voluntarily, to the law enforcement agency during the information gathering process. The law enforcement agency also may obtain available information about the missing child from other persons, subject to constitutional and statutory limitations. (D) Upon the filing of a missing child report, the law enforcement agency involved may notify the public or nonpublic school in which the missing child is or was most recently enrolled, as ascertained by the agency, that the child is the subject of a missing child report and that the child's school records are to be marked in accordance with section 3313.672 of the Revised Code. (E) Upon the filing of a missing child report, the law enforcement agency involved promptly shall make a reasonable attempt to notify other law enforcement agencies within its county and, if the agency has jurisdiction in a municipal corporation or township that borders another county, to notify the law enforcement agency for the municipal corporation or township in the other county with which it shares the border, that it has taken a missing child report and may be requesting assistance or cooperation in the case, and provide relevant information to the other law enforcement agencies. The agency may notify additional law enforcement agencies, or appropriate public children services agencies, about the case, request their assistance or cooperation in the case, and provide them with relevant information. Upon request from a law enforcement agency, a public children services agency shall grant the law enforcement agency access to all information concerning a missing child that the agency possesses that may be relevant to the law enforcement agency in investigating a missing child report concerning that child. The information obtained by the law enforcement agency shall be used only to further the investigation to locate the missing child. (F) Upon request, law enforcement agencies in this state shall provide assistance to, and cooperate with, other law enforcement agencies in their investigation of missing child cases. The assistance and cooperation under this paragraph shall be pursuant to any terms agreed upon by the law enforcement agencies, which may include the provision of law enforcement services or the use of law enforcement equipment or the interchange of services and equipment among the cooperating law enforcement agencies. Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code, insofar as it applies to the operation of law enforcement agencies, shall apply to the cooperating political subdivisions and to the law enforcement agency employees when they are rendering services pursuant to this paragraph outside the territory of the political subdivision by which they are employed. Law enforcement agency employees rendering services outside the territory of the political subdivision in which they are employed, pursuant to this paragraph, shall be entitled to participate in any indemnity fund established by their employer to the same extent as if they were rendering service within the territory of their employing political subdivision. Those law enforcement agency employees also shall be entitled to all the rights and benefits of Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code to the same extent as if rendering services within the territory of their employing political subdivision. The information in any missing child report made to a law enforcement agency shall be made available, upon request, to law enforcement personnel of this state, other states, and the federal government when the law enforcement personnel indicate that the request is to aid in identifying or locating a missing child or the possible identification of a deceased minor who, upon discovery, cannot be identified. (G) When a missing child has not been located within thirty days after the date on which the missing child report pertaining to the child was filed with a law enforcement agency, that law enforcement agency shall request the missing child's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or legal custodian, or any other person responsible for the care of the missing child, to provide written consent for the law enforcement agency to contact the missing child's dentist and request the missing child's dental records. Upon receipt of such written consent, the dentist shall release a copy of the missing child's dental records to the law enforcement agency and shall provide and encode the records in such form as requested by the law enforcement agency. The law enforcement agency then shall integrate information in the records into the national crime information center computer in order to compare the records to those of unidentified deceased persons. This division does not prevent a law enforcement agency from seeking consent to obtain copies of a missing child's dental records, or prevent a missing child's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or legal custodian, or any other person responsible for the care of the missing child, from granting consent for the release of copies of the missing child's dental records to a law enforcement agency, at any time. (H) A missing child's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or legal custodian, or any other persons responsible for the care of a missing child, immediately shall notify the law enforcement agency with which they filed the missing child report whenever the child has returned to their home or to their care, custody, and control, has been released if the missing child was the victim of an offense listed in division (A)(3)(b) of this section, or otherwise has been located. Upon such notification or upon otherwise learning that a missing child has returned to the home of, or to the care, custody, and control of the missing child's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or other person responsible for the missing child's care, has been released if the missing child was the victim of an offense listed in division (A)(3)(b) of this section, or otherwise has been located, the law enforcement agency involved promptly shall integrate the fact that the minor no longer is a missing child into the national crime information center computer and shall inform any school that was notified under division (D) of this section that the minor is no longer a missing child. Sec. 3101.041. In determining whether to file the consent under section 3101.04 of the Revised Code, the juvenile court shall do all of the following: (A) Consult with any of the following for each party to the intended marriage who is seventeen years of age: (1) A parent; (2) A surviving parent; (3) A parent who is the designated the residential parent and legal custodian by a court of competent jurisdiction; (4) A guardian; (5) Either of the following who has been awarded permanent custody by a court exercising juvenile jurisdiction: (a) An adult person; (b) The department of children and youth or any child welfare organization certified by the department. (B) Appoint an attorney as guardian ad litem for each party to the intended marriage who is seventeen years of age; (C) Determine all of the following: (1) Each party to the intended marriage who is seventeen years of age has entered the armed services of the United States, has become employed and self-subsisting, or has otherwise become independent from the care and control of the party's parent, guardian, or custodian. (2) For each party to the intended marriage who is seventeen years of age, the decision of that party to marry is free from force or coercion. (3) The intended marriage and the emancipation under section 3101.042 of the Revised Code is in the best interests of each party to the intended marriage who is seventeen years of age. Sec. 3105.011. (A) The court of common pleas including divisions of courts of domestic relations, has full equitable powers and jurisdiction appropriate to the determination of all domestic relations matters. This section is not a determination by the general assembly that such equitable powers and jurisdiction do not exist with respect to any such matter. (B) For purposes of this section, "domestic relations matters" means both of the following: (1) Any matter committed to the jurisdiction of the division of domestic relations of common pleas courts under section 2301.03 of the Revised Code, as well as a complaint for child support and allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities, including the enforcement and modification of such orders; (2) Actions and proceedings under Chapters 3105., 3109., 3111., 3113., 3115., 3119., 3121., 3123., 3125., and 3127. of the Revised Code, actions pursuant to section 2151.231 of the Revised Code, all actions removed from the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to section 2151.233 of the Revised Code, and all matters transferred by the juvenile court pursuant to section 2151.235 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3105.21. (A) Upon satisfactory proof of the causes in the complaint for granting a divorce, annulment, dissolution of marriage, or legal separation, the court of common pleas shall make an order for the disposition, care, and maintenance of the children of the marriage, as is in their best interests, and in accordance with section sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code. (B) Upon the failure of proof of the causes in the complaint, the court may make the order for the disposition, care, and maintenance of any dependent child of the marriage as is in the child's best interest, and in accordance with section sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code. (C) Any court of common pleas that makes or modifies an order for child support under this section shall comply with Chapters 3119., 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code. If any person required to pay child support under an order made under this section on or after April 15, 1985, or modified on or after December 1, 1986, is found in contempt of court for failure to make support payments under the order, the court that makes the finding, in addition to any other penalty or remedy imposed, shall assess all court costs arising out of the contempt proceeding against the person and require the person to pay any reasonable attorney's fees of any adverse party, as determined by the court, that arose in relation to the act of contempt. Sec. 3105.63. (A)(1) A petition for dissolution of marriage shall be signed by both spouses and shall have attached and incorporated a separation agreement agreed to by both spouses. The separation agreement shall provide for a division of all property; spousal support; if there are minor children of the marriage, the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the minor children, the designation of a residential parent and legal custodian of the minor children, child support, and parenting time rights; and, if the spouses so desire, an authorization for the court to modify the amount or terms of spousal support, or the division of property, provided in the separation agreement. If there are minor children of the marriage, the spouses may shall address the allocation of the parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the minor children by including in attaching a parenting plan to the separation agreement a plan under which both parents will have shared rights and share parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the minor children. The spouses shall file the plan with the petition for dissolution of marriage and shall include in the plan the provisions described in division (G) of section 3109.04 3109.044 of the Revised Code. (2) The division of property in the separation agreement shall include any participant account, as defined in section 148.01 of the Revised Code, of either of the spouses, to the extent of the following: (a) The moneys that have been deferred by a continuing member or participating employee, as defined in that section, and that have been transmitted to the public employees retirement board during the marriage and any income that is derived from the investment of those moneys during the marriage; (b) The moneys that have been deferred by an officer or employee of a municipal corporation and that have been transmitted to the governing board, administrator, depository, or trustee of the deferred compensation program of the municipal corporation during the marriage and any income that is derived from the investment of those moneys during the marriage; (c) The moneys that have been deferred by an officer or employee of a government unit, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code, and that have been transmitted to the governing board, as defined in that section, during the marriage and any income that is derived from the investment of those moneys during the marriage. (3) The separation agreement shall not require or permit the division or disbursement of the moneys and income described in division (A)(2) of this section to occur in a manner that is inconsistent with the law, rules, or plan governing the deferred compensation program involved or prior to the time that the spouse in whose name the participant account is maintained commences receipt of the moneys and income credited to the account in accordance with that law, rules, and plan. (B) An amended separation agreement may be filed at any time prior to or during the hearing on the petition for dissolution of marriage. Upon receipt of a petition for dissolution of marriage, the court may cause an investigation to be made pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure. (C)(1) If a petition for dissolution of marriage contains an authorization for the court to modify the amount or terms of spousal support provided in the separation agreement, the modification shall be in accordance with section 3105.18 of the Revised Code. (2) If a petition for dissolution of marriage contains an authorization for the court to modify the division of property provided in the separation agreement, the modification shall be made with the express written consent or agreement of both spouses. Sec. 3105.65. (A) If, at the time of the hearing, either spouse is not satisfied with the separation agreement or does not wish a dissolution of the marriage and if neither spouse files a motion pursuant to division (C) of this section to convert the action to an action for divorce, the court shall dismiss the petition and refuse to validate the proposed separation agreement. (B) If, upon review of the testimony of both spouses and of the report of the investigator pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure, the court approves the separation agreement and any amendments to it agreed upon by the parties, it shall grant a decree of dissolution of marriage that incorporates the separation agreement. If the separation agreement contains a plan for the exercise of shared a parenting by the spousesplan, the court shall review the plan in accordance with the provisions of division (D)(1) of section 3109.04 sections 3109.046 and 3109.049 of the Revised Code that govern the review of a pleading or motion requesting shared a parenting plan jointly submitted by both spouses to a marriage. A decree of dissolution of marriage has the same effect upon the property rights of the parties, including rights of dower and inheritance, as a decree of divorce. The court has full power to enforce its decree and retains jurisdiction to modify all matters pertaining to the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the children, to the designation of a residential designated parent and legal custodian of the children, to child support, to parenting time of parents or legal custodians with the children, and to companionship or visitation for persons who are not the children's parents. The court, only in accordance with division (E)(2) of section 3105.18 of the Revised Code, may modify the amount or terms of spousal support. The court may modify the division of property provided in the separation agreement only upon the express written consent or agreement of both spouses. (C) At any time before a decree of dissolution of marriage has been granted under division (B) of this section, either spouse may convert the action for dissolution of marriage into a divorce action by filing a motion with the court in which the action for dissolution of marriage is pending for conversion of the action for dissolution of marriage. The motion shall contain a complaint for divorce that contains grounds for a divorce and that otherwise complies with the Rules of Civil Procedure and this chapter. The divorce action then shall proceed in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure in the same manner as if the motion had been the original complaint in the action, including, but not limited to, the issuance and service of summons pursuant to Civil Rules 4 to 4.6, except that no court fees shall be charged upon conversion of the action for dissolution of marriage into a divorce action under this division. Sec. 3109.03. When husband and wife are living separate and apart from each other, or are divorced, and the question as to the parental rights and issue of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of their children and the place of residence and legal custodian of their children is brought before a court of competent jurisdiction, they shall stand upon an equality as to the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of their children and the place of residence and legal custodian of their children, so far as parenthood is involvedthe best interest of a child shall be paramount. The court shall not give preference to a parent or legal custodian because of that parent's or legal custodian's financial status or gender. Sec. 3109.04. (A) In any divorce, legal separation, or annulment proceeding and in any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child, upon hearing the testimony of either or both parents and considering any mediation report filed pursuant to section 3109.052 of the Revised Code and in accordance with sections 3127.01 to 3127.53 of the Revised Code, the court shall allocate the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the minor children of the marriage. Subject to division (D)(2) of this section, the court may allocate the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children in either of the following ways: (1) If neither parent files a pleading or motion in accordance with division (G) of this section, if at least one parent files a pleading or motion under that division but no parent who filed a pleading or motion under that division also files a plan for shared parenting, or if at least one parent files both a pleading or motion and a shared parenting plan under that division but no plan for shared parenting is in the best interest of the children, the court, in a manner consistent with the best interest of the children, shall allocate the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children primarily to one of the parents, designate that parent as the residential parent and the legal custodian of the child, and divide between the parents the other rights and responsibilities for the care of the children, including, but not limited to, the responsibility to provide support for the children and the right of the parent who is not the residential parent to have continuing contact with the children. (2) If at least one parent files a pleading or motion in accordance with division (G) of this section and a plan for shared parenting pursuant to that division and if a plan for shared parenting is in the best interest of the children and is approved by the court in accordance with division (D)(1) of this section, the court may allocate the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children to both parents and issue a shared parenting order requiring the parents to share all or some of the aspects of the physical and legal care of the children in accordance with the approved plan for shared parenting. If the court issues a shared parenting order under this division and it is necessary for the purpose of receiving public assistance, the court shall designate which one of the parents' residences is to serve as the child's home. The child support obligations of the parents under a shared parenting order issued under this division shall be determined in accordance with Chapters 3119., 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code. (B)(1) When making the allocation of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children under this section in an original proceeding or in any proceeding for modification of a prior order of the court making the allocation, the court shall take into account that which would be in the best interest of the children. In determining the child's best interest for purposes of making its allocation of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and for purposes of resolving any issues related to the making of that allocation, the court, in its discretion, may and, upon the request of either party, shall interview in chambers any or all of the involved children regarding their wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation. (2) If the court interviews any child pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, all of the following apply: (a) The court, in its discretion, may and, upon the motion of either parent, shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child. (b) The court first shall determine the reasoning ability of the child. If the court determines that the child does not have sufficient reasoning ability to express the child's wishes and concern with respect to the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child, it shall not determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation. If the court determines that the child has sufficient reasoning ability to express the child's wishes or concerns with respect to the allocation, it then shall determine whether, because of special circumstances, it would not be in the best interest of the child to determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation. If the court determines that, because of special circumstances, it would not be in the best interest of the child to determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation, it shall not determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation and shall enter its written findings of fact and opinion in the journal. If the court determines that it would be in the best interests of the child to determine the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation, it shall proceed to make that determination. (c) The interview shall be conducted in chambers, and no person other than the child, the child's attorney, the judge, any necessary court personnel, and, in the judge's discretion, the attorney of each parent shall be permitted to be present in the chambers during the interview. (3) No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain from a child a written or recorded statement or affidavit setting forth the child's wishes and concerns regarding the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities concerning the child. No court, in determining the child's best interest for purposes of making its allocation of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child or for purposes of resolving any issues related to the making of that allocation, shall accept or consider a written or recorded statement or affidavit that purports to set forth the child's wishes and concerns regarding those matters. (C) Prior to trial, the court may cause an investigation to be made as to the character, family relations, past conduct, earning ability, and financial worth of each parent and may order the parents and their minor children to submit to medical, psychological, and psychiatric examinations. The report of the investigation and examinations shall be made available to either parent or the parent's counsel of record not less than five days before trial, upon written request. The report shall be signed by the investigator, and the investigator shall be subject to cross-examination by either parent concerning the contents of the report. The court may tax as costs all or any part of the expenses for each investigation. If the court determines that either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being a neglected child, that either parent previously has been determined to be the perpetrator of the neglectful act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is a neglected child, or that there is reason to believe that either parent has acted in a manner resulting in a child being a neglected child, the court shall consider that fact against naming that parent the residential parent and against granting a shared parenting decree. When the court allocates parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children or determines whether to grant shared parenting in any proceeding, it shall consider whether either parent or any member of the household of either parent has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code or a sexually oriented offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any sexually oriented offense or other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child. If the court determines that either parent has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code or a sexually oriented offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any sexually oriented offense or other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child, it may designate that parent as the residential parent and may issue a shared parenting decree or order only if it determines that it is in the best interest of the child to name that parent the residential parent or to issue a shared parenting decree or order and it makes specific written findings of fact to support its determination. (D)(1)(a) Upon the filing of a pleading or motion by either parent or both parents, in accordance with division (G) of this section, requesting shared parenting and the filing of a shared parenting plan in accordance with that division, the court shall comply with division (D)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section, whichever is applicable: (i) If both parents jointly make the request in their pleadings or jointly file the motion and also jointly file the plan, the court shall review the parents' plan to determine if it is in the best interest of the children. If the court determines that the plan is in the best interest of the children, the court shall approve it. If the court determines that the plan or any part of the plan is not in the best interest of the children, the court shall require the parents to make appropriate changes to the plan to meet the court's objections to it. If changes to the plan are made to meet the court's objections, and if the new plan is in the best interest of the children, the court shall approve the plan. If changes to the plan are not made to meet the court's objections, or if the parents attempt to make changes to the plan to meet the court's objections, but the court determines that the new plan or any part of the new plan still is not in the best interest of the children, the court may reject the portion of the parents' pleadings or deny their motion requesting shared parenting of the children and proceed as if the request in the pleadings or the motion had not been made. The court shall not approve a plan under this division unless it determines that the plan is in the best interest of the children. (ii) If each parent makes a request in the parent's pleadings or files a motion and each also files a separate plan, the court shall review each plan filed to determine if either is in the best interest of the children. If the court determines that one of the filed plans is in the best interest of the children, the court may approve the plan. If the court determines that neither filed plan is in the best interest of the children, the court may order each parent to submit appropriate changes to the parent's plan or both of the filed plans to meet the court's objections, or may select one of the filed plans and order each parent to submit appropriate changes to the selected plan to meet the court's objections. If changes to the plan or plans are submitted to meet the court's objections, and if any of the filed plans with the changes is in the best interest of the children, the court may approve the plan with the changes. If changes to the plan or plans are not submitted to meet the court's objections, or if the parents submit changes to the plan or plans to meet the court's objections but the court determines that none of the filed plans with the submitted changes is in the best interest of the children, the court may reject the portion of the parents' pleadings or deny their motions requesting shared parenting of the children and proceed as if the requests in the pleadings or the motions had not been made. If the court approves a plan under this division, either as originally filed or with submitted changes, or if the court rejects the portion of the parents' pleadings or denies their motions requesting shared parenting under this division and proceeds as if the requests in the pleadings or the motions had not been made, the court shall enter in the record of the case findings of fact and conclusions of law as to the reasons for the approval or the rejection or denial. Division (D)(1)(b) of this section applies in relation to the approval or disapproval of a plan under this division. (iii) If each parent makes a request in the parent's pleadings or files a motion but only one parent files a plan, or if only one parent makes a request in the parent's pleadings or files a motion and also files a plan, the court in the best interest of the children may order the other parent to file a plan for shared parenting in accordance with division (G) of this section. The court shall review each plan filed to determine if any plan is in the best interest of the children. If the court determines that one of the filed plans is in the best interest of the children, the court may approve the plan. If the court determines that no filed plan is in the best interest of the children, the court may order each parent to submit appropriate changes to the parent's plan or both of the filed plans to meet the court's objections or may select one filed plan and order each parent to submit appropriate changes to the selected plan to meet the court's objections. If changes to the plan or plans are submitted to meet the court's objections, and if any of the filed plans with the changes is in the best interest of the children, the court may approve the plan with the changes. If changes to the plan or plans are not submitted to meet the court's objections, or if the parents submit changes to the plan or plans to meet the court's objections but the court determines that none of the filed plans with the submitted changes is in the best interest of the children, the court may reject the portion of the parents' pleadings or deny the parents' motion or reject the portion of the parents' pleadings or deny their motions requesting shared parenting of the children and proceed as if the request or requests or the motion or motions had not been made. If the court approves a plan under this division, either as originally filed or with submitted changes, or if the court rejects the portion of the pleadings or denies the motion or motions requesting shared parenting under this division and proceeds as if the request or requests or the motion or motions had not been made, the court shall enter in the record of the case findings of fact and conclusions of law as to the reasons for the approval or the rejection or denial. Division (D)(1)(b) of this section applies in relation to the approval or disapproval of a plan under this division. (b) The approval of a plan under division (D)(1)(a)(ii) or (iii) of this section is discretionary with the court. The court shall not approve more than one plan under either division and shall not approve a plan under either division unless it determines that the plan is in the best interest of the children. If the court, under either division, does not determine that any filed plan or any filed plan with submitted changes is in the best interest of the children, the court shall not approve any plan. (c) Whenever possible, the court shall require that a shared parenting plan approved under division (D)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section ensure the opportunity for both parents to have frequent and continuing contact with the child, unless frequent and continuing contact with any parent would not be in the best interest of the child. (d) If a court approves a shared parenting plan under division (D)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section, the approved plan shall be incorporated into a final shared parenting decree granting the parents the shared parenting of the children. Any final shared parenting decree shall be issued at the same time as and shall be appended to the final decree of dissolution, divorce, annulment, or legal separation arising out of the action out of which the question of the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children arose. No provisional shared parenting decree shall be issued in relation to any shared parenting plan approved under division (D)(1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section. A final shared parenting decree issued under this division has immediate effect as a final decree on the date of its issuance, subject to modification or termination as authorized by this section. (2) If the court finds, with respect to any child under eighteen years of age, that it is in the best interest of the child for neither parent to be designated the residential parent and legal custodian of the child, it may commit the child to a relative of the child or certify a copy of its findings, together with as much of the record and the further information, in narrative form or otherwise, that it considers necessary or as the juvenile court requests, to the juvenile court for further proceedings, and, upon the certification, the juvenile court has exclusive jurisdiction. (E)(1)(a) The court shall not modify a prior decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children unless it finds, based on facts that have arisen since the prior decree or that were unknown to the court at the time of the prior decree, that a change has occurred in the circumstances of the child, the child's residential parent, or either of the parents subject to a shared parenting decree, and that the modification is necessary to serve the best interest of the child. In applying these standards, the court shall retain the residential parent designated by the prior decree or the prior shared parenting decree, unless a modification is in the best interest of the child and one of the following applies: (i) The residential parent agrees to a change in the residential parent or both parents under a shared parenting decree agree to a change in the designation of residential parent. (ii) The child, with the consent of the residential parent or of both parents under a shared parenting decree, has been integrated into the family of the person seeking to become the residential parent. (iii) The harm likely to be caused by a change of environment is outweighed by the advantages of the change of environment to the child. (b) One or both of the parents under a prior decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children that is not a shared parenting decree may file a motion requesting that the prior decree be modified to give both parents shared rights and responsibilities for the care of the children. The motion shall include both a request for modification of the prior decree and a request for a shared parenting order that complies with division (G) of this section. Upon the filing of the motion, if the court determines that a modification of the prior decree is authorized under division (E)(1)(a) of this section, the court may modify the prior decree to grant a shared parenting order, provided that the court shall not modify the prior decree to grant a shared parenting order unless the court complies with divisions (A) and (D)(1) of this section and, in accordance with those divisions, approves the submitted shared parenting plan and determines that shared parenting would be in the best interest of the children. (2) In addition to a modification authorized under division (E)(1) of this section: (a) Both parents under a shared parenting decree jointly may modify the terms of the plan for shared parenting approved by the court and incorporated by it into the shared parenting decree. Modifications under this division may be made at any time. The modifications to the plan shall be filed jointly by both parents with the court, and the court shall include them in the plan, unless they are not in the best interest of the children. If the modifications are not in the best interests of the children, the court, in its discretion, may reject the modifications or make modifications to the proposed modifications or the plan that are in the best interest of the children. Modifications jointly submitted by both parents under a shared parenting decree shall be effective, either as originally filed or as modified by the court, upon their inclusion by the court in the plan. Modifications to the plan made by the court shall be effective upon their inclusion by the court in the plan. (b) The court may modify the terms of the plan for shared parenting approved by the court and incorporated by it into the shared parenting decree upon its own motion at any time if the court determines that the modifications are in the best interest of the children or upon the request of one or both of the parents under the decree. Modifications under this division may be made at any time. The court shall not make any modification to the plan under this division, unless the modification is in the best interest of the children. (c) The court may terminate a prior final shared parenting decree that includes a shared parenting plan approved under division (D)(1)(a)(i) of this section upon the request of one or both of the parents or whenever it determines that shared parenting is not in the best interest of the children. The court may terminate a prior final shared parenting decree that includes a shared parenting plan approved under division (D)(1)(a)(ii) or (iii) of this section if it determines, upon its own motion or upon the request of one or both parents, that shared parenting is not in the best interest of the children. If modification of the terms of the plan for shared parenting approved by the court and incorporated by it into the final shared parenting decree is attempted under division (E)(2)(a) of this section and the court rejects the modifications, it may terminate the final shared parenting decree if it determines that shared parenting is not in the best interest of the children. (d) Upon the termination of a prior final shared parenting decree under division (E)(2)(c) of this section, the court shall proceed and issue a modified decree for the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children under the standards applicable under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section as if no decree for shared parenting had been granted and as if no request for shared parenting ever had been made. (F)(1) In determining the best interest of a child pursuant to this section, whether on an original decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children or a modification of a decree allocating those rights and responsibilities, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to: (a) The wishes of the child's parents regarding the child's care; (b) If the court has interviewed the child in chambers pursuant to division (B) of this section regarding the child's wishes and concerns as to the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities concerning the child, the wishes and concerns of the child, as expressed to the court; (c) The child's interaction and interrelationship with the child's parents, siblings, and any other person who may significantly affect the child's best interest; (d) The child's adjustment to the child's home, school, and community; (e) The mental and physical health of all persons involved in the situation; (f) The parent more likely to honor and facilitate court-approved parenting time rights or visitation and companionship rights; (g) Whether either parent has failed to make all child support payments, including all arrearages, that are required of that parent pursuant to a child support order under which that parent is an obligor; (h) Whether either parent or any member of the household of either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; whether either parent, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, previously has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that is the basis of an adjudication; whether either parent or any member of the household of either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code or a sexually oriented offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the current proceeding; whether either parent or any member of the household of either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the current proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense; and whether there is reason to believe that either parent has acted in a manner resulting in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; (i) Whether the residential parent or one of the parents subject to a shared parenting decree has continuously and willfully denied the other parent's right to parenting time in accordance with an order of the court; (j) Whether either parent has established a residence, or is planning to establish a residence, outside this state. (2) In determining whether shared parenting is in the best interest of the children, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the factors enumerated in division (F)(1) of this section, the factors enumerated in section 3119.23 of the Revised Code, and all of the following factors: (a) The ability of the parents to cooperate and make decisions jointly, with respect to the children; (b) The ability of each parent to encourage the sharing of love, affection, and contact between the child and the other parent; (c) Any history of, or potential for, child abuse, spouse abuse, other domestic violence, or parental kidnapping by either parent; (d) The geographic proximity of the parents to each other, as the proximity relates to the practical considerations of shared parenting; (e) The recommendation of the guardian ad litem of the child, if the child has a guardian ad litem. (3) When allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children, the court shall not give preference to a parent because of that parent's financial status or condition. (G) Either parent or both parents of any children may file a pleading or motion with the court requesting the court to grant both parents shared parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children in a proceeding held pursuant to division (A) of this section. If a pleading or motion requesting shared parenting is filed, the parent or parents filing the pleading or motion also shall file with the court a plan for the exercise of shared parenting by both parents. If each parent files a pleading or motion requesting shared parenting but only one parent files a plan or if only one parent files a pleading or motion requesting shared parenting and also files a plan, the other parent as ordered by the court shall file with the court a plan for the exercise of shared parenting by both parents. The plan for shared parenting shall be filed with the petition for dissolution of marriage, if the question of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children arises out of an action for dissolution of marriage, or, in other cases, at a time at least thirty days prior to the hearing on the issue of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the children. A plan for shared parenting shall include provisions covering all factors that are relevant to the care of the children, including, but not limited to, provisions covering factors such as physical living arrangements, child support obligations, provision for the children's medical and dental care, school placement, and the parent with which the children will be physically located during legal holidays, school holidays, and other days of special importance. (H) If an appeal is taken from a decision of a court that grants or modifies a decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children, the court of appeals shall give the case calendar priority and handle it expeditiously. (I)(1) Upon receipt of an order for active military service in the uniformed services, a parent who is subject to an order allocating parental rights and responsibilities or in relation to whom an action to allocate parental rights and responsibilities is pending and who is ordered for active military service shall notify the other parent who is subject to the order or in relation to whom the case is pending of the order for active military service within three days of receiving the military service order. (2) On receipt of the notice described in division (I)(1) of this section, either parent may apply to the court for a hearing to expedite an allocation or modification proceeding so that the court can issue an order before the parent's active military service begins. The application shall include the date on which the active military service begins. The court shall schedule a hearing upon receipt of the application and hold the hearing not later than thirty days after receipt of the application, except that the court shall give the case calendar priority and handle the case expeditiously if exigent circumstances exist in the case. The court shall not modify a prior decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities unless the court determines that there has been a change in circumstances of the child, the child's residential parent, or either of the parents subject to a shared parenting decree, and that modification is necessary to serve the best interest of the child. The court shall not find past, present, or possible future active military service in the uniformed services to constitute a change in circumstances justifying modification of a prior decree pursuant to division (E) of this section. The court shall make specific written findings of fact to support any modification under this division. (3) Nothing in division (I) of this section shall prevent a court from issuing a temporary order allocating or modifying parental rights and responsibilities for the duration of the parent's active military service. A temporary order shall specify whether the parent's active military service is the basis of the order and shall provide for termination of the temporary order and resumption of the prior order within ten days after receipt of notice pursuant to division (I)(5) of this section, unless the other parent demonstrates that resumption of the prior order is not in the child's best interest. (4) At the request of a parent who is ordered for active military service in the uniformed services and who is a subject of a proceeding pertaining to a temporary order for the allocation or modification of parental rights and responsibilities, the court shall permit the parent to participate in the proceeding and present evidence by electronic means, including communication by telephone, video, or internet to the extent permitted by the rules of the supreme court of Ohio. (5) A parent who is ordered for active military service in the uniformed services and who is a subject of a proceeding pertaining to the allocation or modification of parental rights and responsibilities shall provide written notice to the court, child support enforcement agency, and the other parent of the date of termination of the parent's active military service not later than thirty days after the date on which the service ends. (J) As used in this section chapter: (1) "Abused child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.031 of the Revised Code. (2) "Active military service" means service by a member of the uniformed services in compliance with military orders to report for combat operations, contingency operations, peacekeeping operations, a remote tour of duty, or other active service for which the member is required to report unaccompanied by any family member, including any period of illness, recovery from injury, leave, or other lawful absence during that operation, duty, or service. (3) (2) "Child education" means education for a child to learn information, skills, and techniques for adjusting positively to parents living apart or terminating their relationship. (3) "Companionship or visitation" means the time that a relative, person who has served as a kinship caregiver, or other person is responsible for the child under a companionship or visitation order. (4) "Co-parent coaching" means a process of personalized inquiry and feedback that guides separated parents to take responsibility for reducing conflict; create effective plans for communication and decision-making; and foster a caring, stable, and supportive environment for children. (5) "Counseling" means treatment with a mental health professional or community program providing mental health, substance abuse, or other supportive services. (6) "Dispute resolution" means any process in which a neutral professional facilitates communication and negotiation between parties to assist them in reaching a voluntary agreement regarding their dispute, including arbitration as prescribed in Chapter 2711. of the Revised Code, co-parent coaching, mediation, neutral evaluation, and parenting coordination. (7) "Evaluator" means a person appointed or designated by the court to conduct inquiries or make recommendations regarding issues relating to the allocation of parenting responsibilities. (8) "Guardian ad litem" means a person appointed to assist a court in its determination of the best interest of a child. (9) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 of the Revised Code. (10) "Legal custodian" means a person vested with legal custody of a child by law or awarded by a court of competent jurisdiction. (11) "Legal custody" means a legal status that vests in a person the right to have physical care and control of the child and to exercise parenting responsibilities as defined in this section and as authorized by any other section of the Revised Code or by the court. (12) "Mediation" means any process in which a mediator facilitates communication and negotiation between parties to assist them in reaching a voluntary agreement regarding their dispute. (13) "Mediator" means a person with special skills and training in mediation and who meets the qualifications adopted by the Supreme Court of Ohio, and by a court of common pleas pursuant to the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio. (14) "Neglected child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.03 of the Revised Code. (4) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (5) (15) "Neutral evaluation" means a process in which the parties to a dispute present their claims or defenses and describe the principal evidence on which their claims or defenses are based to two neutral third parties who then share impressions about the strengths and weaknesses of each matter. (16) "Parent" means a person who is determined to be any of the following: (a) A child's mother through the following: (i) Proof of her having given birth to the child; (ii) Pursuant to sections 3111.01 to 3111.18 or 3111.20 to 3111.85 of the Revised Code; (iii) Proof of adoption or pursuant to Chapter 3107. of the Revised Code. (b) A child's father through the following: (i) An acknowledgement of paternity under sections 3111.20 to 3111.35 of the Revised Code; (ii) Pursuant to sections 3111.01 to 3111.18 or 3111.38 to 3111.54 of the Revised Code; (iii) Proof of adoption or pursuant to Chapter 3107. of the Revised Code. (17) "Parenting coordination" means a child-focused dispute resolution process ordered by a court to assist parties in implementing a parenting plan or companionship or visitation using assessment, education, case management, conflict management, coaching, or decision-making. (18) "Parent education" means education for parents and legal custodians living apart or terminating their relationship to learn information and skills to minimize potential negative effects on children, promote positive adjustment during the process, and teach parents and legal custodians how to parent cooperatively. (19) "Parenting plan" means a plan to allocate the parenting responsibilities of parents or a legal custodian that meets the requirements of section 3109.044 of the Revised Code. (20) "Parenting responsibilities" include all parental rights recognized by the United States Constitution and the Ohio Constitution and all of the following: (a) Providing for the physical and emotional safety and well-being of a child, including physical living arrangements; (b) Establishing and maintaining a loving, stable, consistent, and nurturing relationship with a child; (c) Providing for the health care needs of a child; (d) Providing for the educational needs of a child; (e) Providing for the financial needs of a child; (f) Attending to the needs of a child for discipline, daily personal care, supervision, and activities; (g) Assisting a child in developing interpersonal relationships; (h) Exercising judgment regarding a child's welfare consistent with a child's developmental stage or special needs; (i) Making decisions and performing other duties relating to the welfare of a child; (j) Exercising parenting time. (21) "Parenting time" means the time that a parent or legal custodian is responsible for the child under a parenting plan or court order."Uniformed services" means the United States armed forces, the army national guard, and the air national guard or any reserve component thereof, or the commissioned corps of the United States public health service. (K) As used in the Revised Code, "shared parenting" means that the parents share, in the manner set forth in the plan for shared parenting that is approved by the court under division (D)(1) and described in division (L)(6) of this section, all or some of the aspects of physical and legal care of their children. (L) (22) "Proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities" includes a divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, annulment, or any other related proceeding involving a child. (B) For purposes of the Revised Code:, "designated parent and legal custodian" means a parent or legal custodian designated for any of the purposes listed under divisions (B)(1) to (5) of section 3109.044 of the Revised Code under a court order allocating parenting responsibilities. (1) A parent who is granted the care, custody, and control of a child under an order that was issued pursuant to this section prior to April 11, 1991, and that does not provide for shared parenting has "custody of the child" and "care, custody, and control of the child" under the order, and is the "residential parent," the "residential parent and legal custodian," or the "custodial parent" of the child under the order. (2) A parent who primarily is allocated the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child and who is designated as the residential parent and legal custodian of the child under an order that is issued pursuant to this section on or after April 11, 1991, and that does not provide for shared parenting has "custody of the child" and "care, custody, and control of the child" under the order, and is the "residential parent," the "residential parent and legal custodian," or the "custodial parent" of the child under the order. (3) A parent who is not granted custody of a child under an order that was issued pursuant to this section prior to April 11, 1991, and that does not provide for shared parenting is the "parent who is not the residential parent," the "parent who is not the residential parent and legal custodian," or the "noncustodial parent" of the child under the order. (4) A parent who is not primarily allocated the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child and who is not designated as the residential parent and legal custodian of the child under an order that is issued pursuant to this section on or after April 11, 1991, and that does not provide for shared parenting is the "parent who is not the residential parent," the "parent who is not the residential parent and legal custodian," or the "noncustodial parent" of the child under the order. (5) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, if an order is issued by a court pursuant to this section and the order provides for shared parenting of a child, both parents have "custody of the child" or "care, custody, and control of the child" under the order, to the extent and in the manner specified in the order. (6) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise and except as otherwise provided in the order, if an order is issued by a court pursuant to this section and the order provides for shared parenting of a child, each parent, regardless of where the child is physically located or with whom the child is residing at a particular point in time, as specified in the order, is the "residential parent," the "residential parent and legal custodian," or the "custodial parent" of the child. (7) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise and except as otherwise provided in the order, a designation in the order of a parent as the residential parent for the purpose of determining the school the child attends, as the custodial parent for purposes of claiming the child as a dependent pursuant to section 152(e) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 1, as amended, or as the residential parent for purposes of receiving public assistance pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section, does not affect the designation pursuant to division (L)(6) of this section of each parent as the "residential parent," the "residential parent and legal custodian," or the "custodial parent" of the child. (M) The court shall require each parent of a child to file an affidavit attesting as to whether the parent, and the members of the parent's household, have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the offenses identified in divisions (C) and (F)(1)(h) of this section. Sec. 3109.041. (A) A court shall allocate parenting responsibilities in any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities. (B) A final decree in a proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities shall include an allocation of those responsibilities. Sec. 3109.042. Allocation of parenting responsibilities shall be based on a parenting plan approved or issued by the court. The allocation of parenting responsibilities in a parenting plan does not abrogate parental rights recognized by the United States Constitution or Ohio Constitution. Sec. 3109.044. The purpose of a parenting plan is to allocate all parenting responsibilities to parents or legal custodians. The plan shall seek to ensure that parents or legal custodians share in the responsibilities of raising a child, enable a child to enjoy a meaningful relationship with both parents or legal custodians, and maximize parenting time with each parent when it is in the best interest of the child. A parenting plan shall include all of the following: (A) Provisions regarding each child's needs that are consistent with the child's age, developmental stage, maturation, and special needs; (B) The designation of a parent or legal custodian as the designated parent and legal custodian for the following purposes: (1) Paying and receiving child support and cash medical support pursuant to a worksheet created under section 3119.022 of the Revised Code; (2) Determining the school district of attendance; (3) Providing health care coverage; (4) Claiming the child as a dependent for income tax purposes; (5) For any other purpose requiring designation of one parent or legal custodian, including public assistance, international treaty enforcement, or state or federal law. (C) The parenting time schedule for weekdays, weekends, holidays, days that hold special meaning to the child, parents, or legal custodian, vacations, and other times; (D) The frequency, time, and method of the child's communication with a parent or legal custodian during the parenting time; (E) The allocation of decision-making and other responsibilities related to the welfare of the child, including education, child care, health care, and school and extra-curricular activities; (F) The procedure for parenting time, including the meeting location and the person responsible for transportation; (G) The frequency and method for the parents or legal custodians to communicate with each other about the child; (H) The process of information sharing and right to access the child's school records, health records, records of the childcare facilities, and school and extra-curricular activities; (I) Any geographical restriction on relocation of the child and notification procedure prior to the relocation of the child pursuant to sections 3109.0470 to 3109.0479 of the Revised Code; (J) Each parent's or legal custodian's responsibility for the child's financial support, consistent with section 3109.05 and Chapter 3119. of the Revised Code; (K) Procedures for the parents or legal custodians to resolve disputes through nonadversarial dispute resolution processes; (L) Each parent's or legal custodian's responsibility to provide written notification to the other parent or legal custodian and the court of a change of contact information, including street address, mailing address, email address, or telephone number in compliance with section 3109.0473 of the Revised Code; (M) Any other provisions required by statute or the court. Sec. 3109.045. A parenting plan that meets the requirements of section 3109.044 of the Revised Code shall be filed not later than thirty days before a hearing to determine the allocation of parenting responsibilities, except that the court may waive the thirty-day deadline for good cause shown. A parent or legal custodian may file a separate parenting plan or the parents and legal custodians may file a joint parenting plan. Sec. 3109.046. If the parents or legal custodians file a joint parenting plan and the court finds that the provisions of the joint parenting plan are in the best interest of the child, the court shall approve the joint parenting plan. If the court finds that the joint parenting plan is not in the best interest of the child, the court shall provide written findings of fact to support its finding and either allow the parents or legal custodians to make appropriate changes to resolve the court's objections or issue its own parenting plan. If a joint parenting plan includes a provision for substantially equal parenting time, the court may deny the request if the court determines that substantially equal parenting time is not in the best interest of the child, endangers the safety of the parties, or for other good cause shown and provides written findings of fact to support the determination. Sec. 3109.047. If the parents or legal custodian file one or more separate parenting plans, the court shall review each plan to determine whether the plan is in the best interest of the child. If the court finds that one of the separate parenting plans is in the best interest of the child, the court shall approve that plan and, if applicable, provide written findings of fact to support its finding that another separate parenting plan is not in the best interest of the child. If the court finds that none of the parenting plans is in the best interest of the child, the court shall provide written findings of fact to support its finding and either allow the parents or legal custodian to make appropriate changes to resolve the court's objections or issue its own parenting plan. If a parenting plan includes a provision for substantially equal parenting time, the court may deny the request if the court determines that substantially equal parenting time is not in the best interest of the child, endangers the safety of the parties, or for other good cause shown and provides written findings of fact to support the determination. Sec. 3109.048. If no parent or legal custodian files a parenting plan, the court shall issue its own parenting plan. Sec. 3109.049. In allocating or approving parenting responsibilities in a parenting plan, the court shall ensure that the plan meets all of the requirements of section 3109.044 of the Revised Code and that it is in the best interest of the child pursuant to section 3109.0430 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.0410. The court shall not approve or issue more than one parenting plan to be in effect at a time. Sec. 3109.0411. In allocating or approving parenting responsibilities in a parenting plan, the court shall not draw any presumptions from a temporary parenting order. Sec. 3109.0412. The court shall have complete discretion over the approval of a parenting plan. Sec. 3109.0414. (A) Upon the court's determination that no parent is found suitable to be allocated parenting responsibilities under a parenting plan in accordance with section 3109.0416 of the Revised Code, the court may designate a relative or kinship caregiver as the legal custodian of the child or certify the matter to the juvenile court. (B) Any designation of a relative or kinship caregiver as the legal custodian of the child shall be in the child's best interest pursuant to section 3109.0430 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.0415. (A) Upon the certification under section 3109.0414 of the Revised Code, the juvenile court has exclusive jurisdiction over the establishment and issuance of a decree that incorporates a parenting plan. (B) The juvenile court shall establish and issue decrees that incorporate parenting plans in accordance with sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.0416. A court may find a parent to be not suitable under section 3109.0414 of the Revised Code only if the preponderance of the evidence demonstrates any of the following: (A) The parent abandoned the child. (B) The parent contractually relinquished custody of the child. (C) The parent has become completely incapable of supporting or caring for the child. (D) An award of custody to the parent would be detrimental to the child. Sec. 3109.0417. A legal custodian of a child appointed by a court pursuant to section 3109.0414 of the Revised Code or by a juvenile court if the case has been certified pursuant to section 3109.0415 of the Revised Code may submit a parenting plan under section 3109.045 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.0418. (A) To request a prior parenting plan be modified with a proposed modification agreed to by all parties, the parents or legal custodian shall file both of the following: (1) A motion requesting that the prior parenting plan be modified; (2) The proposed agreed entry. (B) The court may approve the motion and the proposed agreed entry or conduct a hearing on the proposed agreed entry. (C) The court shall not modify a prior parenting plan under this section without finding the modification is in the child's best interest. Sec. 3109.0419. (A) To request a prior parenting plan be modified without a proposed modification agreed to by all parties, one parent or legal custodian shall file a motion requesting that the prior parenting plan be modified. The motion shall set forth all of the following: (1) The specific modification sought; (2) The change of circumstances of the parent, legal custodian, or child; (3) Why the modification is in the best interest of the child. (B) The court shall not modify a prior parenting plan under division (A) of this section without finding all of the following: (1) A finding of a change of circumstances of a parent, legal custodian, or the child. The court may conduct a hearing to determine whether a change of circumstance has occurred since the prior parenting plan was approved; (2) The modification is in the child's best interest; (3) One of the following applies: (a) All parties to the proceeding agree to the modification. (b) The child has been integrated into the family of the parent or legal custodian seeking modification with the consent of the other parent or legal custodian. (c) The advantages of the modification outweigh any harm to the child. Sec. 3109.0420. A court may assess reasonable attorney fees and litigation expenses if it finds that a motion to modify a prior parenting plan was brought in bad faith or the party's actions constituted frivolous conduct as defined in section 2323.51 of the Revised Code or as otherwise provided in the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.0421. Nothing in sections 3109.0418 to 3109.0420 of the Revised Code limits the authority of a child support enforcement agency to review a child support order in accordance with rules adopted under section 3119.76 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.0422. In any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities, when requested by motion, upon satisfactory proof of all relevant information by affidavit duly filed with the clerk of the court, the court, without oral hearing and for good cause shown, may make a temporary order regarding the allocation of parenting responsibilities while the action is pending. Sec. 3109.0423. If the court has issued a temporary order allocating parenting responsibilities, without an oral hearing, a party may file a written request for an oral hearing to modify the order. The court shall conduct an oral hearing not later than twenty-eight days after the filing of the request unless good cause is shown. Sec. 3109.0424. An unmarried female who gives birth to a child is the sole designated parent and legal custodian of the child until a court of competent jurisdiction issues an order allocating parenting responsibilities for the child. Sec. 3109.0425. A court allocating parental responsibilities of a child described under section 3109.0424 of the Revised Code when another person is the designated parent and legal custodian shall consider the best interest of the child as provided in section 3109.0430 of the Revised Code to be paramount. The court shall not give preference to a parent or legal custodian because of that parent or legal custodian's financial status or gender. Sec. 3109.0426. Notwithstanding sections 3109.0424 and 3109.0425 of the Revised Code, an unmarried female who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to rape or sexual battery of the other parent of the child shall not be the designated parent and legal custodian of that child, unless the court determines that special circumstances permit the unmarried mother to be the child's designated parent and legal custodian. Sec. 3109.0428. If an appeal is taken from an order of a court that grants or modifies parenting responsibilities in a parenting plan, the court of appeals shall give the case calendar priority and handle it expeditiously. Sec. 3109.0430. (A) In determining the best interest of a child for purposes of allocating parenting responsibilities, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including: (1) The wishes of the child's parents or legal custodian regarding the child's care; (2) The wishes and concerns of the child; (3) The relative strength, nature, and stability of the child's relationship with each parent or legal custodian and the parent's or legal custodian's interest in the child; (4) The child's interaction and interrelationship with siblings, relatives, and any other persons who may significantly affect the child's best interest; (5) The child's involvement with school, the community, and other significant activities; (6) The emotional, mental, and physical health of all persons involved; (7) The child's age; developmental stage; and emotional, mental, physical, educational, and special needs; (8) The willingness and ability of the parents or legal custodian to communicate effectively with each other and with the child; (9) Any current abuse or history of child abuse, spousal abuse, domestic violence, or parental kidnapping; (10) Whether a parent or legal custodian has knowingly made a false report of child abuse or neglect; (11) Whether a parent or legal custodian, without just cause, has repeatedly failed to be financially responsible for any child as ordered by a court; (12) Whether a parent or legal custodian, without just cause, has repeatedly interfered with the other parent's or legal custodian's court-ordered access to the child; (13) The willingness and ability of a parent or legal custodian to facilitate and encourage parenting time or companionship or visitation and a close and continuing relationship between the other parent or legal custodian and the child; (14) A parent's or legal custodian's past performance and current ability to provide for the daily needs of the child, considering the parent's or legal custodian's employment schedule and the child's school, child care, and activity schedule; (15) The child's physical environment; (16) Whether a parent or legal custodian has established a residence or is planning to establish a residence outside this state; (17) The geographic proximity of a parent or legal custodian; (18) Any recommendation of the child's guardian ad litem; (19) Any parenting coordination decisions; (20) Any mediation agreements; (21) Any report of a court-appointed or designated evaluator or investigator admitted into evidence; (22) Whether a parent or legal custodian has failed to attend court-required parent education pursuant to section 3109.0433 of the Revised Code; (23) The safety of the child and the parents or legal custodian; (24) Whether a parent or legal custodian intentionally misled the court to cause an unnecessary delay, increase the cost of litigation, or induce the court to give preference to that parent or legal custodian regarding decision-making powers or parenting time or companionship or visitation; (25) Whether a parent has unjustifiably failed to comply with the terms of a temporary parenting plan under section 3109.0422 of the Revised Code; a parenting plan under section 3109.046, 3109.047, or 3109.048 of the Revised Code; or any other similar plan or order; (26) Any other relevant factor. (B) The court shall not give preference to a parent or legal custodian on the basis of that parent's or legal custodian's financial circumstances or gender. (C) In determining the best interest of the child, the court shall not consider any one factor to the exclusion of other factors. Sec. 3109.0432. In any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities, the court may order a parent or legal custodian to participate in counseling with a licensed mental health professional or through community programs, including mental health, substance abuse, or other appropriate services. Sec. 3109.0433. (A) In any proceeding pertaining to the original allocation of parenting responsibilities, the court shall order the parents or legal custodian to complete parent education, unless the proceeding involves allegations of abuse or neglect or a dependent, unruly, or delinquent child. (B) In any proceeding pertaining to the modification of parenting responsibilities, the court may order parents or legal custodians to complete additional parent education. Sec. 3109.0434. The court may waive parent education under section 3109.0433 of the Revised Code for good cause shown. Sec. 3109.0435. The court may order any party to deliver a child to attend child education as appropriate to the child's needs. Sec. 3109.0436. The court shall determine the method that the parents or legal custodians shall be notified of parent and child education. Sec. 3109.0439. In any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities, the court may order a parent, legal custodian, or a child to submit to any of the following: (A) The investigation of any relevant circumstances and conditions regarding the allocation of parenting responsibilities, including character, family relations, past conduct, earning ability, and capacity of the parties to meet parenting responsibilities; (B) The evaluation of any relevant circumstances and conditions regarding the allocation of parenting responsibilities, including substance abuse, medical, psychological, or psychiatric interviews, tests, examinations, and assessments; (C) The custody evaluation as described in the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio. Sec. 3109.0440. An investigator or evaluator shall file a written signed report of the investigation or evaluation under section 3109.0439 of the Revised Code in accordance with the rules of the supreme court of Ohio. The court's investigator or evaluator may consult any person who may have relevant information. Sec. 3109.0441. The investigator or evaluator shall be subject to cross-examination by any party with regard to an investigation or evaluation under section 3109.0439 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.0442. The court may apportion costs related to an investigation or evaluation under section 3109.0439 of the Revised Code to the parties. Sec. 3109.0445. (A) In any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities, the court may, and upon request of either party, shall, interview a child regarding the child's wishes and concerns with respect to the allocation of parenting responsibilities. (B) The court shall conduct the interview in chambers or another location designated by the court. Sec. 3109.0446. Before conducting or completing an interview under section 3109.0445 of the Revised Code, the court shall determine both of the following: (A) That the child has sufficient reasoning ability; (B) That there are no special circumstances that would indicate the interview would not be in the best interest of the child. Sec. 3109.0449. (A) The child, attorney for the child, if any, and any court personnel deemed necessary by the court shall be present at an interview under section 3109.0445 of the Revised Code. (B) The court may have the child's guardian ad litem present during the interview. Sec. 3109.0450. If the court interviews a child under section 3109.0445 of the Revised Code, it shall permit a parent or legal custodian to submit written questions to the court that the court may use during the interview. Sec. 3109.0451. If the court interviews a child under section 3109.0445 of the Revised Code, it shall record the interview. Only the court and appellate courts shall have access to the record of the interview. Sec. 3109.0452. No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain a written or recorded statement or affidavit from a child setting forth the wishes and concerns of the child with respect to the allocation of parenting responsibilities in a parenting plan. The court shall not accept or consider a written or recorded statement or affidavit regarding those matters. Sec. 3109.0453. Unless otherwise permitted by law, an attorney representing a parent or legal custodian in a proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities shall not discuss the issue of parenting responsibilities with a child who is the subject of the proceeding. Sec. 3109.0455. In any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities, the court may approve or order a restriction of parenting responsibilities if the court finds, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that such restrictions are reasonably calculated to protect a child from physical, sexual, or emotional abuse, or a parent from domestic violence. Sec. 3109.0456. The court may restrict a parent's or legal custodian's parenting time; right to make decisions; access to a child's records, activities, school, or child care facility; or right to receive a notice of intent to relocate or change of contact information on finding that one or more of the following applies to the parent or legal custodian: (A) Willful neglect, or substantial nonperformance, of parenting responsibilities; (B) Long-term emotional or physical impairment that interferes with parenting responsibilities; (C) Impairment from alcohol, drug, or other substance abuse that interferes with parenting responsibilities; (D) The absence or substantial impairment of ties between the parent or legal custodian and a child; (E) Conduct that creates a danger to the child's psychological, social, cognitive, emotional, or physical development; (F) Denial of access of the other parent or legal custodian to the child for protracted periods of time without justifiable cause; (G) Physical, sexual, or emotional abuse of the child; (H) An act of domestic violence as defined in section 3113.31 of the Revised Code, sexually oriented offense, or an assault which caused serious bodily injury or placed another person in fear of imminent serious physical harm; (I) Knowingly consenting to a child being in the presence of a person who has committed any act that would constitute the commission of any sexually oriented offense, offense of violence, or act that would have resulted in a child being abused or neglected in this state; (J) Any other relevant factor that affects the best interest of a child. Sec. 3109.0457. If the court makes any of the findings described under section 3109.0456 of the Revised Code, the court may impose restrictions on a parent or legal custodian, including the following: (A) Ordering decision-making authority to one parent or legal custodian; (B) Restricting parenting time; (C) Prohibiting overnight parenting time; (D) Ordering the exchange of a child to occur with a neutral party or in a protected setting; (E) Ordering supervised parenting time; (F) Ordering payment of any costs associated with parenting time; (G) Ordering the perpetrator of domestic violence, child abuse, or child neglect to attend and complete, to the satisfaction of the court, a program of intervention for perpetrators of domestic violence, child abuse, or child neglect or other counseling as a condition of contact or parenting time; (H) Ordering abstention from possession or consumption of alcohol, controlled substances, or illegal substances; (I) Requiring a bond; (J) Prohibiting all contact or parenting time with a child, if the court finds other restrictions on parenting time will not adequately protect a child, parent, or legal custodian who is a victim of domestic violence from an unreasonable risk of harm or abuse; (K) Imposing any other condition to provide for the safety of a child, parent, or legal custodian who is a victim of domestic violence. Sec. 3109.0458. The court may approve or issue a parenting plan without any restrictions only if it determines, with specific written findings of fact supporting its determination, that the parenting plan is in the best interest of a child and the court provides protections that adequately protect the safety and well-being of the child, if any of the following apply: (A) A parent, legal custodian, or member of the family or household has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code or a sexually oriented offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding; (B) A parent, legal custodian, or member of the family or household has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense; (C) A parent, legal custodian, or member of the family or household has committed acts that resulted in a child being adjudicated an abused or neglected child, or previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being an abused or neglected child, or there is reason to believe that a parent or legal custodian has acted in a manner resulting in a child being an abused or neglected child. Sec. 3109.0459. The court shall approve or designate a supervisor of parenting time or of companionship or visitation. The supervisor shall adhere strictly to the terms ordered by the court and be willing and able to protect a child from harm. The court shall revoke approval of the supervisor on a finding that the supervisor failed to protect the child, is not able to adhere to the terms ordered by the court, or is no longer willing or able to protect the child. Sec. 3109.0461. In any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities, the court may, or shall if otherwise required by law, appoint a guardian ad litem for the child. Sec. 3109.0462. A guardian ad litem appointed under section 3109.0461 of the Revised Code serves the best interest of a child and owes a duty of candor to the court. Sec. 3109.0463. The guardian ad litem for a child appointed under section 3109.0461 of the Revised Code shall be served with all pleadings and given notice of all hearings and other proceedings in the same manner as service is made, or notice is given, to the parties to the action. Sec. 3109.0465. In any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities, the court may appoint, at its discretion, an attorney for a child. Sec. 3109.0466. An attorney appointment under section 3109.0465 of the Revised Code shall include all of the following: (A) The rate, amount, and method of payment for compensation to the attorney and the determination of the ability of any party to pay the attorney's fees and costs; (B) The allocation of fees payable by each party and any other source of compensation to the attorney; (C) Any reimbursement of fees and costs to be made between the parties or to any other source; (D) The terms and amount of any installment payments; (E) A statement that the court may modify the allocation of fees and costs. Sec. 3109.0467. An attorney for a child appointed under section 3109.0465 of the Revised Code shall be served with all pleadings and given notice of all hearings and other proceedings in the same manner as service is made, or notice is given, to the parties to the action. Sec. 3109.0468. In any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities, an attorney serving as a child's guardian ad litem shall not serve as the child's attorney, unless otherwise permitted by the rules of the supreme court of Ohio. Sec. 3109.0470. A relocation of a party's or child's residence occurs when there is a change of address. Sec. 3109.0471. (A) A relocating party shall file a notice of intent to relocate with the clerk of the court where the order or decree was issued. (B) The clerk shall send a copy of the notice to the last known address of any nonrelocating party. Sec. 3109.0472. A notice of intent to relocate under section 3109.0471 of the Revised Code shall be filed not later than sixty days prior to the date of the intended relocation or not later than ten days after the relocating party knew of the intended relocation if the relocating party cannot satisfy the sixty-day requirement, absent exigent circumstances. Sec. 3109.0473. A notice of intent to relocate shall contain all of the following: (A) Updated residential address; (B) Updated mailing address; (C) Updated telephone number; (D) Updated email address; (E) Date of relocation; (F) Notice to the nonrelocating party that any objection to the relocation must be filed not later than thirty days after receipt of the notice of intent to relocate. Sec. 3109.0474. If the court has not already made a prior finding, or upon the filing of a motion and a finding by the court that the health, safety, and welfare or liberty of a person, including a child, would be reasonably put at risk by the relocating party filing a notice of intent to relocate under section 3109.0471 of the Revised Code, the court may do any of the following: (A) Order that the intent to relocate not be disclosed; (B) Waive the notice requirement to the extent necessary to protect the confidentiality and the health, safety, and welfare of the child or parent; (C) Consider any other remedy deemed necessary to facilitate the legitimate needs of the parties and protect the best interest of the child; (D) If appropriate, conduct an ex parte hearing. If the court issues an ex parte order, the court shall schedule a full hearing and give the parties notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing. Sec. 3109.0475. (A) If a party fails, without good cause, to file a notice of intent to relocate pursuant to section 3109.0471 of the Revised Code, the court may consider the failure as follows: (1) As a factor in making its determination regarding the relocation; (2) As a factor in determining a modification of the parenting plan; (3) As a basis for ordering the return of the child if the relocation has taken place without notice; (4) As a basis for awarding attorney fees and expenses; (5) As a factor in a finding of contempt. (B) When making considerations under division (A) of this section, the court shall not consider that the child has been integrated in the new surroundings, unless there is good cause shown. Sec. 3109.0476. A nonrelocating party may file a motion objecting to the relocation and seek an order restricting the relocation when the relocation would render any portion of the parenting plan impracticable or not in the child's best interest or violate restrictions in the plan. Sec. 3109.0477. A motion under section 3109.0476 of the Revised Code shall be filed not later than thirty days after the receipt of the notice of intent to relocate, or the objection shall be waived. Sec. 3109.0478. If a motion objecting to a relocation is filed, the court shall conduct a hearing. All matters relating to the relocation objection proceedings shall be given priority scheduling. Sec. 3109.0479. In reaching a decision on a proposed temporary or permanent relocation, and in addition to the best interest factors in section 3109.0430 of the Revised Code, the court shall consider all of the following factors to foster a continuing meaningful relationship between the child and the nonrelocating party: (A) The reason presented for seeking or opposing the relocation; (B) The realistic ability to preserve the relationship between the child and the nonrelocating party through any proposed new arrangements that consider the logistics and costs of contact, access, and parenting time; (C) The effect the relocation will have on the child's relationship with extended family; (D) The enhancement of the quality of life for the child and the relocating party that the relocation may afford; (E) Whether a parent is subject to the restrictions under sections 3109.0455 to 3109.0458 of the Revised Code; (F) The child's stability; (G) Any other factor the court determines relevant. Sec. 3109.0482. As used in sections 3109.0482 to 3109.0492 of the Revised Code: (A) "Active military service" means service by a member of the uniformed services in compliance with military orders to report for combat operations, contingency operations, peacekeeping operations, a remote tour of duty, or other active service for which the member is required to report unaccompanied by any family member, including any period of illness, recovery from injury, leave, or other lawful absence during that operation, duty, or service. (B) "Uniformed services" means the United States armed forces, the army national guard, and the air national guard or any reserve component thereof, or the commissioned corps of the United States public health service. Sec. 3109.0483. Upon receipt of an order for active military service, a party subject to an order allocating parenting responsibilities shall notify any other party of the order for active military service not later than three days after receiving the military service order. Sec. 3109.0484. On receipt of a notice described under section 3109.0483 of the Revised Code, any party may apply to the court for a hearing to expedite an allocation or modification proceeding so that the court can issue an order regarding parenting responsibilities before any other party's active military service begins. The application shall include the date on which the active military service begins. Sec. 3109.0485. The court shall schedule a hearing on receipt of an application under section 3109.0484 of the Revised Code and hold the hearing not later than thirty days after receipt of the application, except that the court shall give the case calendar priority and handle the case expeditiously if exigent circumstances exist. Sec. 3109.0486. The court shall not find past, present, or possible future active military service to constitute a change in circumstances justifying modification of a prior decree pursuant to section 3109.0418 or 3109.0419 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.0487. (A) Nothing in sections 3109.0483 to 3109.0490 of the Revised Code shall prevent a court from issuing a temporary order allocating or modifying parenting responsibilities in a parenting plan for the duration of the party's active military service that is in the best interest of the child. (B) A temporary order may do any of the following, with regard to parenting time under the parenting plan: (1) Delegate all or part of the party's parenting time with the child to a relative or another person who has a close and substantial relationship with the child; (2) Require any other party to make the child reasonably available for parenting time with the party when on leave from active military service; (3) Require any other party to facilitate contact, including telephone and electronic contact, between the party and the child while the party is on active military service. (C) A temporary order shall specify whether the party's active military service is the basis of the order and shall provide for termination of the temporary order and resumption of the prior order not later than ten days after the date that the active military service ends, unless any other party demonstrates that resumption of the prior order is not in the child's best interest. Sec. 3109.0488. At the request of a party who is ordered for active military service and who is subject to a proceeding pertaining to a temporary order for the allocation or modification of parenting responsibilities, the court shall permit the party to participate in the proceeding and present evidence by electronic means, including communication by telephone, video, or internet, to the extent permitted by the rules of the supreme court of Ohio. Sec. 3109.0489. A party who is ordered for active military service and who is subject to a proceeding pertaining to the allocation or modification of parenting responsibilities shall provide written notice to the court, child support enforcement agency, and any other party of the date of termination of the party's active military service not later than thirty days after the date on which the service ends. Sec. 3109.0490. An order delegating all or part of the party's parenting time under a parenting plan pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 3109.0487 of the Revised Code does not create standing on behalf of the person to whom parenting time is delegated to assert companionship or visitation independent of the order. Sec. 3109.0491. (A) A party may file a motion alleging interference with parenting time or companionship or visitation. (B) A motion under division (A) of this section shall include all of the following: (1) The date that the court awarded the parenting time or companionship or visitation; (2) A description of the parenting time or companionship or visitation that was awarded; (3) The dates when interference led to the loss of parenting time or companionship or visitation and the amount of time lost; (4) A description of any efforts made to exercise parenting time or companionship or visitation; (5) Any relief requested. (C) Upon the filing of a motion under this section, the court shall hold an initial hearing not later than twenty-eight days after service unless for good cause shown. Sec. 3109.0492. Any time prior to ruling upon a motion alleging interference with parenting time or companionship or visitation, the court may issue temporary orders necessary to protect the relationship between parent or legal custodian and child. Sec. 3109.0493. After a hearing under section 3109.0491 of the Revised Code, and upon a finding there has been unreasonable interference with parenting time or companionship or visitation, the court may issue any of the following: (A) A modified parenting plan or amended order to prevent future interference with parenting time or companionship or visitation in the best interest of a child; (B) An order for compensatory parenting time or companionship or visitation; (C) An order for supervised parenting time or companionship or visitation or exchanges; (D) An order to require a parent, legal custodian, or the child to attend counseling, education, or coaching; (E) An order to post bond, either in cash or with sufficient sureties, conditioned upon compliance with the order granting parenting time or companionship or visitation; (F) An award of reasonable costs and fees for legal counsel and litigation, mediation, counseling, parent and child education, supervised parenting time, or companionship or visitation or exchange, and court costs; (G) Any other remedy that the court considers appropriate. Sec. 3109.043 3109.0497. In any proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child, when requested in the complaint, answer, or counterclaim, or by motion served with the pleading, upon satisfactory proof by affidavit duly filed with the clerk of the court, the court, without oral hearing and for good cause shown, may make a temporary order regarding the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child while the action is pending. If a parent and child relationship has not already been established pursuant to section 3111.02 of the Revised Code, the court may take into consideration when determining whether to award parenting time, visitation rights, or allocate temporary custody parenting responsibilities to a putative father that the putative father is named on the birth record of the child, the child has the putative father's surname, or person seeking to establish a parent and child relationship the existence of a clear pattern of a parent and child relationship between the child and the putative father existsperson. Sec. 3109.0498. (A) Parties to any decree that allocates parental rights and responsibilities issued pursuant to section 3109.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to the effective date of this section, may file a motion with the court that issued the decree requesting the approval of a parenting plan to be incorporated into a decree in accordance with sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code. (B) A decree that allocates parental rights and responsibilities issued under section 3109.04 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to the effective date of this section, shall not be affected or invalidated by, and shall not be construed as being affected or invalidated by, the provisions of sections 3109.04 to 3109.0497 of the Revised Code relative to the allocation of parenting responsibilities under a parenting plan on and after the effective date of this section. The decree issued prior to the effective date of this section shall remain in full force and effect, subject to modification or termination pursuant to sections 3109.0418 to 3109.0420 of the Revised Code on and after the effective date of this section. (C) With regard to a decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities issued under section 3109.04 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to the effective date of this section: (1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, if the order provides for shared parenting of a child, both parents have "custody of the child," "care, custody, and control of the child," and the same parenting responsibilities for the child under the order to the extent and in the manner specified in the order; (2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise and except as otherwise provided in the order, if the order provides for shared parenting for a child, each parent, regardless of where the child is physically located or with whom the child is residing at a particular point in time, as specified in the order, is the "designated parent and legal custodian" of the child. Sec. 3109.05. (A)(1) In a divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities or child support proceeding, the court may order either or both parents to support or help support their children, without regard to marital misconduct. In determining the amount reasonable or necessary for child support, including the medical needs of the child, the court shall comply with Chapter 3119. of the Revised Code. (2) The court, in accordance with Chapter 3119. of the Revised Code, shall include in each support order made under this section the requirement that one or both of the parents provide for the health care needs of the child to the satisfaction of the court, and the court shall include in the support order a requirement that all support payments be made through the office of child support in the department of job and family services. (3) The court shall comply with Chapters 3119., 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code when it makes or modifies an order for child support under this section. (B) The juvenile court has exclusive jurisdiction to enter the orders in any case certified to it from another court. (C) If any person required to pay child support under an order made under division (A) of this section on or after April 15, 1985, or modified on or after December 1, 1986, is found in contempt of court for failure to make support payments under the order, the court that makes the finding, in addition to any other penalty or remedy imposed, shall assess all court costs arising out of the contempt proceeding against the person and require the person to pay any reasonable attorney's fees of any adverse party, as determined by the court, that arose in relation to the act of contempt and, on or after July 1, 1992, shall assess interest on any unpaid amount of child support pursuant to section 3123.17 of the Revised Code. (D) The court shall not authorize or permit the escrowing, impoundment, or withholding of any child support payment ordered under this section or any other section of the Revised Code because of a denial of or interference with a right of parenting time granted to a parent in an order issued under this section or section 3109.051 a parenting plan pursuant to sections 3109.041 to 3109.044 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code or companionship or visitation granted in an order issued under this section, section 3109.0513109.054, 3109.11, 3109.12, or any other section of the Revised Code, or as a method of enforcing the specific provisions of any such order dealing with parenting time or visitation. Sec. 3109.052. (A) If a proceeding for divorce, dissolution, legal separation, annulment, or pertaining to the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of a child involves one or more children, if the parents of the children parties do not agree upon an appropriate allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of their children or do not agree upon a specific schedule of parenting time for their children, the court may order the parents parties to mediate their differences on those matters attempt to resolve their differences on those matters in accordance with mediation procedures dispute resolution processes adopted by the court by local rule. When the court determines whether mediation dispute resolution is appropriate in any proceeding, it shall consider whether either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, whether either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, and whether either parent has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child. If either parent has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child, the court may order mediation only if the court determines that it is in the best interests of the parties to order mediation and makes specific written findings of fact to support its determinationany allegations of domestic violence relating to any of the parties. If a court issues an order pursuant to this division requiring mediation, it also may order the parents to file a mediation report within a specified period of time and order the parents to pay the cost of mediation, unless either or both of the parents file a motion requesting that the court waive that requirement. Upon the filing of a motion requesting the waiver of that requirement, the court, for good cause shown, may waive the requirement that either or both parents pay the cost of mediation or may require one of the parents to pay the entire cost of mediation. Any mediation procedures adopted by local court rule for use under this division shall include, but are not limited to, provisions establishing qualifications for mediators who may be employed or used and provisions establishing standards for the conduct of the mediation. (B) If a mediation order is issued under division (A) of this section and the order requires the parents to file a mediation report, the mediator and each parent who takes part in mediation in accordance with the order jointly shall file a report of the results of the mediation process with the court that issued the order under that division. A mediation report shall indicate only whether agreement has been reached on any of the issues that were the subject of the mediation, and, if agreement has been reached, the content and details of the agreement. No mediation report shall contain any background information concerning the mediation process or any information discussed or presented in the process. The court shall consider the mediation report when it allocates parental rights and responsibilities for the care of children under section 3109.04 of the Revised Code and when it establishes a specific schedule of parenting time under section 3109.051 of the Revised Code. The court is not bound by the mediation report and shall consider the best interest of the children when making that allocation or establishing the parenting time schedule. (C) If Pursuant to the uniform mediation act in Chapter 2710. of the Revised Code, if a mediation order is issued under division (A) of this section, the mediator shall not be made a party to, and shall not be called as a witness or testify in, any action or proceeding, other than a criminal, delinquency, child abuse, child neglect, or dependent child action or proceeding, that is brought by or against either parent and that pertains to the mediation process, to any information discussed or presented in the mediation process, to the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the parents' children, or to including the awarding of parenting time rights in relation to their children under a parenting plan. The mediator shall not be made a party to, or be called as a witness or testify in, such an action or proceeding even if both parents give their prior consent to the mediator being made a party to or being called as a witness or to testify in the action or proceeding. (D) Division (A) of this section does not apply to either of the following: (1) Any proceeding, or the use of mediation in any proceeding that is not a proceeding for divorce, dissolution, legal separation, annulment, or the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child; (2) The use of mediation in any proceeding for divorce, dissolution, legal separation, annulment, or the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child, in relation to issues other than the appropriate allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the parents' children and other than a specific parenting time schedule for the parents' children. Sec. 3109.054. In a proceeding pertaining to the allocation of parenting responsibilities or a child support proceeding that involves a child, the court may grant reasonable companionship or visitation to a party who is a relative, person who has served as a kinship caregiver, or any other person related to the child by consanguinity or affinity, other than a parent, if all of the following apply: (A) The relative, person who has served as a kinship caregiver, or other person files a motion with the court seeking companionship or visitation. (B) The court determines that the relative, person who has served as a kinship caregiver, or other person has an interest in the welfare of the child. (C) The court, after giving special weight to the parents' wishes regarding the child, determines that the granting of the companionship or visitation is in the best interest of the child. Sec. 3109.055. A motion for companionship or visitation may be filed during the pendency of the proceeding that pertains to the allocation of parenting responsibilities or child support proceeding or, if a motion was not filed at that time or was filed at that time and the circumstances in the case have changed, at any time after a decree or final order is issued in the case. Sec. 3109.056. When determining whether to grant companionship or visitation to a relative, person who has served as a kinship caregiver, or other person pursuant to section 3109.054, 3109.11, or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, when establishing a specific visitation schedule, and when determining other visitation matters under section 3109.054, 3109.11, or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, the court shall consider any resulting report from a dispute resolution process that the court ordered pursuant to section 3109.052 of the Revised Code and shall consider all other relevant factors, including all of the factors listed in section 3109.057 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.057. The court shall consider all of the following factors when determining whether to grant companionship or visitation to a relative, person who has served as a kinship caregiver, or any other person pursuant to section 3109.054, 3109.11, or 3109.12 of the Revised Code: (A) The prior interaction and interrelationships of the child with the child's parents, siblings, and other persons related by consanguinity or affinity, and with the person who requested companionship or visitation; (B) The geographical location of residence of the person requesting companionship or visitation and the distance between that person's residence and the child's residence; (C) Available time of the child and the person who requested companionship or visitation, including the person's employment schedule, the child's school schedule, and the child's and person's holiday and vacation schedule; (D) The age of the child; (E) The child's adjustment to home, school, and community; (F) If the court has interviewed the child in chambers, pursuant to section 3109.058 of the Revised Code, regarding the wishes and concerns of the child as to companionship or visitation, a specific visitation schedule, or other visitation matters, the wishes and concerns of the child, as expressed to the court; (G) The health and safety of the child; (H) The amount of time that will be available for the child to spend with siblings; (I) The mental and physical health of all parties; (J) The willingness of the person requesting companionship or visitation to reschedule missed visitation; (K) Whether the person requesting companionship or visitation previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; whether the person, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, previously has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that is the basis of the adjudication; and whether there is reason to believe that the person has acted in a manner resulting in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; (L) The wishes and concerns of the child's parents or legal custodian, as expressed by them to the court; (M) Any other factor in the best interest of the child. Sec. 3109.058. (A) In considering the factors listed in section 3109.057 of the Revised Code, the court may interview in chambers any or all involved children on their wishes and concerns regarding companionship or visitation matters. (B) If the court interviews any child concerning the child's wishes and concerns, the interview shall be conducted in chambers or another location designated by the court. (C) Before conducting or completing an interview under this section, the court shall determine both of the following: (1) That the child has sufficient reasoning ability; (2) That there are no special circumstances that would indicate the interview would not be in the best interest of the child. Sec. 3109.059. (A) The child, attorney for the child, if any, and any court personnel deemed necessary by the court shall be present at an interview under section 3109.058 of the Revised Code. (B) The court may have the child's guardian ad litem present during the interview. (C) If the court interviews a child, it shall permit a person seeking companionship or visitation to submit written questions to the court that the court may use during the interview. (D) If the court interviews a child, it shall record the interview. Only the court and appellate courts shall have access to the record of the interview. Sec. 3109.0510. No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain from a child a written or recorded statement or affidavit setting forth the wishes and concerns of the child regarding companionship or visitation matters. The court shall not accept or consider a written or recorded statement or affidavit that purports to set forth the child's wishes or concerns regarding those matters. Sec. 3109.0511. The remarriage of a parent of a child does not affect the authority of a court to grant reasonable companionship or visitation with respect to the child to any relative, person who has served as a kinship caregiver, or any other person. Sec. 3109.0512. If the court denies a motion for reasonable companionship or visitation, the court shall state in writing its findings of fact and conclusions of law in accordance with Civil Rule 52 upon written request by a party. Sec. 3109.051 3109.0515. (A) If a divorce, dissolution, legal separation, or annulment proceeding involves a child and if the court has not issued a shared parenting decree, the court shall consider any mediation report filed pursuant to section 3109.052 of the Revised Code and, in accordance with division (C) of this section, shall make a just and reasonable order or decree permitting each parent who is not the residential parent to have parenting time with the child at the time and under the conditions that the court directs, unless the court determines that it would not be in the best interest of the child to permit that parent to have parenting time with the child and includes in the journal its findings of fact and conclusions of law. Whenever possible, the order or decree permitting the parenting time shall ensure the opportunity for both parents to have frequent and continuing contact with the child, unless frequent and continuing contact by either parent with the child would not be in the best interest of the child. The court shall include in its final decree a specific schedule of parenting time for that parent. Except as provided in division (E)(6) of section 3113.31 of the Revised Code, if the court, pursuant to this section, grants parenting time to a parent or companionship or visitation rights to any other person with respect to any child, it shall not require the public children services agency to provide supervision of or other services related to that parent's exercise of parenting time or that person's exercise of companionship or visitation rights with respect to the child. This section does not limit the power of a juvenile court pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code to issue orders with respect to children who are alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent children or to make dispositions of children who are adjudicated abused, neglected, or dependent children or of a common pleas court to issue orders pursuant to section 3113.31 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) In a divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, annulment, or child support proceeding that involves a child, the court may grant reasonable companionship or visitation rights to any grandparent, any person related to the child by consanguinity or affinity, or any other person other than a parent, if all of the following apply: (a) The grandparent, relative, or other person files a motion with the court seeking companionship or visitation rights. (b) The court determines that the grandparent, relative, or other person has an interest in the welfare of the child. (c) The court determines that the granting of the companionship or visitation rights is in the best interest of the child. (2) A motion may be filed under division (B)(1) of this section during the pendency of the divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, annulment, or child support proceeding or, if a motion was not filed at that time or was filed at that time and the circumstances in the case have changed, at any time after a decree or final order is issued in the case. (C) When determining whether to grant parenting time rights to a parent pursuant to this section or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code or to grant companionship or visitation rights to a grandparent, relative, or other person pursuant to this section or section 3109.11 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, when establishing a specific parenting time or visitation schedule, and when determining other parenting time matters under this section or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code or visitation matters under this section or section 3109.11 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, the court shall consider any mediation report that is filed pursuant to section 3109.052 of the Revised Code and shall consider all other relevant factors, including, but not limited to, all of the factors listed in division (D) of this section. In considering the factors listed in division (D) of this section for purposes of determining whether to grant parenting time or visitation rights, establishing a specific parenting time or visitation schedule, determining other parenting time matters under this section or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code or visitation matters under this section or under section 3109.11 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, and resolving any issues related to the making of any determination with respect to parenting time or visitation rights or the establishment of any specific parenting time or visitation schedule, the court, in its discretion, may interview in chambers any or all involved children regarding their wishes and concerns. If the court interviews any child concerning the child's wishes and concerns regarding those parenting time or visitation matters, the interview shall be conducted in chambers, and no person other than the child, the child's attorney, the judge, any necessary court personnel, and, in the judge's discretion, the attorney of each parent shall be permitted to be present in the chambers during the interview. No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain from a child a written or recorded statement or affidavit setting forth the wishes and concerns of the child regarding those parenting time or visitation matters. A court, in considering the factors listed in division (D) of this section for purposes of determining whether to grant any parenting time or visitation rights, establishing a parenting time or visitation schedule, determining other parenting time matters under this section or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code or visitation matters under this section or under section 3109.11 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, or resolving any issues related to the making of any determination with respect to parenting time or visitation rights or the establishment of any specific parenting time or visitation schedule, shall not accept or consider a written or recorded statement or affidavit that purports to set forth the child's wishes or concerns regarding those parenting time or visitation matters. (D) In determining whether to grant parenting time to a parent pursuant to this section or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code or companionship or visitation rights to a grandparent, relative, or other person pursuant to this section or section 3109.11 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, in establishing a specific parenting time or visitation schedule, and in determining other parenting time matters under this section or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code or visitation matters under this section or section 3109.11 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, the court shall consider all of the following factors: (1) The prior interaction and interrelationships of the child with the child's parents, siblings, and other persons related by consanguinity or affinity, and with the person who requested companionship or visitation if that person is not a parent, sibling, or relative of the child; (2) The geographical location of the residence of each parent and the distance between those residences, and if the person is not a parent, the geographical location of that person's residence and the distance between that person's residence and the child's residence; (3) The child's and parents' available time, including, but not limited to, each parent's employment schedule, the child's school schedule, and the child's and the parents' holiday and vacation schedule; (4) The age of the child; (5) The child's adjustment to home, school, and community; (6) If the court has interviewed the child in chambers, pursuant to division (C) of this section, regarding the wishes and concerns of the child as to parenting time by the parent who is not the residential parent or companionship or visitation by the grandparent, relative, or other person who requested companionship or visitation, as to a specific parenting time or visitation schedule, or as to other parenting time or visitation matters, the wishes and concerns of the child, as expressed to the court; (7) The health and safety of the child; (8) The amount of time that will be available for the child to spend with siblings; (9) The mental and physical health of all parties; (10) Each parent's willingness to reschedule missed parenting time and to facilitate the other parent's parenting time rights, and with respect to a person who requested companionship or visitation, the willingness of that person to reschedule missed visitation; (11) In relation to parenting time, whether either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; whether either parent, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, previously has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that is the basis of the adjudication; and whether there is reason to believe that either parent has acted in a manner resulting in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; (12) In relation to requested companionship or visitation by a person other than a parent, whether the person previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; whether the person, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, previously has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that is the basis of the adjudication; whether either parent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the current proceeding; whether either parent previously has been convicted of an offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the current proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense; and whether there is reason to believe that the person has acted in a manner resulting in a child being an abused child or a neglected child; (13) Whether the residential parent or one of the parents subject to a shared parenting decree has continuously and willfully denied the other parent's right to parenting time in accordance with an order of the court; (14) Whether either parent has established a residence or is planning to establish a residence outside this state; (15) In relation to requested companionship or visitation by a person other than a parent, the wishes and concerns of the child's parents, as expressed by them to the court; (16) Any other factor in the best interest of the child. (E) The remarriage of a residential parent of a child does not affect the authority of a court under this section to grant parenting time rights with respect to the child to the parent who is not the residential parent or to grant reasonable companionship or visitation rights with respect to the child to any grandparent, any person related by consanguinity or affinity, or any other person. (F)(1) If the court, pursuant to division (A) of this section, denies parenting time to a parent who is not the residential parent or denies a motion for reasonable companionship or visitation rights filed under division (B) of this section and the parent or movant files a written request for findings of fact and conclusions of law, the court shall state in writing its findings of fact and conclusions of law in accordance with Civil Rule 52. (2) On or before July 1, 1991, each court of common pleas, by rule, shall adopt standard parenting time guidelines. A court shall have discretion to deviate from its standard parenting time guidelines based upon factors set forth in division (D) of this section. (G)(1) If the residential parent intends to move to a residence other than the residence specified in the parenting time order or decree of the court, the parent shall file a notice of intent to relocate with the court that issued the order or decree. Except as provided in divisions (G)(2), (3), and (4) of this section, the court shall send a copy of the notice to the parent who is not the residential parent. Upon receipt of the notice, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the parent who is not the residential parent, may schedule a hearing with notice to both parents to determine whether it is in the best interest of the child to revise the parenting time schedule for the child. (2) When a court grants parenting time rights to a parent who is not the residential parent, the court shall determine whether that parent has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child. If the court determines that that parent has not been so convicted and has not been determined to be the perpetrator of an abusive act that is the basis of a child abuse adjudication, the court shall issue an order stating that a copy of any notice of relocation that is filed with the court pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section will be sent to the parent who is given the parenting time rights in accordance with division (G)(1) of this section. If the court determines that the parent who is granted the parenting time rights has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child, it shall issue an order stating that that parent will not be given a copy of any notice of relocation that is filed with the court pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section unless the court determines that it is in the best interest of the children to give that parent a copy of the notice of relocation, issues an order stating that that parent will be given a copy of any notice of relocation filed pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section, and issues specific written findings of fact in support of its determination. (3) If a court, prior to April 11, 1991, issued an order granting parenting time rights to a parent who is not the residential parent and did not require the residential parent in that order to give the parent who is granted the parenting time rights notice of any change of address and if the residential parent files a notice of relocation pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section, the court shall determine if the parent who is granted the parenting time rights has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child. If the court determines that the parent who is granted the parenting time rights has not been so convicted and has not been determined to be the perpetrator of an abusive act that is the basis of a child abuse adjudication, the court shall issue an order stating that a copy of any notice of relocation that is filed with the court pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section will be sent to the parent who is granted parenting time rights in accordance with division (G)(1) of this section. If the court determines that the parent who is granted the parenting time rights has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child, it shall issue an order stating that that parent will not be given a copy of any notice of relocation that is filed with the court pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section unless the court determines that it is in the best interest of the children to give that parent a copy of the notice of relocation, issues an order stating that that parent will be given a copy of any notice of relocation filed pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section, and issues specific written findings of fact in support of its determination. (4) If a parent who is granted parenting time rights pursuant to this section or any other section of the Revised Code is authorized by an order issued pursuant to this section or any other court order to receive a copy of any notice of relocation that is filed pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section or pursuant to court order, if the residential parent intends to move to a residence other than the residence address specified in the parenting time order, and if the residential parent does not want the parent who is granted the parenting time rights to receive a copy of the relocation notice because the parent with parenting time rights has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any other offense involving a victim who at the time of the commission of the offense was a member of the family or household that is the subject of the proceeding and caused physical harm to the victim in the commission of the offense, or has been determined to be the perpetrator of the abusive act that is the basis of an adjudication that a child is an abused child, the residential parent may file a motion with the court requesting that the parent who is granted the parenting time rights not receive a copy of any notice of relocation. Upon the filing of the motion, the court shall schedule a hearing on the motion and give both parents notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing. If the court determines that the parent who is granted the parenting time rights has been so convicted or has been determined to be the perpetrator of an abusive act that is the basis of a child abuse adjudication, the court shall issue an order stating that the parent who is granted the parenting time rights will not be given a copy of any notice of relocation that is filed with the court pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section or that the residential parent is no longer required to give that parent a copy of any notice of relocation unless the court determines that it is in the best interest of the children to give that parent a copy of the notice of relocation, issues an order stating that that parent will be given a copy of any notice of relocation filed pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section, and issues specific written findings of fact in support of its determination. If it does not so find, it shall dismiss the motion. (H)(1) Subject to section 3125.16 and division (F) of section 3319.321 of the Revised Code, a parent of a child who is not the residential parent of the child is entitled to access, under the same terms and conditions under which access is provided to the residential parent, to any record that is related to the child and to which the residential parent of the child legally is provided access, unless the court determines that it would not be in the best interest of the child for the parent who is not the residential parent to have access to the records under those same terms and conditions. If the court determines that the parent of a child who is not the residential parent should not have access to records related to the child under the same terms and conditions as provided for the residential parent, the court shall specify the terms and conditions under which the parent who is not the residential parent is to have access to those records, shall enter its written findings of facts and opinion in the journal, and shall issue an order containing the terms and conditions to both the residential parent and the parent of the child who is not the residential parent. The court shall include in every order issued pursuant to this division notice that any keeper of a record who knowingly fails to comply with the order or division (H) of this section is in contempt of court. (2) Subject to section 3125.16 and division (F) of section 3319.321 of the Revised Code, subsequent to the issuance of an order under division (H)(1) of this section, the keeper of any record that is related to a particular child and to which the residential parent legally is provided access shall permit the parent of the child who is not the residential parent to have access to the record under the same terms and conditions under which access is provided to the residential parent, unless the residential parent has presented the keeper of the record with a copy of an order issued under division (H)(1) of this section that limits the terms and conditions under which the parent who is not the residential parent is to have access to records pertaining to the child and the order pertains to the record in question. If the residential parent presents the keeper of the record with a copy of that type of order, the keeper of the record shall permit the parent who is not the residential parent to have access to the record only in accordance with the most recent order that has been issued pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section and presented to the keeper by the residential parent or the parent who is not the residential parent. Any keeper of any record who knowingly fails to comply with division (H) of this section or with any order issued pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section is in contempt of court. (3) The prosecuting attorney of any county may file a complaint with the court of common pleas of that county requesting the court to issue a protective order preventing the disclosure pursuant to division (H)(1) or (2) of this section of any confidential law enforcement investigatory record. The court shall schedule a hearing on the motion and give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties. (I) A court that issues a parenting time order or decree pursuant to this section or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code shall determine whether the parent granted the right of parenting time is to be permitted access, in accordance with section 5104.039 of the Revised Code, to any child care center that is, or that in the future may be, attended by the children with whom the right of parenting time is granted. Unless the court determines that the parent who is not the residential parent should not have access to the center to the same extent that the residential parent is granted access to the center, the parent who is not the residential parent and who is granted parenting time rights is entitled to access to the center to the same extent that the residential parent is granted access to the center. If the court determines that the parent who is not the residential parent should not have access to the center to the same extent that the residential parent is granted such access under section 5104.039 of the Revised Code, the court shall specify the terms and conditions under which the parent who is not the residential parent is to have access to the center, provided that the access shall not be greater than the access that is provided to the residential parent under section 5104.039 of the Revised Code, the court shall enter its written findings of fact and opinions in the journal, and the court shall include the terms and conditions of access in the parenting time order or decree. (J)(1) Subject to division (F) of section 3319.321 of the Revised Code, when a court issues an order or decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child, the parent of the child who is not the residential parent of the child is entitled to access, under the same terms and conditions under which access is provided to the residential parent, to any student activity that is related to the child and to which the residential parent of the child legally is provided access, unless the court determines that it would not be in the best interest of the child to grant the parent who is not the residential parent access to the student activities under those same terms and conditions. If the court determines that the parent of the child who is not the residential parent should not have access to any student activity that is related to the child under the same terms and conditions as provided for the residential parent, the court shall specify the terms and conditions under which the parent who is not the residential parent is to have access to those student activities, shall enter its written findings of facts and opinion in the journal, and shall issue an order containing the terms and conditions to both the residential parent and the parent of the child who is not the residential parent. The court shall include in every order issued pursuant to this division notice that any school official or employee who knowingly fails to comply with the order or division (J) of this section is in contempt of court. (2) Subject to division (F) of section 3319.321 of the Revised Code, subsequent to the issuance of an order under division (J)(1) of this section, all school officials and employees shall permit the parent of the child who is not the residential parent to have access to any student activity under the same terms and conditions under which access is provided to the residential parent of the child, unless the residential parent has presented the school official or employee, the board of education of the school, or the governing body of the chartered nonpublic school with a copy of an order issued under division (J)(1) of this section that limits the terms and conditions under which the parent who is not the residential parent is to have access to student activities related to the child and the order pertains to the student activity in question. If the residential parent presents the school official or employee, the board of education of the school, or the governing body of the chartered nonpublic school with a copy of that type of order, the school official or employee shall permit the parent who is not the residential parent to have access to the student activity only in accordance with the most recent order that has been issued pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section and presented to the school official or employee, the board of education of the school, or the governing body of the chartered nonpublic school by the residential parent or the parent who is not the residential parent. Any school official or employee who knowingly fails to comply with division (J) of this section or with any order issued pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section is in contempt of court. (K) If any person is found in contempt of court for failing to comply with or interfering with any order or decree granting parenting time rights issued pursuant to this section or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code or companionship or visitation rights issued pursuant to this section, section 3109.11 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, or any other provision of the Revised Code, the court that makes the finding, in addition to any other penalty or remedy imposed, shall assess all court costs arising out of the contempt proceeding against the person and require the person to pay any reasonable attorney's fees of any adverse party, as determined by the court, that arose in relation to the act of contempt, and may award reasonable compensatory parenting time or visitation to the person whose right of parenting time or visitation was affected by the failure or interference if such compensatory parenting time or visitation is in the best interest of the child. Any compensatory parenting time or visitation awarded under this division shall be included in an order issued by the court and, to the extent possible, shall be governed by the same terms and conditions as was the parenting time or visitation that was affected by the failure or interference. (L) Any parent who requests reasonable parenting time rights with respect to a child under this section or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code or any person who requests reasonable companionship or visitation rights with respect to a child under this section, section 3109.11 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, or any other provision of the Revised Code may file a motion with the court requesting that it waive all or any part of the costs that may accrue in the proceedings. If the court determines that the movant is indigent and that the waiver is in the best interest of the child, the court, in its discretion, may waive payment of all or any part of the costs of those proceedings. (M)(1) A parent who receives an order for active military service in the uniformed services and who is subject to a parenting time order may apply to the court for any of the following temporary orders for the period extending from the date of the parent's departure to the date of return: (a) An order delegating all or part of the parent's parenting time with the child to a relative or to another person who has a close and substantial relationship with the child if the delegation is in the child's best interest; (b) An order that the other parent make the child reasonably available for parenting time with the parent when the parent is on leave from active military service; (c) An order that the other parent facilitate contact, including telephone and electronic contact, between the parent and child while the parent is on active military service. (2)(a) Upon receipt of an order for active military service, a parent who is subject to a parenting time order and seeks an order under division (M)(1) of this section shall notify the other parent who is subject to the parenting time order and apply to the court as soon as reasonably possible after receipt of the order for active military service. The application shall include the date on which the active military service begins. (b) The court shall schedule a hearing upon receipt of an application under division (M) of this section and hold the hearing not later than thirty days after its receipt, except that the court shall give the case calendar priority and handle the case expeditiously if exigent circumstances exist in the case. No hearing shall be required if both parents agree to the terms of the requested temporary order and the court determines that the order is in the child's best interest. (c) In determining whether a delegation under division (M)(1)(a) of this section is in the child's best interest, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including the factors set forth in division (D) of this section. (d) An order delegating all or part of the parent's parenting time pursuant to division (M)(1)(a) of this section does not create standing on behalf of the person to whom parenting time is delegated to assert visitation or companionship rights independent of the order. (3) At the request of a parent who is ordered for active military service in the uniformed services and who is a subject of a proceeding pertaining to a parenting time order or pertaining to a request for companionship rights or visitation with a child, the court shall permit the parent to participate in the proceeding and present evidence by electronic means, including communication by telephone, video, or internet to the extent permitted by rules of the supreme court of Ohio. (N) The juvenile court has exclusive jurisdiction to enter the orders in any case certified to it from another court. (O) As used in this sectionsections 3109.0516 to 3109.0529 of the Revised Code: (1) "Abused child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.031 of the Revised Code, and "neglected child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.03 of the Revised Code. (2) "Active military service" and "uniformed services" have the same meanings as in section 3109.04 of the Revised Code. (3) (A) "Confidential law enforcement investigatory record" has the same meaning as in section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (4) "Parenting time order" means an order establishing the amount of time that a child spends with the parent who is not the residential parent or the amount of time that the child is to be physically located with a parent under a shared parenting order. (5) (B) "Record" means any record, document, file, or other material that contains information directly related to a child, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (a) (1) Records maintained by public and nonpublic schools; (b) (2) Records maintained by facilities that provide child care, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code, publicly funded child care, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code, or pre-school services operated by or under the supervision of a school district board of education or a nonpublic school; (c) (3) Records maintained by hospitals, other facilities, or persons providing medical or surgical care or treatment for the child; (d) (4) Records maintained by agencies, departments, instrumentalities, or other entities of the state or any political subdivision of the state, other than a child support enforcement agency. Access to records maintained by a child support enforcement agency is governed by section 3125.16 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.0516. Subject to section 3125.16 and division (F) of section 3319.321 of the Revised Code, a parent or legal custodian of a child is entitled to access to any record that is related to the child, unless the court determines that it would not be in the best interest of the child for the parent or legal custodian to have access to the records. Sec. 3109.0517. If the court determines that a parent or legal custodian of a child should not have access to records related to the child, the court shall do the following: (A) Specify the terms, conditions, and limitations under which the parent or legal custodian is to have access to those records; (B) Enter its written findings of facts and conclusions of law in the journal; (C) Issue an order containing both of the following: (1) The terms, conditions, and limitations on the parent or legal custodian; (2) A notice that any keeper of a record who knowingly fails to comply with the order or section 3109.0516 of the Revised Code may be found in contempt of court. Sec. 3109.0518. (A) Subject to section 3125.16 and division (F) of section 3319.321 of the Revised Code, after the issuance of an order under section 3109.0517 of the Revised Code, the keeper of any record regarding a particular child and to which a parent or legal custodian legally is provided access shall permit the parent or legal custodian of the child to have access to the record, unless a parent or legal custodian has presented the keeper of the record with a copy of an order issued under section 3109.0517 of the Revised Code that specifies the terms, conditions, and limitations under which a parent or legal custodian may have access to records pertaining to the child and the order pertains to the record in question. (B) The keeper of the record shall permit the parent or legal custodian to have access to the record only in accordance with the most recent order that has been issued pursuant to section 3109.0517 of the Revised Code and presented to the keeper by the parent or legal custodian. (C) Any keeper of any record who knowingly fails to comply with section 3109.0516 of the Revised Code or with any order issued pursuant to section 3109.0517 of the Revised Code may be found in contempt of court. Sec. 3109.0519. The prosecuting attorney of any county may file a complaint with the court of common pleas of that county requesting the court to issue a protective order preventing the disclosure pursuant to sections 3109.0516 to 3109.0518 of the Revised Code of any confidential law enforcement investigatory record. The court shall schedule a hearing on the motion and give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties. Sec. 3109.0521. Subject to section 5104.039 of the Revised Code, a parent or legal custodian who has been allocated parenting responsibilities is permitted access, in accordance with section 5104.039 of the Revised Code, to any child care center that is, or that in the future may be, attended by the child, unless the court determines that it is not in the child's best interest for a parent or legal custodian to have access to the center. Sec. 3109.0522. If the court determines that the parent or legal custodian should not have access to a child care center, the court shall do the following: (A) Specify the terms, conditions, or limitations under which the parent or legal custodian is to have access to the center; (B) Enter its written findings of fact and conclusions of law in the journal; (C) Issue an order containing both of the following: (1) The terms, conditions, or limitations of access to the parent or legal custodian; (2) A notice that any child care center official or employee who knowingly fails to comply with the order or section 3109.0521 of the Revised Code may be found in contempt of court. Sec. 3109.0523. All child care center officials and employees shall permit a parent or legal custodian who has been allocated parenting responsibilities to have access to any child care center that is, or that in the future may be, attended by the child, unless presented with a copy of an order issued under section 3109.0522 of the Revised Code that specifies the terms, conditions, or limitations under which a parent or legal custodian may access the child care center. The child care center official or employee shall permit a parent or legal custodian to have access to the center only in accordance with the most recent order issued and presented. Sec. 3109.0524. Any child care center official or employee who knowingly fails to comply with section 3109.0521 of the Revised Code or with any order issued pursuant to section 3109.0522 of the Revised Code may be found in contempt of court. Sec. 3109.0526. Subject to division (F) of section 3319.321 of the Revised Code, when a court issues an order or decree allocating parenting responsibilities, the parents or legal custodian of the child are entitled to access to any student activity that is related to the child, unless the court determines that it would not be in the best interest of the child to grant the parent or legal custodian access to the student activities. Sec. 3109.0527. If the court determines that a parent or legal custodian should not have access to any student activity, the court shall do the following: (A) Specify the terms, conditions, or limitations under which the parent or legal custodian is to have access to those student activities; (B) Enter its written findings of facts and conclusions of law in the journal; (C) Issue an order containing both of the following: (1) The terms, conditions, or limitations to both the parents and legal custodian; (2) A notice that any school official or employee who knowingly fails to comply with the order or section 3109.0526 of the Revised Code may be found in contempt of court. Sec. 3109.0528. Subject to division (F) of section 3319.321 of the Revised Code, subsequent to the issuance of an order under section 3109.0527 of the Revised Code, all school officials and employees, the board of education of a school, or the governing body of a chartered nonpublic school shall permit the parent or legal custodian to have access to any student activity, unless the designated parent or legal custodian has presented the school official or employee, the board of education of the school, or the governing body of the chartered nonpublic school with a copy of an order issued under section 3109.0527 of the Revised Code that specifies the terms, conditions, or limitations under which the parent or legal custodian is to have access to student activities related to the child and the order pertains to the student activity in question. The school official or employee, the board of education of the school, or the governing body of the chartered nonpublic school that is presented with a copy of that type of order shall permit the parent or legal custodian to have access to the student activity only in accordance with the most recent order that has been issued pursuant to section 3109.0527 of the Revised Code and presented to the school official or employee, the board of education of the school, or the governing body of the chartered nonpublic school. Sec. 3109.0529. Any school official or employee who knowingly fails to comply with section 3109.0526 of the Revised Code or with any order issued pursuant to section 3109.0527 of the Revised Code may be found in contempt of court. Sec. 3109.054 3109.0550. When allocating parental rights and parenting responsibilities or parenting timeunder a parenting plan, no court shall deny or limit a parent's parental rights and parenting responsibilities or parenting time based on the parent's decision to do any of the following: (A) Refer to and raise the child in a manner consistent with the child's biological sex; (B) Decline to consent to the child receiving gender transition services as defined in section 3129.01 of the Revised Code; (C) Decline to consent to the child receiving counseling or other mental health services for the purpose of affirming the child's perception of the child's gender or sex, if the child's perception is inconsistent with the child's biological sex. Sec. 3109.055 3109.0570. (A) If a child is born to an unmarried woman and the father of the child has acknowledged the child and that acknowledgment has become final pursuant to section 2151.232, 3111.25, or 3111.821 of the Revised Code or has been determined in an action under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code to be the father of the child, the court, upon its own motion or the motion of one of the parties, may order the parents to undergo conciliation with a magistrate in order to resolve any disputes regarding the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities between the parents in a case pending before the court. An order requiring conciliation shall set forth the the name of the magistrate who will serve as the conciliator and the manner in which the costs of any conciliation procedures are to be paid. (B) A magistrate who serves as a conciliator shall use conciliation procedures to resolve a dispute regarding the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities and, upon resolution of the dispute, issue an order regarding the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities under a parenting plan, parenting time, or companionship or visitation pursuant to section 2151.23, sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498, or section 3109.12 of the Revised Code. The conciliation procedures may include without limitation the use of family counselors and service agencies, community health services, physicians, licensed psychologists, or clergy. If the magistrate orders the parties to undergo family counseling, the magistrate shall name the counselor and set forth the required type of counseling, the length of time for the counseling, and any other specific conditions. No order regarding the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities, parenting time, or companionship or visitation shall be issued until the conciliation has concluded and been reported to the magistrate. Sec. 3109.06. Except as provided in division (K) of section 2301.03 of the Revised Code, any court, other than a juvenile court, that has jurisdiction in any case respecting the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of a child under eighteen years of age and the designation of the child's place of residence and legal custodian or in any case respecting the support of a child under eighteen years of age, may, on its own motion or on motion of any interested party, certify the record in the case or so much of the record and such further information, in narrative form or otherwise, as the court deems necessary or the juvenile court requests, to the juvenile court for further proceedings; upon the certification, the juvenile court shall have exclusive jurisdiction. In cases in which the court of common pleas finds the parents or legal custodian unsuitable to have the parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the child or children and unsuitable to provide the place of residence and to be the legal custodian of the child or children, consent of the juvenile court shall not be required to such certification. This section applies to actions pending on August 28, 1951. In any case in which a court of common pleas, or other court having jurisdiction, has issued an order that allocates parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of minor children and designates their place of residence and legal custodian of minor children, has made an order for support of minor children, or has done both, the jurisdiction of the court shall not abate upon the death of the person awarded custody but shall continue for all purposes during the minority of the children. The court, upon its own motion or the motion of either parent or of any interested person acting on behalf of the children, may proceed to make further disposition of the case in the best interests of the children and subject to sections 3109.42 to 3109.48 of the Revised Code. If the children are under eighteen years of age, it may certify them, pursuant to this section, to the juvenile court of any county for further proceedings. After certification to a juvenile court, the jurisdiction of the court of common pleas, or other court, shall cease, except as to any payments of spousal support due for the spouse and support payments due and unpaid for the children at the time of the certification. Any disposition made pursuant to this section, whether by a juvenile court after a case is certified to it, or by any court upon the death of a person awarded custody of a child, shall be made in accordance with sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 and 3109.42 to 3109.48 of the Revised Code. If an appeal is taken from a decision made pursuant to this section that allocates parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of a minor child and designates the child's place of residence and legal custodian, the court of appeals shall give the case calendar priority and handle it expeditiously. Sec. 3109.061. Nothing in sections 2151.233 to 2151.236 and 2301.03 of the Revised Code shall be construed to prevent a domestic relations court from certifying a case to a juvenile court under division (D)(2) of section 3109.04 3109.0414 of the Revised Code or section 3109.06 of the Revised Code. Consent of the juvenile court shall not be required for the certification. As used in this section, "domestic relations court" has the same meaning as in section 2151.233 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.09. (A) As used in this section, "parent" means one of the following: (1) Both parents unless division (A)(2) or (3) of this section applies; (2) The designated parent designated the residential parent and legal custodian pursuant to an order issued under section 3109.04 3109.041 of the Revised Code that is not a shared parenting order; (3) The custodial parent of a child born out of wedlock who is the child's sole designated parent and legal custodian with respect to whom no custody order allocating parenting responsibilities has been issued. (B) Any owner of property, including any board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, may maintain a civil action to recover compensatory damages not exceeding ten thousand dollars and court costs from the parent of a minor if the minor willfully damages property belonging to the owner or commits acts cognizable as a "theft offense," as defined in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code, involving the property of the owner. The action may be joined with an action under Chapter 2737. of the Revised Code against the minor, or the minor and the minor's parent, to recover the property regardless of value, but any additional damages recovered from the parent pursuant to this section shall be limited to compensatory damages not exceeding ten thousand dollars, as authorized by this section. A finding of willful destruction of property or of committing acts cognizable as a theft offense is not dependent upon a prior finding that the child is a delinquent child or upon the child's conviction of any criminal offense. (C)(1) If a court renders a judgment in favor of a board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district in an action brought pursuant to division (B) of this section, if the board of education agrees to the parent's performance of community service in lieu of full payment of the judgment, and if the parent who is responsible for the payment of the judgment agrees to voluntarily participate in the performance of community service in lieu of full payment of the judgment, the court may order the parent to perform community service in lieu of providing full payment of the judgment. (2) If a court, pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, orders a parent to perform community service in lieu of providing full payment of a judgment, the court shall specify in its order the amount of the judgment, if any, to be paid by the parent, the type and number of hours of community service to be performed by the parent, and any other conditions necessary to carry out the order. (D) This section shall not apply to a parent of a minor if the minor was married at the time of the commission of the acts or violations that would otherwise give rise to a civil action commenced under this section. (E) Any action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced and heard as in other civil actions. (F) The monetary limitation upon compensatory damages set forth in this section does not apply to a civil action brought pursuant to section 2307.70 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.11. If either the father or mother of an unmarried minor child is deceased, the court of common pleas of the county in which the minor child resides may grant the parents and other relatives of the deceased father or mother reasonable companionship or visitation rights with respect to the minor child during the child's minority if the parent or other relative files a complaint requesting reasonable companionship or visitation rights and if the court determines that the granting of the companionship or visitation rights is in the best interest of the minor child. In determining whether to grant any person reasonable companionship or visitation rights with respect to any child, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the factors set forth in division (D) of section 3109.051 3109.057 of the Revised Code. Divisions (C), (K), and (L) of section 3109.051 Sections 3109.056 and 3109.058 to 3109.0510 of the Revised Code apply to the determination of reasonable companionship or visitation rights under this section and to any order granting any such rights companionship or visitation that is issued under this section. The remarriage of the surviving parent of the child or the adoption of the child by the spouse of the surviving parent of the child does not affect the authority of the court under this section to grant reasonable companionship or visitation rights with respect to the child to a parent or other relative of the child's deceased father or mother. If the court denies a request for reasonable companionship or visitation rights made pursuant to this section and the complainant files a written request for findings of fact and conclusions of law, the court shall state in writing its findings of fact and conclusions of law in accordance with Civil Rule 52. Except as provided in division (E)(6) of section 3113.31 of the Revised Code, if the court, pursuant to this section, grants any person companionship or visitation rights with respect to any child, it shall not require the public children services agency to provide supervision of or other services related to that person's exercise of companionship or visitation rights with respect to the child. This section does not limit the power of a juvenile court pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code to issue orders with respect to children who are alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent children or to make dispositions of children who are adjudicated abused, neglected, or dependent children or of a common pleas court to issue orders pursuant to section 3113.31 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.12. (A)(A)(1) If a child is born to an unmarried woman, the parents of the woman and any relative of the woman may file a complaint requesting the court of common pleas of the county in which the child resides to grant them reasonable companionship or visitation rights with the child. If a child is born to an unmarried woman and if the father of the child has acknowledged the child and that acknowledgment has become final pursuant to section 2151.232, 3111.25, or 3111.821 of the Revised Code or has been determined in an action under Chapter 3111. of the Revised Code to be the father of the child, either the father or the mother may file a complaint requesting that the court of appropriate jurisdiction of the county in which the child resides grant him reasonable parenting time rights with the child allocate parenting responsibilities pursuant to divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section and sections 3109.041 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code and the. The parents of the father and any relative of the father may file a complaint requesting that the court grant them reasonable companionship or visitation rights with the child. (2) With regard to a request for parenting responsibilities under division (A)(1) of this section, the court shall waive the initial filing fee. (B)(B)(1) The court may grant the parenting time rights responsibilities or companionship or visitation rights requested under division (A) of this section, if it determines that the granting of the parenting time rights responsibilities or companionship or visitation rights is in the best interest of the child. In determining whether to grant parenting responsibilities or grant reasonable parenting time rights or reasonable companionship or visitation rights with respect to any child, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the factors set forth in division (D) of section 3109.051 sections 3109.0430 and 3109.057 of the Revised Code. Divisions (C), (K), and (L) of section 3109.051 (2)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(2)(b) of this section, the court shall hold a hearing not later than thirty days after a complaint under division (A)(1) of this section is filed and served. (b) The court is not required to hold a hearing within thirty days for good cause shown or if both of the following are the case: (i) Either parent files a motion for a temporary order or the parents file a joint parenting plan. (ii) The court issues a temporary order pursuant to section 3109.0422 of the Revised Code or approves the joint parenting plan pursuant to section 3109.046 of the Revised Code. (3) Sections 3109.056 and 3109.058 to 3109.0510 of the Revised Code apply to the determination of reasonable parenting time rights or reasonable companionship or visitation rights under this section and to any order granting any such rights companionship or visitation that is issued under this section. (C) The marriage or remarriage of the mother or father of a child does not affect the authority of the court under this section to grant the natural father reasonable parenting time rights responsibilities or the parents or relatives of the natural father or the parents or relatives of the mother of the child reasonable companionship or visitation rights with respect to the child. (D) If the court denies a request for reasonable parenting time rights responsibilities or reasonable companionship or visitation rights made pursuant to division (A) of this section and the complainant files a written request for findings of fact and conclusions of law, the court shall state in writing its findings of fact and conclusions of law in accordance with Civil Rule 52. (E) Except as provided in division (E)(6) of section 3113.31 of the Revised Code, if the court, pursuant to this section, grants parenting time rightsresponsibilities or companionship or visitation rights with respect to any child, it shall not require the public children services agency to provide supervision of or other services related to that parent's exercise of parenting time rights responsibilities with the child or that person's exercise of companionship or visitation rights with the child. This section does not limit the power of a juvenile court pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code to issue orders with respect to children who are alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent children or to make dispositions of children who are adjudicated abused, neglected, or dependent children or of a common pleas court to issue orders pursuant to section 3113.31 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.401. (A) The general assembly finds the following: (1) That the parent and child relationship is of fundamental importance to the welfare of a child, and that the relationship between a child and each parent should be fostered unless inconsistent with the child's best interests; (2) That parents have the responsibility to make decisions and perform other parenting functions necessary for the care and growth of their children; (3) That the courts, when allocating parenting functions and responsibilities with respect to the child in a divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation, annulment, or any other proceeding addressing pertaining to the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities, must determine the child's best interests; (4) That the courts and parents must take into consideration the following general principles when allocating parental rights and parenting responsibilities and developing appropriate terms for parenting plans: (a) Children are served by a parenting arrangement that best provides for a child's safety, emotional growth, health, stability, and physical care. (b) Exposure of the child to harmful parental conflict should be minimized as much as possible. (c) Whenever appropriate, parents should be encouraged to meet their responsibilities to their children through agreements rather than by relying on judicial intervention. (d) When a parenting plan provides for mutual decision-making responsibility by the parents but they are unable to make decisions mutually, they should make a good faith effort to utilize the mediation process as required by the parenting plan. (e) In apportioning between the parents the daily physical living arrangements of the child and the child's location during legal and school holidays, vacations, and days of special importance, a court should not impose any type of standard schedule unless a standard schedule meets the needs of the child better than any proposed alternative parenting plan. (B) It is, therefore, the purpose public policy of this chapter, when it is in the child's best interest, to : (1) To foster and continue the relationship between the child and each parent when a court allocates parental rights and parenting responsibilities with respect to the child in a divorce, dissolution, legal separation, annulment, or any other proceeding addressing the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities; (2) For the child's parents to have substantial, meaningful, and developmentally appropriate parenting time with the child; (3) To have both parents participate in decision-making regarding the child. Sec. 3109.41. As used in sections 3109.41 to 3109.48 of the Revised Code: (A) A person is "convicted of killing" if the person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, or 2903.03 of the Revised Code. (B) "Custody order" means an order designating a person as the residential parent and legal custodian of a child under section 3109.04 of the Revised Code, as that section existed prior to the effective date of this amendment, or an order designating a person the designated parent and legal custodian in the allocation of parenting responsibilities under sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code, or any order determining custody of a child under section 2151.23, 2151.33, 2151.353, 2151.354, 2151.415, 2151.417, 2152.16, 2152.17, 2152.19, 2152.21, or 3113.31 of the Revised Code. (C) "Visitation order" means an order issued under division (B)(1)(c) of section 2151.33 or, under section 2151.412 of the Revised Code, or under section 3109.051, 3109.12, or 3113.31 of the Revised Code, as those sections existed prior to the effective date of this amendment. Sec. 3109.42. Except as provided in section 3109.47 of the Revised Code, if a parent is convicted of killing the other parent of a child, no court shall issue a custody order designating the parent as the residential parent and legal custodian of the child or granting custody of regarding the child to the parent. Sec. 3109.43. Except as provided in section 3109.47 of the Revised Code, if a parent is convicted of killing the other parent of a child, no court shall issue a visitation an order granting the parent visitation rights with any access to the child, including allocating parenting responsibilities. Sec. 3109.44. Upon receipt of notice that a visitation order is pending or has been issued granting a parent visitation rights with a child or a custody order is pending or has been issued designating a parent as the residential parent and legal custodian of a child or granting custody of allocating parenting responsibilities for a child to a parent prior to that parent being convicted of killing the other parent of the child, the court in which the parent is convicted of killing the other parent shall immediately notify the court that issued the visitation or custody order of the conviction. Sec. 3109.47. (A) A court may do one of the following with With respect to a parent convicted of killing the other parent of a child, a court may, if the court determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interest of the child and the child consents: (1) Issue, issue a custody order designating the parent as the residential parent and legal custodian of the child or granting custody of the child allocating parenting responsibilities to that parent; (2) Issue a visitation order granting that parent visitation rights with the child. (B) When considering the ability of a child to consent and the validity of a child's consent under this section, the court shall consider the wishes of the child, as expressed directly by the child or through the child's guardian ad litem, with due regard for the maturity of the child. Sec. 3109.48. No person, with the child of the parent present, shall visit the parent who has been convicted of killing the child's other parent unless a court has issued an order granting a custody order that allocates parenting responsibilities to the parent visitation rights with the child and the child's legal custodian or legal guardian consents to the visit. Sec. 3109.50. As used in sections 3109.501 to 3109.507 of the Revised Code: (A) "Parental rights" means parental rights and parenting responsibilities, parenting time, or any other similar right established by the laws of this state with respect to a child. "Parental rights" does not include the parental duty of support for a child. (B) "Rape" means a violation of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code or similar law of another state. (C) "Sexual battery" means a violation of section 2907.03 of the Revised Code if the sexual activity involved is sexual conduct, or similar law of another state. Sec. 3109.51. As used in sections 3109.52 to 3109.80 of the Revised Code: (A) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age. (B) "Custodian" means an individual with legal custody of a child. (C) "Guardian" means an individual granted authority by a probate court pursuant to Chapter 2111. of the Revised Code to exercise parental rights over a childand parenting responsibilities to the extent provided in the court's order and subject to the residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities of the child's parents. (D) (C) "Legal custody" and "residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.52. The parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a child may create a power of attorney that grants to a grandparent of the child with whom the child is residing any of the parent's, guardian's, or legal custodian's rights and responsibilities regarding the care, physical custody, and control of the child, including the ability to enroll the child in school, to obtain from the school district educational and behavioral information about the child, to consent to all school-related matters regarding the child, and to consent to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child. The power of attorney may not grant authority to consent to the marriage or adoption of the child. The power of attorney does not affect the rights of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child in any future proceeding concerning custody of the child or the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the child and does not grant legal custody to the attorney in fact. Sec. 3109.53. To create a power of attorney under section 3109.52 of the Revised Code, a parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall use a form that is identical in form and content to the following: POWER OF ATTORNEY I, the undersigned, residing at ___________, in the county of __________, state of __________, hereby appoint the child's grandparent, __________, residing at __________, in the county of ___________, in the state of Ohio, with whom the child of whom I am the parent, guardian, or legal custodian is residing, my attorney in fact to exercise any and all of my rights and responsibilities regarding the care, physical custody, and control of the child, __________, born __________, having social security number (optional) __________, except my authority to consent to marriage or adoption of the child __________, and to perform all acts necessary in the execution of the rights and responsibilities hereby granted, as fully as I might do if personally present. The rights I am transferring under this power of attorney include the ability to enroll the child in school, to obtain from the school district educational and behavioral information about the child, to consent to all school-related matters regarding the child, and to consent to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child. This transfer does not affect my rights in any future proceedings concerning the custody of the child or the allocation of the parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the child and does not give the attorney in fact legal custody of the child. This transfer does not terminate my right to have regular contact with the child. I hereby certify that I am transferring the rights and responsibilities designated in this power of attorney because one of the following circumstances exists: (1) I am: (a) Seriously ill, incarcerated, or about to be incarcerated, (b) Temporarily unable to provide financial support or parental guidance to the child, (c) Temporarily unable to provide adequate care and supervision of the child because of my physical or mental condition, (d) Homeless or without a residence because the current residence is destroyed or otherwise uninhabitable, or (e) In or about to enter a residential treatment program for substance abuse; (2) I am a parent or legal custodian of the child, the child's other parent is deceased, and I have authority to execute the power of attorney; or (3) I have a well-founded belief that the power of attorney is in the child's best interest. I hereby certify that I am not transferring my rights and responsibilities regarding the child for the purpose of enrolling the child in a school or school district so that the child may participate in the academic or interscholastic athletic programs provided by that school or district. If there is a court order naming me the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child who is the subject of this power of attorney and I am the sole parent or legal custodian signing this document, I hereby certify that one of the following is the case: (1) I have made reasonable efforts to locate and provide notice of the creation of this power of attorney to the other parent and have been unable to locate that parent; (2) The other parent is prohibited from receiving a notice of relocation; or (3) The parental rights of the other parent have been terminated by order of a juvenile court. This POWER OF ATTORNEY is valid until the occurrence of whichever of the following events occurs first: (1) I revoke this POWER OF ATTORNEY in writing and give notice of the revocation to the grandparent designated as attorney in fact and the juvenile court with which this POWER OF ATTORNEY was filed; (2) the child ceases to reside with the grandparent designated as attorney in fact; (3) this POWER OF ATTORNEY is terminated by court order; (4) the death of the child who is the subject of the power of attorney; or (5) the death of the grandparent designated as the attorney in fact. WARNING: DO NOT EXECUTE THIS POWER OF ATTORNEY IF ANY STATEMENT MADE IN THIS INSTRUMENT IS UNTRUE. FALSIFICATION IS A CRIME UNDER SECTION 2921.13 OF THE REVISED CODE, PUNISHABLE BY THE SANCTIONS UNDER CHAPTER 2929. OF THE REVISED CODE, INCLUDING A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OF UP TO 6 MONTHS, A FINE OF UP TO $1,000, OR BOTH. Witness my hand this ______ day of _________, _____ _____________________________________ Parent/Custodian/Guardian's Parent/Legal Custodian/Guardian's signature _____________________________________ Parent's signature _____________________________________ Grandparent designated as attorney in fact State of Ohio ) ) ss: County of _______________) Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me this ______ day of _________, _____________ _____________________________________ Notary Public Notices: 1. A power of attorney may be executed only if one of the following circumstances exists: (1) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child is: (a) Seriously ill, incarcerated, or about to be incarcerated; (b) Temporarily unable to provide financial support or parental guidance to the child; (c) Temporarily unable to provide adequate care and supervision of the child because of the parent's, guardian's, or legal custodian's physical or mental condition; (d) Homeless or without a residence because the current residence is destroyed or otherwise uninhabitable; or (e) In or about to enter a residential treatment program for substance abuse; (2) One of the child's parents is deceased and the other parent, with authority to do so, seeks to execute a power of attorney; or (3) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian has a well-founded belief that the power of attorney is in the child's best interest. 2. The signatures of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child and the grandparent designated as the attorney in fact must be notarized by an Ohio notary public. 3. A parent, guardian, or legal custodian who creates a power of attorney must notify the parent of the child who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child unless one of the following circumstances applies: (a) the parent is prohibited from receiving a notice of relocation in accordance with section 3109.051 sections 3109.0470 to 3109.0479 of the Revised Code of the creation of the power of attorney; (b) the parent's parental rights have been terminated by order of a juvenile court pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code; (c) the parent cannot be located with reasonable efforts; (d) both parents are executing the power of attorney. The notice must be sent by certified mail not later than five days after the power of attorney is created and must state the name and address of the person designated as the attorney in fact. 4. A parent, guardian, or legal custodian who creates a power of attorney must file it with the juvenile court of the county in which the attorney in fact resides, or any other court that has jurisdiction over the child under a previously filed motion or proceeding. The power of attorney must be filed not later than five days after the date it is created and be accompanied by a receipt showing that the notice of creation of the power of attorney was sent to the parent who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian by certified mail. 5. This power of attorney does not affect the rights of the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian regarding any future proceedings concerning the custody of the child or the allocation of the parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the child and does not give the attorney in fact legal custody of the child. 6. A person or entity that relies on this power of attorney, in good faith, has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation. 7. This power of attorney terminates on the occurrence of whichever of the following occurs first: (1) the power of attorney is revoked in writing by the person who created it and that person gives written notice of the revocation to the grandparent who is the attorney in fact and the juvenile court with which the power of attorney was filed; (2) the child ceases to live with the grandparent who is the attorney in fact; (3) the power of attorney is terminated by court order; (4) the death of the child who is the subject of the power of attorney; or (5) the death of the grandparent designated as the attorney in fact. If this power of attorney terminates other than by the death of the attorney in fact, the grandparent who served as the attorney in fact shall notify, in writing, all of the following: (a) Any schools, health care providers, or health insurance coverage provider with which the child has been involved through the grandparent; (b) Any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with the child or grandparent such that the other person or entity would reasonably rely on the power of attorney unless notified of the termination; (c) The court in which the power of attorney was filed after its creation; (d) The parent who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child who is required to be given notice of its creation. The grandparent shall make the notifications not later than one week after the date the power of attorney terminates. 8. If this power of attorney is terminated by written revocation of the person who created it, or the revocation is regarding a second or subsequent power of attorney, a copy of the revocation must be filed with the court with which that power of attorney was filed. Additional information: To the grandparent designated as attorney in fact: 1. If the child stops living with you, you are required to notify, in writing, any school, health care provider, or health care insurance provider to which you have given this power of attorney. You are also required to notify, in writing, any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with you or the child such that the person or entity would reasonably rely on the power of attorney unless notified. The notification must be made not later than one week after the child stops living with you. 2. You must include with the power of attorney the following information: (a) The child's present address, the addresses of the places where the child has lived within the last five years, and the name and present address of each person with whom the child has lived during that period; (b) Whether you have participated as a party, a witness, or in any other capacity in any other litigation, in this state or any other state, that concerned the allocation, between the parents of the same child, of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the child and the designation of the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child or that otherwise concerned the custody of the same child; (c) Whether you have information of any parenting proceeding concerning the child pending in a court of this or any other state; (d) Whether you know of any person who has physical custody of the child or claims to be a parent of the child who is designated the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child or to have parenting time rights with respect to the child or to be a person other than a parent or legal custodian of the child who has custody or visitation rights with respect to the child; (e) Whether you previously have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child's being an abused child or a neglected child or previously have been determined, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that was the basis of the adjudication. 3. If you receive written notice of revocation of the power of attorney or the parent, legal custodian, or guardian removes the child from your home and if you believe that the revocation or removal is not in the best interest of the child, you may, within fourteen days, file a complaint in the juvenile court to seek custody. You may retain physical custody of the child until the fourteen-day period elapses or, if you file a complaint, until the court orders otherwise. To school officials: 1. Except as provided in section 3313.649 of the Revised Code, this power of attorney, properly completed and notarized, authorizes the child in question to attend school in the district in which the grandparent designated as attorney in fact resides and that grandparent is authorized to provide consent in all school-related matters and to obtain from the school district educational and behavioral information about the child. This power of attorney does not preclude the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child from having access to all school records pertinent to the child. 2. The school district may require additional reasonable evidence that the grandparent lives in the school district. 3. A school district or school official that reasonably and in good faith relies on this power of attorney has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation. To health care providers: 1. A person or entity that acts in good faith reliance on a power of attorney to provide medical, psychological, or dental treatment, without actual knowledge of facts contrary to those stated in the power of attorney, is not subject to criminal liability or to civil liability to any person or entity, and is not subject to professional disciplinary action, solely for such reliance if the power of attorney is completed and the signatures of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child and the grandparent designated as attorney in fact are notarized. 2. The decision of a grandparent designated as attorney in fact, based on a power of attorney, shall be honored by a health care facility or practitioner, school district, or school official. Sec. 3109.55. (A) A person who creates a power of attorney under section 3109.52 of the Revised Code shall send notice of the creation to the parent or legal custodian of the child who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child unless one of the following is the case: (1) The parent or legal custodian is prohibited from receiving a notice of relocation in accordance with section 3109.051 3109.0474 of the Revised Code. (2) The parent's parental rights have been terminated by order of a juvenile court pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code. (3) The parent cannot be located with reasonable efforts. (4) The power of attorney is being created by both parents. (B) The notice shall be sent by certified mail not later than five days after the power of attorney is created. The notice shall state the name and address of the person designated as the attorney in fact. Sec. 3109.56. When a parent or legal custodian seeks to create a power of attorney pursuant to section 3109.52 of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (A) The power of attorney shall be executed by both parents or legal custodians if any of the following apply: (1) The parents are married to each other and are living as husband and wife. (2) The child is the subject of a shared parenting order issued pursuant to section 3109.04 of the Revised Code, as it existed prior to the amendment of this sectionof the Revised Code. (3) The child is the subject of a custody order issued pursuant to section 3109.04 of the Revised Code, as it existed prior to the amendment of this section, or a decree allocating parenting responsibilities under a parenting plan issued pursuant to sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code unless one of the following is the case: (a) The parent or legal custodian who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian is prohibited from receiving a notice of relocation in accordance with section 3109.051 3109.0474 of the Revised Code. (b) The parental rights of the parent or legal custodian who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian have been terminated by order of a juvenile court pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code. (c) The parent or legal custodian who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian cannot be located with reasonable efforts. (B) In all other cases, the power of attorney may be executed only by one of the following persons: (1) The parent or legal custodian who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child, as determined by court order or as provided in section 3109.042 of the Revised Codedesignated under a parenting plan; (2) The parent or legal custodian with whom the child is residing the majority of the school year in cases in which no court has issued an order designating a parent or legal custodian as the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child or section 3109.042 3109.0425 of the Revised Code is not applicable. Sec. 3109.58. (A) As used in this section, "temporary custody," "permanent custody," and "planned permanent living arrangement" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (B) A power of attorney created pursuant to section 3109.52 of the Revised Code may not be executed with respect to a child while any of the following proceedings are pending regarding the child: (1) A proceeding for the appointment of a guardian for, or the adoption of, the child; (2) A juvenile proceeding in which one of the following applies: (a) The temporary, permanent, or legal custody of the child or the placement of the child in a planned permanent living arrangement has been requested. (b) The child is the subject of an ex parte emergency custody order issued under division (D) of section 2151.31 of the Revised Code, and no hearing has yet been held regarding the child under division (A) of section 2151.314 of the Revised Code. (c) The child is the subject of a temporary custody order issued under section 2151.33 of the Revised Code. (3) A proceeding for divorce, dissolution, legal separation, annulment, or pertaining to the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities regarding the child. Sec. 3109.60. When a power of attorney created pursuant to section 3109.52 of the Revised Code terminates pursuant to division (A)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 3109.59 of the Revised Code, the grandparent designated as the attorney in fact shall notify, in writing, all of the following: (A) The school district in which the child attends school; (B) The child's health care providers; (C) The child's health insurance coverage provider; (D) The court in which the power of attorney was filed under section 3109.74 of the Revised Code; (E) The parent or legal custodian who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian and who is required to be given notice under section 3109.55 of the Revised Code; (F) Any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with the child or grandparent such that the person or entity would reasonably rely on the power of attorney unless notified of the termination. The grandparent shall make the notifications not later than one week after the date the power of attorney terminates. Sec. 3109.65. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, if a child is living with a grandparent who has made reasonable attempts to locate and contact both of the child's parents, or the child's guardian or legal custodian, but has been unable to do so, the grandparent may obtain authority to exercise care, physical custody, and control of the child including authority to enroll the child in school, to discuss with the school district the child's educational progress, to consent to all school-related matters regarding the child, and to consent to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child by executing a caretaker authorization affidavit in accordance with section 3109.67 of the Revised Code. (B) The grandparent may execute a caretaker authorization affidavit without attempting to locate the following parent: (1) If paternity has not been established with regard to the child, the child's father. (2) If the child is the subject of a custody order, the following parent: (a) A parent who is prohibited from receiving a notice of relocation in accordance with section 3109.051 3109.0474 of the Revised Code; (b) A parent whose parental rights have been terminated by order of a juvenile court pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.66. The caretaker authorization affidavit that a grandparent described in section 3109.65 of the Revised Code may execute shall be identical in form and content to the following: CARETAKER AUTHORIZATION AFFIDAVIT Use of this affidavit is authorized by sections 3109.65 to 3109.73 of the Ohio Revised Code. Completion of items 1-7 and the signing and notarization of this affidavit is sufficient to authorize the grandparent signing to exercise care, physical custody, and control of the child who is its subject, including authority to enroll the child in school, to discuss with the school district the child's educational progress, to consent to all school-related matters regarding the child, and to consent to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child. The child named below lives in my home, I am 18 years of age or older, and I am the child's grandparent. 1. Name of child: 2. Child's date and year of birth: 3. Child's social security number (optional): 4. My name: 5. My home address: 6. My date and year of birth: 7. My Ohio driver's license number or identification card number: 8. Despite having made reasonable attempts, I am either: (a) Unable to locate or contact the child's parents, or the child's guardian or legal custodian; or (b) I am unable to locate or contact one of the child's parents and I am not required to contact the other parent because paternity has not been established; or (c) I am unable to locate or contact one of the child's parents and I am not required to contact the other parent because there is a custody order regarding the child and one of the following is the case: (i) The parent has been prohibited from receiving notice of a relocation; or (ii) The parental rights of the parent have been terminated. 9. I hereby certify that this affidavit is not being executed for the purpose of enrolling the child in a school or school district so that the child may participate in the academic or interscholastic athletic programs provided by that school or district. WARNING: DO NOT SIGN THIS FORM IF ANY OF THE ABOVE STATEMENTS ARE INCORRECT. FALSIFICATION IS A CRIME UNDER SECTION 2921.13 OF THE REVISED CODE, PUNISHABLE BY THE SANCTIONS UNDER CHAPTER 2929. OF THE REVISED CODE, INCLUDING A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OF UP TO 6 MONTHS, A FINE OF UP TO $1,000, OR BOTH. I declare that the foregoing is true and correct: Signed:__________________________Date:___________________ Grandparent State of Ohio ) ) ss: County of _______________) Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me this ______ day of _________, _____________ _____________________________________ Notary Public Notices: 1. The grandparent's signature must be notarized by an Ohio notary public. 2. The grandparent who executed this affidavit must file it with the juvenile court of the county in which the grandparent resides or any other court that has jurisdiction over the child under a previously filed motion or proceeding not later than five days after the date it is executed. 3. This affidavit does not affect the rights of the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian regarding the care, physical custody, and control of the child, and does not give the grandparent legal custody of the child. 4. A person or entity that relies on this affidavit, in good faith, has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation. 5. This affidavit terminates on the occurrence of whichever of the following occurs first: (1) the child ceases to live with the grandparent who signs this form; (2) the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child acts to negate, reverse, or otherwise disapprove an action or decision of the grandparent who signed this affidavit, and the grandparent either voluntarily returns the child to the physical custody of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian or fails to file a complaint to seek custody within fourteen days; (3) the affidavit is terminated by court order; (4) the death of the child who is the subject of the affidavit; or (5) the death of the grandparent who executed the affidavit. A parent, guardian, or legal custodian may negate, reverse, or disapprove a grandparent's action or decision only by delivering written notice of negation, reversal, or disapproval to the grandparent and the person acting on the grandparent's action or decision in reliance on this affidavit. If this affidavit terminates other than by the death of the grandparent, the grandparent who signed this affidavit shall notify, in writing, all of the following: (a) Any schools, health care providers, or health insurance coverage provider with which the child has been involved through the grandparent; (b) Any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with the child or grandparent such that the person or entity would reasonably rely on the affidavit unless notified of the termination; (c) The court in which the affidavit was filed after its creation. The grandparent shall make the notifications not later than one week after the date the affidavit terminates. 6. The decision of a grandparent to consent to or to refuse medical treatment or school enrollment for a child is superseded by a contrary decision of a parent, legal custodian, or guardian of the child, unless the decision of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian would jeopardize the life, health, or safety of the child. Additional information: To caretakers: 1. If the child stops living with you, you are required to notify, in writing, any school, health care provider, or health care insurance provider to which you have given this affidavit. You are also required to notify, in writing, any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with you or the child such that the person or entity would reasonably rely on the affidavit unless notified. The notifications must be made not later than one week after the child stops living with you. 2. If you do not have the information requested in item 7 (Ohio driver's license or identification card), provide another form of identification such as your social security number or medicaid number. 3. You must include with the caretaker authorization affidavit the following information: (a) The child's present address, the addresses of the places where the child has lived within the last five years, and the name and present address of each person with whom the child has lived during that period; (b) Whether you have participated as a party, a witness, or in any other capacity in any other litigation, in this state or any other state, that concerned the allocation, between the parents of the same child, of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the child and the designation of the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child or that otherwise concerned the custody of the same child; (c) Whether you have information of any parenting proceeding concerning the child pending in a court of this or any other state; (d) Whether you know of any person who has physical custody of the child or claims to be a parent or legal custodian of the child who is designated the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child or to have parenting time rights with respect to the child or to be a person other than a parent or legal custodian of the child who has custody or visitation rights with respect to the child; (e) Whether you previously have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child's being an abused child or a neglected child or previously have been determined, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that was the basis of the adjudication. 4. If the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian acts to terminate the caretaker authorization affidavit by delivering a written notice of negation, reversal, or disapproval of an action or decision of yours or removes the child from your home and if you believe that the termination or removal is not in the best interest of the child, you may, within fourteen days, file a complaint in the juvenile court to seek custody. You may retain physical custody of the child until the fourteen-day period elapses or, if you file a complaint, until the court orders otherwise. To school officials: 1. This affidavit, properly completed and notarized, authorizes the child in question to attend school in the district in which the grandparent who signed this affidavit resides and the grandparent is authorized to provide consent in all school-related matters and to discuss with the school district the child's educational progress. This affidavit does not preclude the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child from having access to all school records pertinent to the child. 2. The school district may require additional reasonable evidence that the grandparent lives at the address provided in item 5 of the affidavit. 3. A school district or school official that reasonably and in good faith relies on this affidavit has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation. 4. The act of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child to negate, reverse, or otherwise disapprove an action or decision of the grandparent who signed this affidavit constitutes termination of this affidavit. A parent, guardian, or legal custodian may negate, reverse, or disapprove a grandparent's action or decision only by delivering written notice of negation, reversal, or disapproval to the grandparent and the person acting on the grandparent's action or decision in reliance on this affidavit. To health care providers: 1. A person or entity that acts in good faith reliance on a CARETAKER AUTHORIZATION AFFIDAVIT to provide medical, psychological, or dental treatment, without actual knowledge of facts contrary to those stated in the affidavit, is not subject to criminal liability or to civil liability to any person or entity, and is not subject to professional disciplinary action, solely for such reliance if the applicable portions of the form are completed and the grandparent's signature is notarized. 2. The decision of a grandparent, based on a CARETAKER AUTHORIZATION AFFIDAVIT, shall be honored by a health care facility or practitioner, school district, or school official unless the health care facility or practitioner or educational facility or official has actual knowledge that a parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a child has made a contravening decision to consent to or to refuse medical treatment for the child. 3. The act of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child to negate, reverse, or otherwise disapprove an action or decision of the grandparent who signed this affidavit constitutes termination of this affidavit. A parent, guardian, or legal custodian may negate, reverse, or disapprove a grandparent's action or decision only by delivering written notice of negation, reversal, or disapproval to the grandparent and the person acting on the grandparent's action or decision in reliance on this affidavit. Sec. 3109.68. (A) As used in this section, "temporary custody," "permanent custody," and "planned permanent living arrangement" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (B) A caretaker authorization affidavit may not be executed with respect to a child while any of the following proceedings are pending regarding the child: (1) A proceeding for the appointment of a guardian for, or the adoption of, the child; (2) A juvenile proceeding in which one of the following applies: (a) The temporary, permanent, or legal custody of the child or the placement of the child in a planned permanent living arrangement has been requested. (b) The child is the subject of an ex parte emergency custody order issued under division (D) of section 2151.31 of the Revised Code, and no hearing has yet been held regarding the child under division (A) of section 2151.314 of the Revised Code. (c) The child is the subject of a temporary custody order issued under section 2151.33 of the Revised Code. (3) A proceeding for divorce, dissolution, legal separation, annulment, or pertaining to the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities regarding the child. Sec. 3109.74. (A) A person who creates a power of attorney under section 3109.52 of the Revised Code or executes a caretaker authorization affidavit under section 3109.67 of the Revised Code shall file the power of attorney or affidavit with the juvenile court of the county in which the grandparent designated as attorney in fact or grandparent who executed the affidavit resides or any other court that has jurisdiction over the child under a previously filed motion or proceeding. The power of attorney or affidavit shall be filed not later than five days after the date it is created or executed and may be sent to the court by certified mail. (B) A power of attorney filed under this section shall be accompanied by a receipt showing that the notice of creation of the power of attorney was sent to the parent or legal custodian who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian by certified mail under section 3109.55 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The grandparent designated as attorney in fact or the grandparent who executed the affidavit shall include with the power of attorney or the caretaker authorization affidavit the information described in section 3109.27 of the Revised Code. (2) If the grandparent provides information that the grandparent previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being an abused child or a neglected child or previously has been determined, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that was the basis of the adjudication, the court may report that information to the public children services agency pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. Upon the receipt of that information, the public children services agency shall initiate an investigation pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. (3) If the court has reason to believe that a power of attorney or caretaker authorization affidavit is not in the best interest of the child, the court may report that information to the public children services agency pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of that information, the public children services agency shall initiate an investigation pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. The public children services agency shall submit a report of its investigation to the court not later than thirty days after the court reports the information to the public children services agency or not later than forty-five days after the court reports the information to the public children services agency when information that is needed to determine the case disposition cannot be compiled within thirty days and the reasons are documented in the case record. (D) The court shall waive any filing fee imposed for the filing of the power of attorney or caretaker authorization affidavit. Sec. 3111.13. (A) The judgment or order of the court determining the existence or nonexistence of the parent and child relationship is determinative for all purposes. (B) If the judgment or order of the court is at variance with the child's birth record, the court may order that a new birth record be issued under section 3111.18 of the Revised Code. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the judgment or order may contain, at the request of a party and if not prohibited under federal law, any other provision directed against the appropriate towards a party to the proceeding, concerning including the allocation of parenting responsibilities, the duty of support, the payment of all or any part of the reasonable expenses of the mother's pregnancy and confinement, the furnishing of bond or other security for the payment of the judgment, or any other matter in the best interest of the child. After entry of the judgment or order, the father may petition that he be designated the residential parent and legal custodian of the child or for parenting time rights in a proceeding separate from any action to establish paternity. Additionally, if the mother is unmarried, the father may file a complaint requesting the granting of reasonable parenting time rights, and the parents of the father, any relative of the father, the parents of the mother, and any relative of the mother may file a complaint requesting the granting of reasonable companionship or visitation rights, with the child pursuant to section 3109.12 of the Revised Code. The judgment or order shall contain any provision required by section 3111.14 of the Revised Code. (D) Support judgments or orders ordinarily shall be for periodic payments that may vary in amount. In the best interest of the child, the purchase of an annuity may be ordered in lieu of periodic payments of support if the purchase agreement provides that any remaining principal will be transferred to the ownership and control of the child on the child's attainment of the age of majority. (E) In determining the amount to be paid by a parent for support of the child and the period during which the duty of support is owed, a court enforcing the obligation of support shall comply with Chapters 3119., 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code. (F)(1) Any court that makes or modifies an order for child support under this section shall comply with Chapters 3119., 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code. If any person required to pay child support under an order made under this section on or after April 15, 1985, or modified on or after December 1, 1986, is found in contempt of court for failure to make support payments under the order, the court that makes the finding, in addition to any other penalty or remedy imposed, shall assess all court costs arising out of the contempt proceeding against the person and require the person to pay any reasonable attorney's fees of any adverse party, as determined by the court, that arose in relation to the act of contempt. (2) When a court determines whether to require a parent to pay an amount for that parent's failure to support a child prior to the date the court issues an order requiring that parent to pay an amount for the current support of that child, it shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, any monetary contribution either parent of the child made to the support of the child prior to the court issuing the order requiring the parent to pay an amount for the current support of the child. (3)(a) A court shall not require a parent to pay an amount for that parent's failure to support a child prior to the date the court issues an order requiring that parent to pay an amount for the current support of that child or to pay all or any part of the reasonable expenses of the mother's pregnancy and confinement, if both of the following apply: (i) At the time of the initial filing of an action to determine the existence of the parent and child relationship with respect to that parent, the child was over three years of age. (ii) Prior to the initial filing of an action to determine the existence of the parent and child relationship with respect to that parent, the alleged father had no knowledge and had no reason to have knowledge of his alleged paternity of the child. (b) For purposes of division (F)(4)(a)(ii) of this section, the mother of the child may establish that the alleged father had or should have had knowledge of the paternity of the child by showing, by a preponderance of the evidence, that she performed a reasonable and documented effort to contact and notify the alleged father of his paternity of the child. (c) A party is entitled to obtain modification of an existing order for arrearages under this division regardless of whether the judgment, court order, or administrative support order from which relief is sought was issued prior to, on, or after October 27, 2000. (G) As used in this section, "birth record" has the same meaning as in section 3705.01 of the Revised Code. (H) Unless the court has reason to believe that a person named in the order is a potential victim of domestic violence, any order issued pursuant to this section finding the existence of a parent and child relationship shall contain the full names, addresses, and social security numbers of the mother and father of the child and the full name and address of the child. Sec. 3111.26. After an acknowledgment of paternity becomes final and enforceable, the child is the child of the man who signed the acknowledgment of paternity, as though born to him in lawful wedlock. If the mother is unmarried, the man who signed the acknowledgment of paternity may file a complaint requesting the granting of reasonable allocation of parenting time with the child under section 3109.12 responsibilities under sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code and the parents of the man who signed the acknowledgment of paternity, any relative of the man who signed the acknowledgment of paternity, the parents of the mother, and any relative of the mother may file a complaint pursuant to that section requesting the granting of reasonable companionship or visitation rights with the child. Once the acknowledgment becomes final the man who signed the acknowledgment of paternity assumes the parental duty of support. Sec. 3111.381. (A) Except as provided in divisions (B), (C), (D), (E), and (F) of this section, no person may bring an action under sections 3111.01 to 3111.18 of the Revised Code unless the person has requested an administrative determination under section 3111.38 of the Revised Code of the existence or nonexistence of a parent and child relationship. (B) An action to determine the existence or nonexistence of a parent and child relationship may be brought by the child's mother in the appropriate division of the court of common pleas in the county in which the child resides, without requesting an administrative determination, if the child's mother brings the action in order to request an order to determine the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities, the payment of all or any part of the reasonable expenses of the mother's pregnancy and confinement, or support of the child. The clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the complaint to the child support enforcement agency of the county in which the complaint is filed. (C) An action to determine the existence or nonexistence of a parent and child relationship may be brought by the putative father of the child in the appropriate division of the court of common pleas in the county in which the child resides, without requesting an administrative determination, if the putative father brings the action in order to request an order to determine the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities. The clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the complaint to the child support enforcement agency of the county in which the complaint is filed. (D) An action to determine the existence or nonexistence of a parent and child relationship may be brought by the caretaker of the child in the appropriate division of the court of common pleas in the county in which the child resides, without requesting an administrative determination, if the caretaker brings the action in order to request support of the child. The clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the complaint to the child support enforcement agency of the county in which the complaint is filed. (E) If services are requested by the court, under divisions (B), (C), and (D) of this section, of the child support enforcement agency to determine the existence or nonexistence of a parent and child relationship, a Title IV-D application must be completed and delivered to the child support enforcement agency. (F) If the alleged father of a child is deceased and proceedings for the probate of the estate of the alleged father have been or can be commenced, the court with jurisdiction over the probate proceedings shall retain jurisdiction to determine the existence or nonexistence of a parent and child relationship between the alleged father and any child without an administrative determination being requested from a child support enforcement agency. If an action for divorce, dissolution of marriage, or legal separation, or annulment, or an action under section 2151.231 or 2151.232 of the Revised Code requesting an order requiring the payment of child support and provision for the health care of a child, has been filed in a court of common pleas and a question as to the existence or nonexistence of a parent and child relationship arises, the court in which the original action was filed shall retain jurisdiction to determine the existence or nonexistence of the parent and child relationship without an administrative determination being requested from a child support enforcement agency. If a juvenile court or other court with jurisdiction under section 2101.022 or 2301.03 of the Revised Code issues a support order under section 2151.231 or 2151.232 of the Revised Code relying on a presumption under section 3111.03 of the Revised Code, the juvenile court or other court with jurisdiction that issued the support order shall retain jurisdiction if a question as to the existence of a parent and child relationship arises. Sec. 3113.31. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Domestic violence" means any of the following: (a) The occurrence of one or more of the following acts against a family or household member: (i) Attempting to cause or recklessly causing bodily injury; (ii) Placing another person by the threat of force in fear of imminent serious physical harm or committing a violation of section 2903.211 or 2911.211 of the Revised Code; (iii) Committing any act with respect to a child that would result in the child being an abused child, as defined in section 2151.031 of the Revised Code; (iv) Committing a sexually oriented offense. (b) The occurrence of one or more of the acts identified in divisions (A)(1)(a)(i) to (iv) of this section against a person with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship. (2) "Court" means the domestic relations division of the court of common pleas in counties that have a domestic relations division and the court of common pleas in counties that do not have a domestic relations division, or the juvenile division of the court of common pleas of the county in which the person to be protected by a protection order issued or a consent agreement approved under this section resides if the respondent is less than eighteen years of age. (3) "Family or household member" means any of the following: (a) Any of the following who is residing with or has resided with the respondent: (i) A spouse, a person living as a spouse, or a former spouse of the respondent; (ii) A parent, a foster parent, or a child of the respondent, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to the respondent; (iii) A parent or a child of a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of the respondent, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of the respondent. (b) The natural parent of any child of whom the respondent is the other natural parent or is the putative other natural parent. (4) "Person living as a spouse" means a person who is living or has lived with the respondent in a common law marital relationship, who otherwise is cohabiting with the respondent, or who otherwise has cohabited with the respondent within five years prior to the date of the alleged occurrence of the act in question. (5) "Victim advocate" means a person who provides support and assistance for a person who files a petition under this section. (6) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Companion animal" has the same meaning as in section 959.131 of the Revised Code. (8) "Dating relationship" means a relationship between individuals who have, or have had, a relationship of a romantic or intimate nature. "Dating relationship" does not include a casual acquaintanceship or ordinary fraternization in a business or social context. (9) "Person with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship" means an individual who, at the time of the conduct in question, is in a dating relationship with the respondent who is an adult or who, within the twelve months preceding the conduct in question, has had a dating relationship with the respondent who is an adult. (B) The court has jurisdiction over all proceedings under this section. The petitioner's right to relief under this section is not affected by the petitioner's leaving the residence or household to avoid further domestic violence. (C) A person may seek relief under this section on the person's own behalf, or any parent or adult household member may seek relief under this section on behalf of any other family or household member, by filing a petition with the court. The petition shall contain or state: (1) An allegation that the respondent engaged in domestic violence against a family or household member of the respondent or against a person with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship, including a description of the nature and extent of the domestic violence; (2) The relationship of the respondent to the petitioner, and to the victim if other than the petitioner; (3) If the petition is for protection of a person with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship, the facts upon which the court may conclude that a dating relationship existed between the person to be protected and the respondent; (4) A request for relief under this section. (D)(1) If a person who files a petition pursuant to this section requests an ex parte order, the court shall hold an ex parte hearing on the same day that the petition is filed. The court, for good cause shown at the ex parte hearing, may enter any temporary orders, with or without bond, including, but not limited to, an order described in division (E)(1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section, that the court finds necessary to protect the family or household member or the person with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship from domestic violence. Immediate and present danger of domestic violence to the family or household member or to the person with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship constitutes good cause for purposes of this section. Immediate and present danger includes, but is not limited to, situations in which the respondent has threatened the family or household member or person with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship with bodily harm, in which the respondent has threatened the family or household member or person with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship with a sexually oriented offense, or in which the respondent previously has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been adjudicated a delinquent child for an offense that constitutes domestic violence against the family or household member or person with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship. (2)(a) If the court, after an ex parte hearing, issues an order described in division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of this section, the court shall schedule a full hearing for a date that is within seven court days after the ex parte hearing. If any other type of protection order that is authorized under division (E) of this section is issued by the court after an ex parte hearing, the court shall schedule a full hearing for a date that is within ten court days after the ex parte hearing. The court shall give the respondent notice of, and an opportunity to be heard at, the full hearing. The court shall hold the full hearing on the date scheduled under this division unless the court grants a continuance of the hearing in accordance with this division. Under any of the following circumstances or for any of the following reasons, the court may grant a continuance of the full hearing to a reasonable time determined by the court: (i) Prior to the date scheduled for the full hearing under this division, the respondent has not been served with the petition filed pursuant to this section and notice of the full hearing. (ii) The parties consent to the continuance. (iii) The continuance is needed to allow a party to obtain counsel. (iv) The continuance is needed for other good cause. (b) An ex parte order issued under this section does not expire because of a failure to serve notice of the full hearing upon the respondent before the date set for the full hearing under division (D)(2)(a) of this section or because the court grants a continuance under that division. (3) If a person who files a petition pursuant to this section does not request an ex parte order, or if a person requests an ex parte order but the court does not issue an ex parte order after an ex parte hearing, the court shall proceed as in a normal civil action and grant a full hearing on the matter. (E)(1) After an ex parte or full hearing, the court may grant any protection order, with or without bond, or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of domestic violence against the family or household members or persons with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship. The order or agreement may: (a) Direct the respondent to refrain from abusing or from committing sexually oriented offenses against the family or household members or persons with whom the respondent is or was in a dating relationship; (b) With respect to a petition involving family or household members, grant possession of the residence or household to the petitioner or other family or household member, to the exclusion of the respondent, by evicting the respondent, when the residence or household is owned or leased solely by the petitioner or other family or household member, or by ordering the respondent to vacate the premises, when the residence or household is jointly owned or leased by the respondent, and the petitioner or other family or household member; (c) With respect to a petition involving family or household members, when the respondent has a duty to support the petitioner or other family or household member living in the residence or household and the respondent is the sole owner or lessee of the residence or household, grant possession of the residence or household to the petitioner or other family or household member, to the exclusion of the respondent, by ordering the respondent to vacate the premises, or, in the case of a consent agreement, allow the respondent to provide suitable, alternative housing; (d) With respect to a petition involving family or household members, temporarily allocate parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of, or establish temporary parenting time rights with regard to, minor children, if no other court has determined, or is determining, the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the minor children or parenting time rights; (e) With respect to a petition involving family or household members, require the respondent to maintain support, if the respondent customarily provides for or contributes to the support of the family or household member, or if the respondent has a duty to support the petitioner or family or household member; (f) Require the respondent, petitioner, victim of domestic violence, or any combination of those persons, to seek counseling; (g) Require the respondent to refrain from entering the residence, school, business, or place of employment of the petitioner or, with respect to a petition involving family or household members, a family or household member; (h) Grant other relief that the court considers equitable and fair, including, but not limited to, ordering the respondent to permit the use of a motor vehicle by the petitioner or, with respect to a petition involving family or household members, other family or household members and the apportionment of household and family personal property; (i) Require that the respondent not remove, damage, hide, harm, or dispose of any companion animal owned or possessed by the petitioner; (j) Authorize the petitioner to remove a companion animal owned by the petitioner from the possession of the respondent; (k) Require a wireless service transfer in accordance with sections 3113.45 to 3113.459 of the Revised Code. (2) If a protection order has been issued pursuant to this section in a prior action involving the respondent and the petitioner or, with respect to a petition involving family or household members, one or more of the family or household members or victims, the court may include in a protection order that it issues a prohibition against the respondent returning to the residence or household. If it includes a prohibition against the respondent returning to the residence or household in the order, it also shall include in the order provisions of the type described in division (E)(7) of this section. This division does not preclude the court from including in a protection order or consent agreement, in circumstances other than those described in this division, a requirement that the respondent be evicted from or vacate the residence or household or refrain from entering the residence, school, business, or place of employment of the petitioner or, with respect to a petition involving family or household members, a family or household member, and, if the court includes any requirement of that type in an order or agreement, the court also shall include in the order provisions of the type described in division (E)(7) of this section. (3)(a) Any protection order issued or consent agreement approved under this section shall be valid until a date certain, but not later than five years from the date of its issuance or approval, or not later than the date a respondent who is less than eighteen years of age attains nineteen years of age, unless modified or terminated as provided in division (E)(8) of this section. (b) With respect to an order involving family or household members, subject to the limitation on the duration of an order or agreement set forth in division (E)(3)(a) of this section, any order under division (E)(1)(d) of this section shall terminate on the date that a court in an action for divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or legal separation brought by the petitioner or respondent issues an order allocating parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of children or on the date that a juvenile court in an action brought by the petitioner or respondent issues an order awarding legal custody of minor children. Subject to the limitation on the duration of an order or agreement set forth in division (E)(3)(a) of this section, any order under division (E)(1)(e) of this section shall terminate on the date that a court in an action for divorce, dissolution of marriage, or legal separation brought by the petitioner or respondent issues a support order or on the date that a juvenile court in an action brought by the petitioner or respondent issues a support order. (c) Any protection order issued or consent agreement approved pursuant to this section may be renewed in the same manner as the original order or agreement was issued or approved. (4) A court may not issue a protection order that requires a petitioner to do or to refrain from doing an act that the court may require a respondent to do or to refrain from doing under division (E)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (g), or (h) of this section unless all of the following apply: (a) The respondent files a separate petition for a protection order in accordance with this section. (b) The petitioner is served notice of the respondent's petition at least forty-eight hours before the court holds a hearing with respect to the respondent's petition, or the petitioner waives the right to receive this notice. (c) If the petitioner has requested an ex parte order pursuant to division (D) of this section, the court does not delay any hearing required by that division beyond the time specified in that division in order to consolidate the hearing with a hearing on the petition filed by the respondent. (d) After a full hearing at which the respondent presents evidence in support of the request for a protection order and the petitioner is afforded an opportunity to defend against that evidence, the court determines that the petitioner has committed an act of domestic violence or has violated a temporary protection order issued pursuant to section 2919.26 of the Revised Code, that both the petitioner and the respondent acted primarily as aggressors, and that neither the petitioner nor the respondent acted primarily in self-defense. (5) No protection order issued or consent agreement approved under this section shall in any manner affect title to any real property. (6)(a) With respect to an order involving family or household members, if a petitioner, or the child of a petitioner, who obtains a protection order or consent agreement pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section or a temporary protection order pursuant to section 2919.26 of the Revised Code and is the subject of a parenting time order issued pursuant to a parenting plan as described in section 3109.051 3109.044 of the Revised Code or issued pursuant to section 3109.12 of the Revised Code or division (E)(1)(d) of this section or a visitation or companionship or visitation order issued pursuant to section 3109.051, 3109.054, 3109.11, or 3109.12 of the Revised Code or division (E)(1)(d) of this section granting parenting time rights to the respondent, the court may require the public children services agency of the county in which the court is located to provide supervision of the respondent's exercise of parenting time under a parenting plan or visitation or companionship or visitation rights with respect to the child for a period not to exceed nine months, if the court makes the following findings of fact: (i) The child is in danger from the respondent; (ii) No other person or agency is available to provide the supervision. (b) A court that requires an agency to provide supervision pursuant to division (E)(6)(a) of this section shall order the respondent to reimburse the agency for the cost of providing the supervision, if it determines that the respondent has sufficient income or resources to pay that cost. (7)(a) If a protection order issued or consent agreement approved under this section includes a requirement that the respondent be evicted from or vacate the residence or household or refrain from entering the residence, school, business, or place of employment of the petitioner or, with respect to a petition involving family or household members, a family or household member, the order or agreement shall state clearly that the order or agreement cannot be waived or nullified by an invitation to the respondent from the petitioner or other family or household member to enter the residence, school, business, or place of employment or by the respondent's entry into one of those places otherwise upon the consent of the petitioner or other family or household member. (b) Division (E)(7)(a) of this section does not limit any discretion of a court to determine that a respondent charged with a violation of section 2919.27 of the Revised Code, with a violation of a municipal ordinance substantially equivalent to that section, or with contempt of court, which charge is based on an alleged violation of a protection order issued or consent agreement approved under this section, did not commit the violation or was not in contempt of court. (8)(a) The court may modify or terminate as provided in division (E)(8) of this section a protection order or consent agreement that was issued after a full hearing under this section. The court that issued the protection order or approved the consent agreement shall hear a motion for modification or termination of the protection order or consent agreement pursuant to division (E)(8) of this section. (b) Either the petitioner or the respondent of the original protection order or consent agreement may bring a motion for modification or termination of a protection order or consent agreement that was issued or approved after a full hearing. The court shall require notice of the motion to be made as provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure. If the petitioner for the original protection order or consent agreement has requested that the petitioner's address be kept confidential, the court shall not disclose the address to the respondent of the original protection order or consent agreement or any other person, except as otherwise required by law. The moving party has the burden of proof to show, by a preponderance of the evidence, that modification or termination of the protection order or consent agreement is appropriate because either the protection order or consent agreement is no longer needed or because the terms of the original protection order or consent agreement are no longer appropriate. (c) In considering whether to modify or terminate a protection order or consent agreement issued or approved under this section, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the following: (i) Whether the petitioner consents to modification or termination of the protection order or consent agreement; (ii) Whether the petitioner fears the respondent; (iii) The current nature of the relationship between the petitioner and the respondent; (iv) The circumstances of the petitioner and respondent, including the relative proximity of the petitioner's and respondent's workplaces and residences and whether the petitioner and respondent have minor children together; (v) Whether the respondent has complied with the terms and conditions of the original protection order or consent agreement; (vi) Whether the respondent has a continuing involvement with illegal drugs or alcohol; (vii) Whether the respondent has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been adjudicated a delinquent child for an offense of violence since the issuance of the protection order or approval of the consent agreement; (viii) Whether any other protection orders, consent agreements, restraining orders, or no contact orders have been issued against the respondent pursuant to this section, section 2919.26 of the Revised Code, any other provision of state law, or the law of any other state; (ix) Whether the respondent has participated in any domestic violence treatment, intervention program, or other counseling addressing domestic violence and whether the respondent has completed the treatment, program, or counseling; (x) The time that has elapsed since the protection order was issued or since the consent agreement was approved; (xi) The age and health of the respondent; (xii) When the last incident of abuse, threat of harm, or commission of a sexually oriented offense occurred or other relevant information concerning the safety and protection of the petitioner or other protected parties. (d) If a protection order or consent agreement is modified or terminated as provided in division (E)(8) of this section, the court shall issue copies of the modified or terminated order or agreement as provided in division (F) of this section. A petitioner may also provide notice of the modification or termination to the judicial and law enforcement officials in any county other than the county in which the order or agreement is modified or terminated as provided in division (N) of this section. (e) If the respondent moves for modification or termination of a protection order or consent agreement pursuant to this section and the court denies the motion, the court may assess costs against the respondent for the filing of the motion. (9) Any protection order issued or any consent agreement approved pursuant to this section shall include a provision that the court will automatically seal all of the records of the proceeding in which the order is issued or agreement approved on the date the respondent attains the age of nineteen years unless the petitioner provides the court with evidence that the respondent has not complied with all of the terms of the protection order or consent agreement. The protection order or consent agreement shall specify the date when the respondent attains the age of nineteen years. (F)(1) A copy of any protection order, or consent agreement, that is issued, approved, modified, or terminated under this section shall be issued by the court to the petitioner, to the respondent, and to all law enforcement agencies that have jurisdiction to enforce the order or agreement. The court shall direct that a copy of an order be delivered to the respondent on the same day that the order is entered. (2) Upon the issuance of a protection order or the approval of a consent agreement under this section, the court shall provide the parties to the order or agreement with the following notice orally or by form: "NOTICE As a result of this order or consent agreement, it may be unlawful for you to possess or purchase a firearm, including a rifle, pistol, or revolver, or ammunition pursuant to federal law under 18 U.S.C. 922(g)(8) for the duration of this order or consent agreement. If you have any questions whether this law makes it illegal for you to possess or purchase a firearm or ammunition, you should consult an attorney." (3) All law enforcement agencies shall establish and maintain an index for the protection orders and the approved consent agreements delivered to the agencies pursuant to division (F)(1) of this section. With respect to each order and consent agreement delivered, each agency shall note on the index the date and time that it received the order or consent agreement. (4) Regardless of whether the petitioner has registered the order or agreement in the county in which the officer's agency has jurisdiction pursuant to division (N) of this section, any officer of a law enforcement agency shall enforce a protection order issued or consent agreement approved by any court in this state in accordance with the provisions of the order or agreement, including removing the respondent from the premises, if appropriate. (G)(1) Any proceeding under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure, except that an order under this section may be obtained with or without bond. An order issued under this section, other than an ex parte order, that grants a protection order or approves a consent agreement, that refuses to grant a protection order or approve a consent agreement that modifies or terminates a protection order or consent agreement, or that refuses to modify or terminate a protection order or consent agreement, is a final, appealable order. The remedies and procedures provided in this section are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other available civil or criminal remedies. (2) If as provided in division (G)(1) of this section an order issued under this section, other than an ex parte order, refuses to grant a protection order, the court, on its own motion, shall order that the ex parte order issued under this section and all of the records pertaining to that ex parte order be sealed after either of the following occurs: (a) No party has exercised the right to appeal pursuant to Rule 4 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure. (b) All appellate rights have been exhausted. (H) The filing of proceedings under this section does not excuse a person from filing any report or giving any notice required by section 2151.421 of the Revised Code or by any other law. When a petition under this section alleges domestic violence against minor children, the court shall report the fact, or cause reports to be made, to a county, township, or municipal peace officer under section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. (I) Any law enforcement agency that investigates a domestic dispute shall provide information to the family or household members involved, or the persons in the dating relationship who are involved, whichever is applicable regarding the relief available under this section and, for family or household members, section 2919.26 of the Revised Code. (J)(1) Subject to divisions (E)(8)(e) and (J)(2) of this section and regardless of whether a protection order is issued or a consent agreement is approved by a court of another county or a court of another state, no court or unit of state or local government shall charge the petitioner any fee, cost, deposit, or money in connection with the filing of a petition pursuant to this section or in connection with the filing, issuance, registration, modification, enforcement, dismissal, withdrawal, or service of a protection order, consent agreement, or witness subpoena or for obtaining a certified copy of a protection order or consent agreement. (2) Regardless of whether a protection order is issued or a consent agreement is approved pursuant to this section, the court may assess costs against the respondent in connection with the filing, issuance, registration, modification, enforcement, dismissal, withdrawal, or service of a protection order, consent agreement, or witness subpoena or for obtaining a certified copy of a protection order or consent agreement. (K)(1) The court shall comply with Chapters 3119., 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code when it makes or modifies an order for child support under this section. (2) If any person required to pay child support under an order made under this section on or after April 15, 1985, or modified under this section on or after December 31, 1986, is found in contempt of court for failure to make support payments under the order, the court that makes the finding, in addition to any other penalty or remedy imposed, shall assess all court costs arising out of the contempt proceeding against the person and require the person to pay any reasonable attorney's fees of any adverse party, as determined by the court, that arose in relation to the act of contempt. (L)(1) A person who violates a protection order issued or a consent agreement approved under this section is subject to the following sanctions: (a) Criminal prosecution or a delinquent child proceeding for a violation of section 2919.27 of the Revised Code, if the violation of the protection order or consent agreement constitutes a violation of that section; (b) Punishment for contempt of court. (2) The punishment of a person for contempt of court for violation of a protection order issued or a consent agreement approved under this section does not bar criminal prosecution of the person or a delinquent child proceeding concerning the person for a violation of section 2919.27 of the Revised Code. However, a person punished for contempt of court is entitled to credit for the punishment imposed upon conviction of or adjudication as a delinquent child for a violation of that section, and a person convicted of or adjudicated a delinquent child for a violation of that section shall not subsequently be punished for contempt of court arising out of the same activity. (M) In all stages of a proceeding under this section, a petitioner may be accompanied by a victim advocate. (N)(1) A petitioner who obtains a protection order or consent agreement under this section or a temporary protection order under section 2919.26 of the Revised Code may provide notice of the issuance or approval of the order or agreement to the judicial and law enforcement officials in any county other than the county in which the order is issued or the agreement is approved by registering that order or agreement in the other county pursuant to division (N)(2) of this section and filing a copy of the registered order or registered agreement with a law enforcement agency in the other county in accordance with that division. A person who obtains a protection order issued by a court of another state may provide notice of the issuance of the order to the judicial and law enforcement officials in any county of this state by registering the order in that county pursuant to section 2919.272 of the Revised Code and filing a copy of the registered order with a law enforcement agency in that county. (2) A petitioner may register a temporary protection order, protection order, or consent agreement in a county other than the county in which the court that issued the order or approved the agreement is located in the following manner: (a) The petitioner shall obtain a certified copy of the order or agreement from the clerk of the court that issued the order or approved the agreement and present that certified copy to the clerk of the court of common pleas or the clerk of a municipal court or county court in the county in which the order or agreement is to be registered. (b) Upon accepting the certified copy of the order or agreement for registration, the clerk of the court of common pleas, municipal court, or county court shall place an endorsement of registration on the order or agreement and give the petitioner a copy of the order or agreement that bears that proof of registration. (3) The clerk of each court of common pleas, the clerk of each municipal court, and the clerk of each county court shall maintain a registry of certified copies of temporary protection orders, protection orders, or consent agreements that have been issued or approved by courts in other counties and that have been registered with the clerk. (O) Nothing in this section prohibits the domestic relations division of a court of common pleas in counties that have a domestic relations division or a court of common pleas in counties that do not have a domestic relations division from designating a minor child as a protected party on a protection order or consent agreement. Sec. 3119.01. (A) As used in the Revised Code, "child support enforcement agency" means a child support enforcement agency designated under former section 2301.35 of the Revised Code prior to October 1, 1997, or a private or government entity designated as a child support enforcement agency under section 307.981 of the Revised Code. (B) As used in this chapter and Chapters 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code: (1) "Administrative child support order" means any order issued by a child support enforcement agency for the support of a child pursuant to section 3109.19 or 3111.81 of the Revised Code or former section 3111.211 of the Revised Code, section 3111.21 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to January 1, 1998, or section 3111.20 or 3111.22 of the Revised Code as those sections existed prior to March 22, 2001. (2) "Child support order" means either a court child support order or an administrative child support order. (3) "Obligee" means the person who is entitled to receive the support payments under a support order. (4) "Obligor" means the person who is required to pay support under a support order. (5) "Support order" means either an administrative child support order or a court support order. (C) As used in this chapter: (1) "Caretaker" means any of the following, other than a parent: (a) A person with whom the child resides for at least thirty consecutive days, and who is the child's primary caregiver; (b) A person who is receiving public assistance on behalf of the child; (c) A person or agency with legal custody of the child, including a county department of job and family services or a public children services agency; (d) A guardian of the person or the estate of a child; (e) Any other appropriate court or agency with custody of the child. "Caretaker" excludes a "host family" as defined under section 2151.90 of the Revised Code. (2) "Cash medical support" means an amount ordered to be paid in a child support order toward the ordinary medical expenses incurred during a calendar year. (3) "Child care cost" means annual out-of-pocket costs for the care and supervision of a child or children subject to the order that is related to work or employment training. (4) "Court child support order" means any order issued by a court for the support of a child pursuant to Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, section 2151.23, 2151.231, 2151.232, 2151.33, 2151.36, 2151.361, 2151.49, 3105.21, 3109.05, 3109.19, 3109.20, 3111.13, 3113.04, 3113.07, 3113.31, 3119.11, 3119.65, or 3119.70 of the Revised Code, or division (B) of former section 3113.21 of the Revised Code. (5) "Court-ordered parenting time" means the amount of parenting time a parent is to have , as defined in section 3109.04 of the Revised Code, under a parenting time court order or the amount of time the children are to be in the physical custody of a parent under a shared allocating parenting orderresponsibilities. (6) "Court support order" means either a court child support order or an order for the support of a spouse or former spouse issued pursuant to Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, section 3105.18, 3105.65, or 3113.31 of the Revised Code, or division (B) of former section 3113.21 of the Revised Code. (7) "CPI-U" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers, published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics. (8) "Extraordinary medical expenses" means any uninsured medical expenses incurred for a child during a calendar year that exceed the total cash medical support amount owed by the parents during that year. (9) "Federal poverty level" has the same meaning as in section 5121.30 of the Revised Code. (10) "Income" means either of the following: (a) For a parent who is employed to full capacity, the gross income of the parent; (b) For a parent who is unemployed or underemployed, the sum of the gross income of the parent and any potential income of the parent. (11) "Income share" means the percentage derived from a comparison of each parent's annual income after allowable deductions and credits as indicated on the worksheet to the total annual income of both parents. (12) "Insurer" means any person authorized under Title XXXIX of the Revised Code to engage in the business of insurance in this state, any health insuring corporation, and any legal entity that is self-insured and provides benefits to its employees or members. (13) "Gross income" means, except as excluded in division (C)(13) of this section, the total of all earned and unearned income from all sources during a calendar year, whether or not the income is taxable, and includes income from salaries, wages, overtime pay, and bonuses to the extent described in division (D) of section 3119.05 of the Revised Code; commissions; royalties; tips; rents; dividends; severance pay; pensions; interest; trust income; annuities; social security benefits, including retirement, disability, and survivor benefits that are not means-tested; workers' compensation benefits; unemployment insurance benefits; disability insurance benefits; benefits that are not means-tested and that are received by and in the possession of the veteran who is the beneficiary for any service-connected disability under a program or law administered by the United States department of veterans' affairs or veterans' administration; spousal support actually received; and all other sources of income. "Gross income" includes income of members of any branch of the United States armed services or national guard, including, amounts representing base pay, basic allowance for quarters, basic allowance for subsistence, supplemental subsistence allowance, cost of living adjustment, specialty pay, variable housing allowance, and pay for training or other types of required drills; self-generated income; and potential cash flow from any source. "Gross income" does not include any of the following: (a) Benefits received from means-tested government administered programs, including Ohio works first; prevention, retention, and contingency; means-tested veterans' benefits; supplemental security income; supplemental nutrition assistance program; disability financial assistance; or other assistance for which eligibility is determined on the basis of income or assets; (b) Benefits for any service-connected disability under a program or law administered by the United States department of veterans' affairs or veterans' administration that are not means-tested, that have not been distributed to the veteran who is the beneficiary of the benefits, and that are in the possession of the United States department of veterans' affairs or veterans' administration; (c) Child support amounts received for children who are not included in the current calculation; (d) Amounts paid for mandatory deductions from wages such as union dues but not taxes, social security, or retirement in lieu of social security; (e) Nonrecurring or unsustainable income or cash flow items; (f) Adoption assistance, kinship guardianship assistance, and foster care maintenance payments made pursuant to Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 94 Stat. 501, 42 U.S.C.A. 670 (1980), as amended; (g) State kinship guardianship assistance described in section 5153.163 of the Revised Code and payment from the kinship support program described in section 5180.531 of the Revised Code. (14) "Nonrecurring or unsustainable income or cash flow item" means an income or cash flow item the parent receives in any year or for any number of years not to exceed three years that the parent does not expect to continue to receive on a regular basis. "Nonrecurring or unsustainable income or cash flow item" does not include a lottery prize award that is not paid in a lump sum or any other item of income or cash flow that the parent receives or expects to receive for each year for a period of more than three years or that the parent receives and invests or otherwise uses to produce income or cash flow for a period of more than three years. (15) "Ordinary medical expenses" includes copayments and deductibles, and uninsured medical-related costs for the children of the order. (16)(a) "Ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in generating gross receipts" means actual cash items expended by the parent or the parent's business and includes depreciation expenses of business equipment as shown on the books of a business entity. (b) Except as specifically included in "ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in generating gross receipts" by division (C)(16)(a) of this section, "ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in generating gross receipts" does not include depreciation expenses and other noncash items that are allowed as deductions on any federal tax return of the parent or the parent's business. (17) "Personal earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services, however denominated, and includes wages, salary, commissions, bonuses, draws against commissions, profit sharing, vacation pay, or any other compensation. (18) "Potential income" means both of the following for a parent who the court pursuant to a court support order, or a child support enforcement agency pursuant to an administrative child support order, determines is voluntarily unemployed or voluntarily underemployed: (a) Imputed income that the court or agency determines the parent would have earned if fully employed as determined from the following criteria: (i) The parent's prior employment experience; (ii) The parent's education; (iii) The parent's physical and mental disabilities, if any; (iv) The availability of employment in the geographic area in which the parent resides; (v) The prevailing wage and salary levels in the geographic area in which the parent resides; (vi) The parent's special skills and training; (vii) Whether there is evidence that the parent has the ability to earn the imputed income; (viii) The age and special needs of the child for whom child support is being calculated under this section; (ix) The parent's increased earning capacity because of experience; (x) The parent's decreased earning capacity because of a felony conviction; (xi) Any other relevant factor. (b) Imputed income from any nonincome-producing assets of a parent, as determined from the local passbook savings rate or another appropriate rate as determined by the court or agency, not to exceed the rate of interest specified in division (A) of section 1343.03 of the Revised Code, if the income is significant. (19) "Schedule" means the basic child support schedule created pursuant to section 3119.021 of the Revised Code. (20) "Self-generated income" means gross receipts received by a parent from self-employment, proprietorship of a business, joint ownership of a partnership or closely held corporation, and rents minus ordinary and necessary expenses incurred by the parent in generating the gross receipts. "Self-generated income" includes expense reimbursements or in-kind payments received by a parent from self-employment, the operation of a business, or rents, including company cars, free housing, reimbursed meals, and other benefits, if the reimbursements are significant and reduce personal living expenses. (21) "Self-sufficiency reserve" means the minimal amount necessary for an obligor to adequately subsist upon, as determined under section 3119.021 of the Revised Code. (22) "Split parental rights and responsibilities" means, under a decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities that was issued pursuant to section 3109.04 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to the effective date of this amendment, a situation in which there is more than one child who is the subject of an allocation of parental rights and responsibilities and each parent is the residential parent and legal custodian of at least one of those children. (23) "Split parenting responsibilities" means, under a parenting plan that is approved by the court and included in an order issued under section 3109.041 of the Revised Code, a situation in which there is more than one child who is the subject of an allocation of parenting responsibilities and one parent is the designated parent and legal custodian of at least one child and the other parent is the designated parent and legal custodian of at least one other child. (24) "Worksheet" means the applicable worksheet created in rules adopted under section 3119.022 of the Revised Code that is used to calculate a parent's child support obligation. Sec. 3119.06. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this section, in any action in which a court or a child support enforcement agency issues or modifies a child support order or in any other proceeding in which a court or agency determines the amount of child support to be paid pursuant to a child support order, the court or agency shall issue a minimum child support order requiring the obligor to pay a minimum of eighty dollars a month for all the children subject to that order. The court or agency, in its discretion and in appropriate circumstances, may issue a minimum child support order of less than eighty dollars a month or issue an order not requiring the obligor to pay any child support amount. The circumstances under which a court or agency may issue such an order include the nonresidential parent's medically verified or documented physical or mental disability or institutionalization in a facility for persons with a mental illness or any other circumstances considered appropriate by the court or agency of the parent who is not the designated parent and legal custodian. If a court or agency issues a minimum child support obligation pursuant to this section and the obligor under the support order is the recipient of means-tested public assistance, as described in division (C)(13)(a) of section 3119.01 of the Revised Code, any unpaid amounts of support due under the support order shall accrue as arrearages from month to month, and the obligor's current obligation to pay the support due under the support order is suspended during any period of time that the obligor is receiving means-tested public assistance and is complying with any seek work orders issued pursuant to section 3121.03 of the Revised Code. The court, obligee, and child support enforcement agency shall not enforce the obligation of the obligor to pay the amount of support due under the support order while the obligor is receiving means-tested public assistance and is complying with any seek work orders issued pursuant to section 3121.03 of the Revised Code. (B) As used in this section, "means-tested public assistance" includes cash assistance payments under the Ohio works first program established under Chapter 5107. of the Revised Code, financial assistance under the disability financial assistance program established under Chapter 5115. of the Revised Code, supplemental security income, or means-tested veterans' benefits. Sec. 3119.07. All of the following apply to parents under a decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities that was issued pursuant to section 3109.04 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to the effective date of this amendment: (A) Except when the parents have split parental rights and responsibilities, a parent's child support obligation for a child for whom the parent is the residential parent and legal custodian shall be calculated and presumed to be spent on that child and shall not become be payable as part of a child support order, and a parent's child support obligation for a child for whom the parent is not the residential parent and legal custodian shall become be calculated and ordered to be paid as part of a child support order. (B) If the parents have split parental rights and responsibilities, the child support obligations of the parents shall be offset, and the parent with the larger child support obligation shall pay the net amount pursuant to the child support order. (C) If neither parent of a child who is the subject of a child support order is the residential parent and legal custodian of the child and the child resides with a caretaker, each parent shall pay that parent's child support obligation pursuant to the child support order. Sec. 3119.071. All of the following apply to parents under an order allocating parenting responsibilities under a parenting plan issued on or after the effective date of this section: (A) Except when the parents have split parenting responsibilities, a parent's child support obligation for a child for whom the parent is the designated parent and legal custodian under a parenting plan that is approved by the court and included in an order issued under section 3109.041 of the Revised Code shall be calculated and presumed to be spent on that child and shall not be payable as part of a child support order, and a parent's child support obligation for a child for whom the parent is not the designated parent and legal custodian shall be calculated and ordered to be paid as part of a child support order. (B) If the parents have split parenting responsibilities, the child support obligations of the parents shall be offset, and the court shall issue a child support order requiring the parent with the larger child support obligation to pay the net amount pursuant to the child support order. (C) If neither parent of a child who is the subject of a child support order is the designated parent and legal custodian of allocated parenting responsibilities for the child and the child resides with a caretaker who is the legal custodian of the child, the court shall issue a child support order requiring each parent to pay that parent's child support obligation pursuant to the child support order. Sec. 3119.072. In any action or proceeding in which a child support order is issued or modified, the court, with respect to court child support orders, and the child support enforcement agency, with respect to administrative child support orders, shall do all of the following: (A) Determine the person or persons responsible for the payment of child support; (B) Determine the person or agency entitled to receive the child support; (C) Include the applicable worksheet that has been completed in accordance with Chapter 3119. of the Revised Code with the issuance of the new or modified child support order. Sec. 3119.08. Whenever a court issues a child support order, it shall include in the order specific provisions for regular, holiday, vacation, parenting time, and special visitation in accordance with section 3109.0513109.044, 3109.054, 3109.11, or 3109.12 of the Revised Code or in accordance with any other applicable section of the Revised Code. Sec. 3119.24. (A)(1) A court that issues a shared parenting order in accordance with plan as described under section 3109.04 3109.044 of the Revised Code shall order an amount of child support to be paid under the child support order that is calculated in accordance with the schedule and with the worksheet, except that, if that amount would be unjust or inappropriate to the children or either parent and therefore not in the best interest of the child because of the extraordinary circumstances of the parents or because of any other factors or criteria set forth in section 3119.23 of the Revised Code, the court may deviate from that amount. (2) The court shall consider extraordinary circumstances and other factors or criteria if it deviates from the amount described in division (A)(1) of this section and shall enter in the journal the amount described in division (A)(1) of this section its determination that the amount would be unjust or inappropriate and therefore not in the best interest of the child, and findings of fact supporting its determination. (B) For the purposes of this section, "extraordinary circumstances of the parents" includes all of the following: (1) The ability of each parent to maintain adequate housing for the children; (2) Each parent's expenses, including child care expenses, school tuition, medical expenses, dental expenses, and any other expenses the court considers relevant; (3) Any other circumstances the court considers relevant. Sec. 3119.82. Except when including a revised amount of child support in a revised child support order as recommended pursuant to section 3119.63 of the Revised Code, whenever a court issues, or whenever a court modifies, reviews, or otherwise reconsiders a court child support order, or upon the request of any party, the court shall designate which parent may claim the children who are the subject of the court child support order as dependents for federal income tax purposes as set forth in section 151 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. If the parties agree on which parent should claim the children as dependents, the court shall designate that parent as the parent who may claim the children. If the parties do not agree, the court, in its order, may permit the parent who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian to claim the children as dependents for federal income tax purposes only if the court determines that this furthers the best interest of the children and, with respect to orders the court modifies, reviews, or reconsiders, the payments for child support are substantially current as ordered by the court for the year in which the children will be claimed as dependents. In cases in which the parties do not agree which parent may claim the children as dependents, the court shall consider, in making its determination, any net tax savings, the relative financial circumstances and needs of the parents and children, the amount of time the children spend with each parent, the eligibility of either or both parents for the federal earned income tax credit or other state or federal tax credit, and any other relevant factor concerning the best interest of the children. If the court determines that the parent who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian may claim the children as dependents for federal income tax purposes, it shall order the residential designated parent to take whatever action is necessary pursuant to section 152 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, to enable the parent who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian to claim the children as dependents for federal income tax purposes in accordance with the order of the court. Any willful failure of the residential designated parent to comply with the order of the court is contempt of court. Sec. 3119.87. The parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of a child for whom a child support order is issued or the person who otherwise has custody of a child for whom a child support order is issued immediately shall notify, and the obligor under a child support order may notify, the child support enforcement agency administering the child support order of any reason for which the child support order should terminate. Nothing in this section shall preclude a person from notifying the agency that a reason for which a child support order should terminate is imminent. With respect to a court child support order, a willful failure to notify the agency as required by this division is contempt of court. Sec. 3119.964. (A) If a court grants relief from a judgment, order, or determination pursuant to section 3119.962 of the Revised Code and if the person who is relieved or the male minor has been granted parenting time rights pursuant to an order issued under under a parenting plan as described in section 3109.051 3109.044 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, or if any relative of the person or male minor has been granted companionship or visitation rights with the child pursuant to an order issued under section 3109.051 3109.054 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code, the court shall determine whether the order granting those rights should be terminated, modified, or continued. (B) If a court grants relief from a child support order pursuant to section 3119.962 of the Revised Code and support arrearages are owed, the court may issue an order canceling that arrearage. Nothing in this section limits any actions that may be taken by the person or male minor granted relief under this section to recover support paid under the child support order from which relief was granted. Sec. 3125.03. The office of child support shall establish and administer a program of child support enforcement that meets the requirements of Title IV-D of the "Social Security Act," 88 Stat. 2351 (1975), 42 U.S.C. 651, as amended, and any rules adopted under Title IV-D. The program of child support enforcement shall include the location of absent parents, establishment of parentage, establishment and modification of child support orders and medical support orders, enforcement of support orders, collection of support obligations, and any other actions appropriate to child support enforcement. Absent parents shall be located for any purpose under the child support enforcement program and for purposes of establishing and enforcing orders allocating parental rights and parenting responsibilities between parents concerning their children and establishing and enforcing parenting time orders concerning the children. Sec. 3125.06. The department of job and family services shall enter into an agreement with the secretary of health and human services, as authorized by the "Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act of 1980," 94 Stat. 3572, 42 U.S.C. 663, as amended, under which the services of the parent locater service established pursuant to Title IV-D of the "Social Security Act," 88 Stat. 2351 (1975), 42 U.S.C. 651, as amended, are made available to this state for the following purposes: (A) Determining the whereabouts of any absent parent or child in order to enforce a law with respect to the unlawful taking or restraint of a child; (B) Making or enforcing a determination as to the allocation, between the parents of a child, of the parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of a child and the designation of the residential designated parent and legal custodian of a child or otherwise as to the custody of a child; (C) Making or enforcing a parenting time order with respect to a child. Sec. 3125.43. The department of taxation shall not provide any information to the office of child support, except as provided in this section. For purposes of the establishment of paternity, the establishment, modification, or enforcement of support orders, and the location of absent parents pursuant to child support enforcement activities and activities to establish and enforce orders allocating parenting rights and responsibilities and parenting time orders, the office is authorized to obtain information concerning the residential address and income of taxpayers if that information is contained in the state tax records maintained by the department. The department shall not provide any information to the office if the provision of the information is prohibited by state or federal law. Sec. 3127.01. (A) As used in the Revised Code, "uniform child custody jurisdiction and enforcement act" means the act addressing interstate recognition and enforcement of child custody orders adopted in 1997 by the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws or any law substantially similar to the act adopted by another state. (B) As used in sections 3127.01 to 3127.53 of the Revised Code: (1) "Abandoned" means the parents of a child have failed to visit or maintain contact with the child for more than ninety days, regardless of whether the parents resume contact with the child after that ninety-day period. (2) "Child" means an individual who has not attained eighteen years of age. (3) "Child custody determination" means a judgment, decree, or other order of a court that provides for legal custody, physical custody, parenting time, or visitation with respect to a child. "Child custody determination" includes an order that allocates parental rights and parenting responsibilities. "Child custody determination" includes permanent, temporary, initial, and modification orders. "Child custody determination" does not include an order or the portion of an order relating to child support or other monetary obligations of an individual. (4) "Child custody proceeding" means a proceeding in which legal custody, physical custody, parenting time, or visitation with respect to a child is an issue. "Child custody proceeding" may include a proceeding for divorce, separation, neglect, abuse, dependency, guardianship, parentage, termination of parental rights, or protection from domestic violence. "Child custody proceeding" does not include a proceeding regarding juvenile delinquency, contractual emancipation, or enforcement pursuant to sections 3127.31 to 3127.47 of the Revised Code. (5) "Commencement" means the filing of the first pleading in a proceeding. (6) "Court" means an entity authorized under the law of a state to establish, enforce, or modify a child custody determination. (7) "Home state" means the state in which a child lived with a parent or a person acting as a parent for at least six consecutive months immediately preceding the commencement of a child custody proceeding and, if a child is less than six months old, the state in which the child lived from birth with any of them. A period of temporary absence of any of them is counted as part of the six-month or other period. (8) "Initial determination" means the first child custody determination concerning a particular child. (9) "Issuing court" means the court that makes a child custody determination for which enforcement is sought under sections 3127.01 to 3127.53 of the Revised Code. (10) "Issuing state" means the state in which a child custody determination is made. (11) "Modification" means a child custody determination that changes, replaces, supersedes, or is otherwise made after a determination concerning the same child, whether or not it is made by the court that made the previous determination. (12) "Person" means an individual; corporation; business trust; estate; trust; partnership; limited liability company; association; joint venture; government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal or commercial entity. (13) "Person acting as a parent" means a person, other than the child's parent, who meets both of the following criteria: (a) The person has physical custody of the child or has had physical custody for a period of six consecutive months, including any temporary absence from the child, within one year immediately before the commencement of a child custody proceeding; and (b) The person has been awarded legal custody by a court or claims a right to legal custody under the law of this state. (14) "Physical custody" means the physical care and supervision of a child. (15) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. (16) "Tribe" means an Indian tribe or Alaskan Native village that is recognized by federal or state law. (17) "Warrant" means an order issued by a court authorizing law enforcement officers to take physical custody of a child. Sec. 3127.11. (A) A court of this state may request the appropriate court of another state to do any of the following: (1) Hold an evidentiary hearing; (2) Order a person to produce or give evidence pursuant to procedures of that state; (3) Order that an evaluation be made concerning the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of a child involved in a pending proceeding with respect to the designation of a parent as the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child and with respect to the custody of the child in any other person; (4) Forward to the court of this state a certified copy of the transcript of the record of the hearing, the evidence otherwise presented, and any evaluation prepared in compliance with the request; (5) Order a party to a child custody proceeding or any person having physical custody of the child to appear in the proceeding with or without the child. (B) Upon request of a court of another state, a court of this state may hold a hearing or enter an order described in division (A) of this section. (C) The court may assess travel and other necessary and reasonable expenses incurred under divisions (A) and (B) of this section against the parties according to the law of this state. (D) Upon appropriate request by a court or law enforcement official of another state, a court of this state shall forward a certified copy of the pleadings, orders, decrees, records of hearings, evaluations, and other pertinent records with respect to a child custody proceeding to the court or law enforcement official of the other state. Sec. 3127.23. (A) Each party in a child custody proceeding, in the party's first pleading or in an affidavit attached to that pleading, shall give information if reasonably ascertainable under oath as to the child's present address or whereabouts, the places where the child has lived within the last five years, and the name and present address of each person with whom the child has lived during that period. In this pleading or affidavit, each party also shall include all of the following information: (1) Whether the party has participated as a party, a witness, or in any other capacity in any other proceeding concerning the allocation, between the parents of the same child, of parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of the child including any designation of parenting time rights and the designation of the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child or that otherwise concerned the custody of or visitation with the same child and, if so, the court, case number and the date of the child custody determination, if any; (2) Whether the party knows of any proceedings that could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings for enforcement of child custody determinations, proceedings relating to domestic violence or protection orders, proceedings to adjudicate the child as an abused, neglected, or dependent child, proceedings seeking termination of parental rights, and adoptions, and, if so, the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding; (3) Whether the party knows of any person who is not a party to the proceeding and has physical custody of the child or claims to be a parent of the child who is designated the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child or to have parenting time rights with respect to the child or to be a person other than a parent of the child who has custody or visitation rights with respect to the child and, if so, the names and addresses of those persons. (B) If the declaration under division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section is in the affirmative, the declarant shall give additional information as required by the court. The court may examine the parties under oath as to details of the information furnished and as to other matters pertinent to the court's jurisdiction and the disposition of the case. (C) Each party has a continuing duty to inform the court of any child custody proceeding concerning the child in this or any other state that could affect the current proceeding. (D) If a party alleges in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be jeopardized by the disclosure of identifying information, the information shall be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or the public unless the court orders the disclosure to be made after a hearing in which the court takes into consideration the health, safety, and liberty of the party or child and determines that the disclosure is in the interests of justice. (E) A public children services agency, acting pursuant to a complaint or an action on a complaint filed under section 2151.27 of the Revised Code, is not subject to the requirements of this section. (F) As used in this section, "abused child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.031 of the Revised Code, "neglected child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.03 of the Revised Code, and "dependent child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.04 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3127.35. (A) Subject to sections 2101.022 and 2301.03 of the Revised Code, the clerk of a juvenile court or other court with appropriate jurisdiction may register a child custody determination issued by a court of another state, with or without a simultaneous request for enforcement, on receipt of all of the following: (1) A letter or other document requesting that the child custody determination be registered; (2) Two copies, including one certified copy, of the determination sought to be registered, and a statement under penalty of perjury that, to the best of the knowledge and belief of the person seeking registration, the order has not been modified; (3) Except as otherwise provided in section 3127.23 of the Revised Code, the name and address of the person seeking registration and any parent who is designated the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child or to have parenting time with respect to the child or any person acting as a parent who has been awarded custody or visitation in the child custody determination sought to be registered; (4) An advance deposit or fee established by the court. (B) On receipt of the documents and information required by division (A) of this section, the registering court shall do both of the following: (1) Cause the child custody determination to be filed as a foreign judgment together with one copy of any accompanying documents and information, regardless of their form; (2) Serve notice of the registration request on the persons named pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section, and provide them with an opportunity to contest the registration in accordance with this section. (C) The notice required by division (B)(2) of this section shall state all of the following: (1) That the registered child custody determination is enforceable as of the date of the registration in the same manner as a child custody determination issued by a court of this state; (2) That a hearing to contest the validity of the registered determination must be requested within thirty days after service of notice; (3) That failure to contest the registration shall result in confirmation of the child custody determination and preclude further contest of that determination with respect to any matter that could have been asserted. (D) A person seeking to contest the validity of a registered order shall request a hearing within thirty days after service of the notice. At that hearing, the court shall confirm the registered order unless the person contesting registration establishes one of the following circumstances: (1) The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under sections 3127.15 to 3127.24 of the Revised Code or a similar statute of another state. (2) The child custody determination sought to be registered has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under sections 3127.15 to 3127.24 of the Revised Code or a similar statute of another state. (3) The person contesting registration was entitled to notice of the child custody proceeding for which registration is sought, but notice was not given in accordance with the standards of section 3127.07 of the Revised Code or a similar statute of another state. (E) If a timely request for a hearing to contest the validity of the registration is not made, the registration is confirmed as a matter of law and the person requesting registration and all persons served in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section must be notified of the confirmation. (F) Confirmation of a registered child custody determination, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the determination with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration. Sec. 3310.51. As used in sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code: (A) "Alternative public provider" means either of the following providers that agrees to enroll a child in the provider's special education program to implement the child's individualized education program and to which the eligible applicant owes fees for the services provided to the child: (1) A school district that is not the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school or the child's school district of residence, if different; (2) A public entity other than a school district. (B) "Child with a disability" and "individualized education program" have the same meanings as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Eligible applicant" means any of the following: (1) Either of the natural or adoptive parents of a qualified special education child, except as otherwise specified in this division. When the marriage of the natural or adoptive parents of the student has been terminated by a divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, or when the natural or adoptive parents of the student are living separate and apart under a legal separation decree, and a court has issued an order allocating the parental rights and parenting responsibilities with respect to the child, "eligible applicant" means the residential designated parent as designated by the courtand legal custodian. If the court issues issued a shared parenting decree prior to the effective date of this amendment or approves a shared parenting plan under section 3109.041 of the Revised Code, "eligible applicant" means either parent. "Eligible applicant" does not mean a parent whose custodial rights have been terminated. (2) The legal custodian of a qualified special education child, when a court has granted temporary, legal, or permanent custody of the child to an individual other than either of the natural or adoptive parents of the child or to a government agency; (3) The guardian of a qualified special education child, when a court has appointed a guardian for the child; (4) The grandparent of a qualified special education child, when the grandparent is the child's attorney in fact under a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code or when the grandparent has executed a caretaker authorization affidavit under sections 3109.65 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code; (5) The surrogate parent appointed for a qualified special education child pursuant to division (B) of section 3323.05 and section 3323.051 of the Revised Code; (6) A qualified special education child, if the child does not have a legal custodian or guardian and the child is at least eighteen years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (D) "Entitled to attend school" means entitled to attend school in a school district under sections 3313.64 and 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (E) "Formula ADM" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (F) "Qualified special education child" is a child for whom all of the following conditions apply: (1) The child is at least three years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (2) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, or the child's school district of residence if different, has identified the child as a child with a disability. (3) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, or the child's school district of residence if different, has developed an individualized education program under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code for the child. (4) The child meets one of the following conditions: (a) Was enrolled in the schools of the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in any grade from preschool through twelve in the school year prior to the school year in which a scholarship is sought for the child; (b) Is eligible to enter school in any grade preschool through twelve in the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in the school year in which a scholarship is sought for the child; (c) All of the following apply: (i) The child is at least eighteen years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (ii) The child is enrolled in a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school, is home educated in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code, or is a student older than compulsory school age and less than twenty-two years of age and received a home education in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code and has not received a diploma under section 3313.6110 of the Revised Code. (iii) The child is still eligible to receive transition services under the child's individualized education program. (5) The department of education and workforce has not approved a scholarship for the child under the educational choice scholarship pilot program, under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code, the autism scholarship program, under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, or the pilot project scholarship program, under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code for the same school year in which a scholarship under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program is sought. (6) The child and the child's parents are in compliance with the state compulsory attendance law under Chapter 3321. of the Revised Code. (G) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school or other nonpublic entity that has been registered by the superintendent of public instruction under section 3310.58 of the Revised Code prior to October 3, 2023, or the department of education and workforce on or after that date. (H) "Scholarship" means a scholarship awarded under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program pursuant to sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (I) "School district of residence" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code is not a "school district of residence" for purposes of sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (J) "School year" has the same meaning as in section 3313.62 of the Revised Code. (K) "Special education program" means a school or facility that provides special education and related services to children with disabilities. Sec. 3313.205. Subject to section 3321.141 of the Revised Code, the board of education of each school district shall adopt a written policy with respect to the notification of a student's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or legal custodian or any other person responsible for the student within a reasonable time after the determination that the student is absent from school. The student's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or legal custodian or any other person responsible for the student shall provide the school that the student attends a current address and a telephone number at which the student's parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, or legal custodian or any other person that is responsible for the student can receive notice that the student is absent from school. Sec. 3313.64. (A) As used in this section and in section 3313.65 of the Revised Code: (1)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, "parent" means either parent, unless the parents are separated or divorced or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent or legal custodian who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child. When a child is in the legal custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent with residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. When a child is in the permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent who was divested of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and the right to have the child live with the parent and be the legal custodian of the child and all residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. (b) When a child is the subject of a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code, "parent" means the grandparent designated as attorney in fact under the power of attorney. When a child is the subject of a caretaker authorization affidavit executed under sections 3109.64 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code, "parent" means the grandparent that executed the affidavit. (2) "Legal custody," "permanent custody," and "residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (3) "School district" or "district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district and excludes any school operated in an institution maintained by the department of youth services. (4) Except as used in division (C)(2) of this section, "home" means a home, institution, foster home, group home, or other residential facility in this state that receives and cares for children, to which any of the following applies: (a) The home is licensed, certified, or approved for such purpose by the state or is maintained by the department of youth services. (b) The home is operated by a person who is licensed, certified, or approved by the state to operate the home for such purpose. (c) The home accepted the child through a placement by a person licensed, certified, or approved to place a child in such a home by the state. (d) The home is a children's home created under section 5153.21 or 5153.36 of the Revised Code. (5) "Agency" means all of the following: (a) A public children services agency; (b) An organization that holds a certificate issued by the department of children and youth in accordance with the requirements of section 5103.03 of the Revised Code and assumes temporary or permanent custody of children through commitment, agreement, or surrender, and places children in family homes for the purpose of adoption; (c) Comparable agencies of other states or countries that have complied with applicable requirements of section 2151.39 of the Revised Code or as applicable, sections 5103.20 to 5103.22 or 5103.23 to 5103.237 of the Revised Code. (6) A child is placed for adoption if either of the following occurs: (a) An agency to which the child has been permanently committed or surrendered enters into an agreement with a person pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code for the care and adoption of the child. (b) The child's natural parent places the child pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code with a person who will care for and adopt the child. (7) "Preschool child with a disability" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Child," unless otherwise indicated, includes preschool children with disabilities. (9) "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive order of the president of the United States, an act of the congress of the United States, or section 5919.29 or 5923.21 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as otherwise provided in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code for admittance to kindergarten and first grade, a child who is at least five but under twenty-two years of age and any preschool child with a disability shall be admitted to school as provided in this division. (1) A child shall be admitted to the schools of the school district in which the child's parent resides. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section or division (B) of section 2151.362 and section 3317.30 of the Revised Code, a child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides shall be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if any of the following applies: (a) The child is in the legal or permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent. (b) The child resides in a home. (c) The child requires special education. (3) A child who is not entitled under division (B)(2) of this section to be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides and who is residing with a resident of this state with whom the child has been placed for adoption shall be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides unless either of the following applies: (a) The placement for adoption has been terminated. (b) Another school district is required to admit the child under division (B)(1) of this section. (4)(a) A child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides is not required to be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if both of the following apply: (i) The child resides in a home, or in a facility similarly licensed in another state, and the child was placed in the home or facility by the child's parent in consultation with, and upon the recommendation of, the Ohio resilience through integrated systems and excellence program for children and youth involved in multiple state systems. (ii) The home provides education services that meet the minimum education standards under division (D)(2) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code or, in the case of a facility located in another state, meets substantially similar requirements of the jurisdiction where the facility is located, except that the home or facility may provide the child with less than the minimum number of instructional hours required only as necessary to accommodate the child's treatment program. (b) Upon a child's admission to a home pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the home shall notify the district where the child's parent resides and the district where the home is located that the home is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. Upon a child's admission to a facility located in another state pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides that the facility is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. In either case, the district where the child's parent resides shall continue to enroll the student as provided in division (C)(5) of this section and shall excuse the child from attendance until the child is discharged from the home or facility. (c) Upon a child's discharge from a home or facility, the home or facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides. The home or facility and the district shall collaborate on a supportive reentry plan into school for the child. Division (B) of this section does not prohibit the board of education of a school district from placing a child with a disability who resides in the district in a special education program outside of the district or its schools in compliance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (C) A district shall not charge tuition for children admitted under division (B)(1) or (3) of this section. If the district admits a child under division (B)(2) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the district that admits the child as provided in divisions (C)(1) to (3) of this section, unless division (C)(4) of this section applies to the child: (1) If the child receives special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the school district of residence, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, shall pay tuition for the child in accordance with section 3323.091, 3323.13, 3323.14, or 3323.141 of the Revised Code regardless of who has custody of the child or whether the child resides in a home. (2) For a child that does not receive special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2)(d) of this section, if the child is in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent, tuition shall be paid by: (a) The district in which the child's parent resided at the time the court removed the child from home or at the time the court vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first; (b) If the parent's residence at the time the court removed the child from home or placed the child in the legal or permanent custody of the person or government agency is unknown, tuition shall be paid by the district in which the child resided at the time the child was removed from home or placed in legal or permanent custody, whichever occurred first; (c) If a school district cannot be established under division (C)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, tuition shall be paid by the district determined as required by section 2151.362 of the Revised Code by the court at the time it vests custody of the child in the person or government agency; (d) If at the time the court removed the child from home or vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first, one parent was in a residential or correctional facility or a juvenile residential placement and the other parent, if living and not in such a facility or placement, was not known to reside in this state, tuition shall be paid by the district determined under division (D) of section 3313.65 of the Revised Code as the district required to pay any tuition while the parent was in such facility or placement; (e) If the department of education and workforce has determined, pursuant to division (A)(2) of section 2151.362 of the Revised Code, that a school district other than the one named in the court's initial order, or in a prior determination of the department, is responsible to bear the cost of educating the child, the district so determined shall be responsible for that cost. (3) If the child is not in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent and the child resides in a home, tuition shall be paid by one of the following: (a) The school district in which the child's parent resides; (b) If the child's parent is not a resident of this state, the home in which the child resides. (4) Division (C)(4) of this section applies to any child who is admitted to a school district under division (B)(2) of this section, resides in a home that is not a foster home, a home maintained by the department of youth services, a detention facility established under section 2152.41 of the Revised Code, or a juvenile facility established under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, and receives educational services at the home or facility in which the child resides pursuant to a contract between the home or facility and the school district providing those services. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is a special education student, a district may choose whether to receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section or to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code. If a district chooses to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code, it shall not receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is not a special education student, a district shall receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. In the case of a child to which division (C)(4) of this section applies, the total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce, which formula shall be designed to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the school district providing the educational services and, if different, the school district that is responsible to pay tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the district providing the educational services to the child. (5) In the case of a child to whom division (B)(4) of this section applies, and except as otherwise provided in division (C)(5)(f) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the home or facility for educational services provided to the child by the school district in which the child's parent resides according to the following: (a) The total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce. The department shall design the formula to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the home or facility providing the educational services and the district that is responsible to pay the tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the home or facility providing the educational services to the child. (b) The district responsible to pay tuition shall continue to report the child in its enrollment for purposes of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If the parent's residence changes to a different school district while the child resides in the home or facility, the department of education and workforce may re-determine the school district responsible for tuition based on evidence provided by the district currently responsible for tuition. (d) Upon a child's discharge from the home or facility, the home or facility shall immediately notify the district where the child's parent resides and the department of education and workforce. The notification shall include a certified transcript of all coursework completed by the child while residing in the home or facility. The district where the child's parent resides shall accept all coursework completed by the child while in the home or facility and shall award credit for that coursework in accordance with district policy. (e) Following discharge from the home or facility and return to the parent's residence, high school students shall meet requirements under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code in order to qualify for a high school diploma that are no more stringent than those that apply to students who enroll into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving a home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (f) If the child is provided educational services by a chartered nonpublic school while residing in a home and the child has been awarded a scholarship under a state scholarship program, as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, no school district shall be responsible for paying tuition under division (C)(5) of this section. (D) Tuition required to be paid under divisions (C)(2) and (3)(a) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code. Tuition required to be paid under division (C)(3)(b) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.081 of the Revised Code. If a home fails to pay the tuition required by division (C)(3)(b) of this section, the board of education providing the education may recover in a civil action the tuition and the expenses incurred in prosecuting the action, including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees. If the prosecuting attorney or city director of law represents the board in such action, costs and reasonable attorney's fees awarded by the court, based upon the prosecuting attorney's, director's, or one of their designee's time spent preparing and presenting the case, shall be deposited in the county or city general fund. (E) A board of education may enroll a child free of any tuition obligation for a period not to exceed sixty days, on the sworn statement of an adult resident of the district that the resident has initiated legal proceedings for custody of the child. (F) In the case of any individual entitled to attend school under this division, no tuition shall be charged by the school district of attendance and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the individual's attendance. Notwithstanding division (B), (C), or (E) of this section: (1) All persons at least eighteen but under twenty-two years of age who live apart from their parents, support themselves by their own labor, and have not successfully completed the high school curriculum or the individualized education program developed for the person by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code, are entitled to attend school in the district in which they reside. (2) Any child under eighteen years of age who is married is entitled to attend school in the child's district of residence. (3) A child is entitled to attend school in the district in which either of the child's parents is employed if the child has a medical condition that may require emergency medical attention. The parent of a child entitled to attend school under division (F)(3) of this section shall submit to the board of education of the district in which the parent is employed a statement from the child's physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner certifying that the child's medical condition may require emergency medical attention. The statement shall be supported by such other evidence as the board may require. (4) Any child residing with a person other than the child's parent is entitled, for a period not to exceed twelve months, to attend school in the district in which that person resides if the child's parent files an affidavit with the superintendent of the district in which the person with whom the child is living resides stating all of the following: (a) That the parent is serving outside of the state in the armed services of the United States; (b) That the parent intends to reside in the district upon returning to this state; (c) The name and address of the person with whom the child is living while the parent is outside the state. (5) Any child under the age of twenty-two years who, after the death of a parent, resides in a school district other than the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death is entitled to continue to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death for the remainder of the school year, subject to approval of that district board. (6) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a parent who is having a new house built in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the new house is being built. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being built, and stating the parent's intention to reside there upon its completion; (b) A statement from the builder confirming that a new house is being built for the parent and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. (7) A child under the age of twenty-two years residing with a parent who has a contract to purchase a house in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing and who is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan for the purchase of such house is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the house is being purchased. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being purchased, and stating the parent's intent to reside there; (b) A statement from a real estate broker or bank officer confirming that the parent has a contract to purchase the house, that the parent is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan, and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. The district superintendent shall establish a period of time not to exceed ninety days during which the child entitled to attend school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section may attend without tuition obligation. A student attending a school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section shall be eligible to participate in interscholastic athletics under the auspices of that school, provided the board of education of the school district where the student's parent resides, by a formal action, releases the student to participate in interscholastic athletics at the school where the student is attending, and provided the student receives any authorization required by a public agency or private organization of which the school district is a member exercising authority over interscholastic sports. (8) A child whose parent is a full-time employee of a city, local, or exempted village school district, or of an educational service center, may be admitted to the schools of the district where the child's parent is employed, or in the case of a child whose parent is employed by an educational service center, in the district that serves the location where the parent's job is primarily located, provided the district board of education establishes such an admission policy by resolution adopted by a majority of its members. Any such policy shall take effect on the first day of the school year and the effective date of any amendment or repeal may not be prior to the first day of the subsequent school year. The policy shall be uniformly applied to all such children and shall provide for the admission of any such child upon request of the parent. No child may be admitted under this policy after the first day of classes of any school year. (9) A child who is with the child's parent under the care of a shelter for victims of domestic violence, as defined in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code, is entitled to attend school free in the district in which the child is with the child's parent, and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the child's attendance in that school district. The enrollment of a child in a school district under this division shall not be denied due to a delay in the school district's receipt of any records required under section 3313.672 of the Revised Code or any other records required for enrollment. Any days of attendance and any credits earned by a child while enrolled in a school district under this division shall be transferred to and accepted by any school district in which the child subsequently enrolls. The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules to ensure compliance with this division. (10) Any child under the age of twenty-two years whose parent has moved out of the school district after the commencement of classes in the child's senior year of high school is entitled, subject to the approval of that district board, to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parental move for the remainder of the school year and for one additional semester or equivalent term. A district board may also adopt a policy specifying extenuating circumstances under which a student may continue to attend school under division (F)(10) of this section for an additional period of time in order to successfully complete the high school curriculum for the individualized education program developed for the student by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code. (11) As used in this division, "grandparent" means a parent of a parent of a child. A child under the age of twenty-two years who is in the custody of the child's parent, resides with a grandparent, and does not require special education is entitled to attend the schools of the district in which the child's grandparent resides, provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, the board of education of the school district in which the child's grandparent resides and the board of education of the school district in which the child's parent resides enter into a written agreement specifying that good cause exists for such attendance, describing the nature of this good cause, and consenting to such attendance. In lieu of a consent form signed by a parent, a board of education may request the grandparent of a child attending school in the district in which the grandparent resides pursuant to division (F)(11) of this section to complete any consent form required by the district, including any authorization required by sections 3313.712, 3313.713, 3313.716, and 3313.718 of the Revised Code. Upon request, the grandparent shall complete any consent form required by the district. A school district shall not incur any liability solely because of its receipt of a consent form from a grandparent in lieu of a parent. Division (F)(11) of this section does not create, and shall not be construed as creating, a new cause of action or substantive legal right against a school district, a member of a board of education, or an employee of a school district. This section does not affect, and shall not be construed as affecting, any immunities from defenses to tort liability created or recognized by Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code for a school district, member, or employee. (12) A child under the age of twenty-two years is entitled to attend school in a school district other than the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, both of the following occur: (a) The superintendent of the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section contacts the superintendent of another district for purposes of this division; (b) The superintendents of both districts enter into a written agreement that consents to the attendance and specifies that the purpose of such attendance is to protect the student's physical or mental well-being or to deal with other extenuating circumstances deemed appropriate by the superintendents. While an agreement is in effect under this division for a student who is not receiving special education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code and notwithstanding Chapter 3327. of the Revised Code, the board of education of neither school district involved in the agreement is required to provide transportation for the student to and from the school where the student attends. A student attending a school of a district pursuant to this division shall be allowed to participate in all student activities, including interscholastic athletics, at the school where the student is attending on the same basis as any student who has always attended the schools of that district while of compulsory school age. (13) All school districts shall comply with the "McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act," 42 U.S.C.A. 11431 et seq., for the education of homeless children. Each city, local, and exempted village school district shall comply with the requirements of that act governing the provision of a free, appropriate public education, including public preschool, to each homeless child. When a child loses permanent housing and becomes a homeless person, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11481(5), or when a child who is such a homeless person changes temporary living arrangements, the child's parent or guardian shall have the option of enrolling the child in either of the following: (a) The child's school of origin, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11432(g)(3)(C); (b) The school that is operated by the school district in which the shelter where the child currently resides is located and that serves the geographic area in which the shelter is located. (14) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a person other than the child's parent is entitled to attend school in the school district in which that person resides if both of the following apply: (a) That person has been appointed, through a military power of attorney executed under section 574(a) of the "National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 1994," 107 Stat. 1674 (1993), 10 U.S.C. 1044b, or through a comparable document necessary to complete a family care plan, as the parent's agent for the care, custody, and control of the child while the parent is on active duty as a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States or because the parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is on a duty assignment away from the parent's residence. (b) The military power of attorney or comparable document includes at least the authority to enroll the child in school. The entitlement to attend school in the district in which the parent's agent under the military power of attorney or comparable document resides applies until the end of the school year in which the military power of attorney or comparable document expires. (G) A board of education, after approving admission, may waive tuition for students who will temporarily reside in the district and who are either of the following: (1) Residents or domiciliaries of a foreign nation who request admission as foreign exchange students; (2) Residents or domiciliaries of the United States but not of Ohio who request admission as participants in an exchange program operated by a student exchange organization. (H) Pursuant to sections 3311.211, 3313.90, 3319.01, 3323.04, 3327.04, and 3327.06 of the Revised Code, a child may attend school or participate in a special education program in a school district other than in the district where the child is entitled to attend school under division (B) of this section. (I)(1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, a child under twenty-two years of age may attend school in the school district in which the child, at the end of the first full week of October of the school year, was entitled to attend school as otherwise provided under this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, if at that time the child was enrolled in the schools of the district but since that time the child or the child's parent has relocated to a new address located outside of that school district and within the same county as the child's or parent's address immediately prior to the relocation. The child may continue to attend school in the district, and at the school to which the child was assigned at the end of the first full week of October of the current school year, for the balance of the school year. Division (I)(1) of this section applies only if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The board of education of the school district in which the child was entitled to attend school at the end of the first full week in October and of the district to which the child or child's parent has relocated each has adopted a policy to enroll children described in division (I)(1) of this section. (b) The child's parent provides written notification of the relocation outside of the school district to the superintendent of each of the two school districts. (2) At the beginning of the school year following the school year in which the child or the child's parent relocated outside of the school district as described in division (I)(1) of this section, the child is not entitled to attend school in the school district under that division. (3) Any person or entity owing tuition to the school district on behalf of the child at the end of the first full week in October, as provided in division (C) of this section, shall continue to owe such tuition to the district for the child's attendance under division (I)(1) of this section for the lesser of the balance of the school year or the balance of the time that the child attends school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section. (4) A pupil who may attend school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section shall be entitled to transportation services pursuant to an agreement between the district and the district in which the child or child's parent has relocated unless the districts have not entered into such agreement, in which case the child shall be entitled to transportation services in the same manner as a pupil attending school in the district under interdistrict open enrollment as described in division (E) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the district has adopted an open enrollment policy as described in division (B)(1)(b) or (c) of section 3313.98 of the Revised Code. (J) This division does not apply to a child receiving special education. A school district required to pay tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount deducted under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. A school district entitled to receive tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount credited under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. If the tuition rate credited to the district of attendance exceeds the rate deducted from the district required to pay tuition, the department of education and workforce shall pay the district of attendance the difference from amounts deducted from all districts' payments under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code but not credited to other school districts under such division and from appropriations made for such purpose. The treasurer of each school district shall, by the fifteenth day of January and July, furnish the director of education and workforce a report of the names of each child who attended the district's schools under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code during the preceding six calendar months, the duration of the attendance of those children, the school district responsible for tuition on behalf of the child, and any other information that the director requires. Upon receipt of the report the director, pursuant to division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, shall deduct each district's tuition obligations under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code and pay to the district of attendance that amount plus any amount required to be paid by the state. (K) In the event of a disagreement, the director of education and workforce shall determine the school district in which the parent resides. (L) Nothing in this section requires or authorizes, or shall be construed to require or authorize, the admission to a public school in this state of a pupil who has been permanently excluded from public school attendance by the director pursuant to sections 3301.121 and 3313.662 of the Revised Code. (M) In accordance with division (B)(1) of this section, a child whose parent is a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States and is called to active duty, or a child whose parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, may continue to attend school in the district in which the child's parent lived before being called to active duty or ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, as long as the child's parent continues to be a resident of that district, and regardless of where the child lives as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. However, the district is not responsible for providing transportation for the child if the child lives outside of the district as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. Sec. 3313.666. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Electronic act" means an act committed through the use of a cellular telephone, computer, pager, personal communication device, or other electronic communication device. (2) "Harassment, intimidation, or bullying" means either of the following: (a) Any intentional written, verbal, electronic, or physical act that a student has exhibited toward another particular student more than once and the behavior both: (i) Causes mental or physical harm to the other student; (ii) Is sufficiently severe, persistent, or pervasive that it creates an intimidating, threatening, or abusive educational environment for the other student. (b) Violence within a dating relationship. (B) The board of education of each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district shall establish a policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation, or bullying. The policy shall be developed in consultation with parents, school employees, school volunteers, students, and community members. The policy shall include the following: (1) A statement prohibiting harassment, intimidation, or bullying of any student on school property, on a school bus, or at school-sponsored events and expressly providing for the possibility of suspension of a student found responsible for harassment, intimidation, or bullying by an electronic act; (2) A definition of harassment, intimidation, or bullying that includes the definition in division (A) of this section; (3) A procedure for reporting prohibited incidents; (4) A requirement that school personnel report prohibited incidents of which they are aware to the school principal or other administrator designated by the principal; (5) A requirement that the custodial parents, designated parent and legal custodian, or guardian of any student involved in a prohibited incident be notified and, to the extent permitted by section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, have access to any written reports pertaining to the prohibited incident; (6) A procedure for documenting any prohibited incident that is reported; (7) A procedure for responding to and investigating any reported incident; (8) A strategy for protecting a victim or other person from new or additional harassment, intimidation, or bullying, and from retaliation following a report, including a means by which a person may report an incident anonymously; (9) A disciplinary procedure for any student guilty of harassment, intimidation, or bullying, which shall not infringe on any student's rights under the first amendment to the Constitution of the United States; (10) A statement prohibiting students from deliberately making false reports of harassment, intimidation, or bullying and a disciplinary procedure for any student responsible for deliberately making a false report of that nature; (11) A requirement that the district administration semiannually provide the president of the district board a written summary of all reported incidents and post the summary on its web site, if the district has a web site, to the extent permitted by section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended. (C) Each board's policy shall appear in any student handbooks, and in any of the publications that set forth the comprehensive rules, procedures, and standards of conduct for schools and students in the district. The policy and an explanation of the seriousness of bullying by electronic means shall be made available to students in the district and to their custodial parents, designated parent and legal custodian, or guardians. Information regarding the policy shall be incorporated into employee training materials. (D)(1) To the extent that state or federal funds are appropriated for this purpose, each board shall require that all students enrolled in the district annually be provided with age-appropriate instruction, as determined by the board, on the board's policy, including a written or verbal discussion of the consequences for violations of the policy. (2) Each board shall require that once each school year a written statement describing the policy and the consequences for violations of the policy be sent to each student's custodial parent parents, designated parent and legal custodian, or guardian. The statement may be sent with regular student report cards or may be delivered electronically. (E) A school district employee, student, or volunteer shall be individually immune from liability in a civil action for damages arising from reporting an incident in accordance with a policy adopted pursuant to this section if that person reports an incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying promptly in good faith and in compliance with the procedures as specified in the policy. (F) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, nothing in this section prohibits a victim from seeking redress under any other provision of the Revised Code or common law that may apply. (G) This section does not create a new cause of action or a substantive legal right for any person. (H) Each board shall update the policy adopted under this section to include violence within a dating relationship and harassment, intimidation, or bullying by electronic means. Sec. 3313.672. (A)(1) At the time of initial entry to a public or nonpublic school, a pupil shall present to the person in charge of admission any records given the pupil by the public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school the pupil most recently attended; a certified copy of an order or decree, or modification of such an order or decree allocating parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of a child and designating a residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child, as provided in division (B) of this section, if that type of order or decree has been issued; a copy of a power of attorney or caretaker authorization affidavit, if either has been executed with respect to the child pursuant to sections 3109.51 to 3109.80 of the Revised Code; and a certification of birth issued pursuant to Chapter 3705. of the Revised Code, a comparable certificate or certification issued pursuant to the statutes of another state, territory, possession, or nation, or a document in lieu of a certificate or certification as described in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (e) of this section. Any of the following shall be accepted in lieu of a certificate or certification of birth by the person in charge of admission: (a) A passport or attested transcript of a passport filed with a registrar of passports at a point of entry of the United States showing the date and place of birth of the child; (b) An attested transcript of the certificate of birth; (c) An attested transcript of the certificate of baptism or other religious record showing the date and place of birth of the child; (d) An attested transcript of a hospital record showing the date and place of birth of the child; (e) A birth affidavit. (2) If a pupil requesting admission to a school of the school district in which the pupil is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code has been discharged or released from the custody of the department of youth services under section 5139.51 of the Revised Code just prior to requesting admission to the school, no school official shall admit that pupil until the records described in divisions (D)(4)(a) to (d) of section 2152.18 of the Revised Code have been received by the superintendent of the school district. (3) No public or nonpublic school official shall deny a protected child admission to the school solely because the child does not present a birth certificate described in division (A)(1) of this section, a comparable certificate or certification from another state, territory, possession, or nation, or another document specified in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (e) of this section upon registration for entry into the school. However, the protected child, or the parent, legal custodian, or guardian of that child, shall present a birth certificate or other document specified in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (e) of this section to the person in charge of admission of the school within ninety days after the child's initial entry into the school. (4) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, within twenty-four hours of the entry into the school of a pupil described in division (A)(1) of this section, a school official shall request the pupil's official records from the public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school the pupil most recently attended. If the public or nonpublic school the pupil claims to have most recently attended indicates that it has no record of the pupil's attendance or the records are not received within fourteen days of the date of request, or if the pupil does not present a certification of birth described in division (A)(1) of this section, a comparable certificate or certification from another state, territory, possession, or nation, or another document specified in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (e) of this section, the principal or chief administrative officer of the school shall notify the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in the area where the pupil resides of this fact and of the possibility that the pupil may be a missing child, as defined in section 2901.30 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Whenever an order or decree allocating parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of a child and designating a residential parent and legal custodian of the child, including a temporary order, is issued resulting from an action of divorce, alimony, annulment, or dissolution of marriage, including a temporary order, and the order or decree pertains to a child who is a pupil in a public or nonpublic school, the residential designated parent or legal custodian of the child shall notify the school of those allocations and designations by providing shall provide the person in charge of admission at the pupil's school with a certified copy of the order or decree that made the allocation and designation. Whenever there is a modification of any order or decree allocating parental rights and parenting responsibilities for the care of a child and designating a residential parent and legal custodian of the child that has been submitted to a school, the residential a designated parent or legal custodian shall provide the person in charge of admission at the pupil's school with a certified copy of the order or decree that makes the modification. (2) Whenever a power of attorney is executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code that pertains to a child who is a pupil in a public or nonpublic school, the attorney in fact shall notify the school of the power of attorney by providing the person in charge of admission with a copy of the power of attorney. Whenever a caretaker authorization affidavit is executed under sections 3109.64 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code that pertains to a child who is in a public or nonpublic school, the grandparent who executed the affidavit shall notify the school of the affidavit by providing the person in charge of admission with a copy of the affidavit. (C) If, at the time of a pupil's initial entry to a public or nonpublic school, the pupil is under the care of a shelter for victims of domestic violence, as defined in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code, the pupil or the pupil's parent or legal custodian shall notify the school of that fact. Upon being so informed, the school shall inform the elementary or secondary school from which it requests the pupil's records of that fact. (D) Whenever a public or nonpublic school is notified by a law enforcement agency pursuant to division (D) of section 2901.30 of the Revised Code that a missing child report has been filed regarding a pupil who is currently or was previously enrolled in the school, the person in charge of admission at the school shall mark that pupil's records in such a manner that whenever a copy of or information regarding the records is requested, any school official responding to the request is alerted to the fact that the records are those of a missing child. Upon any request for a copy of or information regarding a pupil's records that have been so marked, the person in charge of admission immediately shall report the request to the law enforcement agency that notified the school that the pupil is a missing child. When forwarding a copy of or information from the pupil's records in response to a request, the person in charge of admission shall do so in such a way that the receiving district or school would be unable to discern that the pupil's records are marked pursuant to this division but shall retain the mark in the pupil's records until notified that the pupil is no longer a missing child. Upon notification by a law enforcement agency that a pupil is no longer a missing child, the person in charge of admission shall remove the mark from the pupil's records in such a way that if the records were forwarded to another district or school, the receiving district or school would be unable to discern that the records were ever marked. (E) As used in this section: (1) "Protected child" means a child placed in a foster home, as that term is defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, or in a residential facility. (2) "Residential facility" means a group home for children, children's crisis care facility, children's residential center, residential parenting facility that provides twenty-four-hour child care, county children's home, or district children's home. Sec. 3313.712. As used in this section, "parent" means parent as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code. (A) Annually the board of education of each city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school district shall, before the first day of October, provide to the parent of every pupil enrolled in schools under the board's jurisdiction, an emergency medical authorization form that is an identical copy of the form contained in division (B) of this section. Thereafter, the board shall, within thirty days after the entry of any pupil into a public school in this state for the first time, provide his the pupil's parent, either as part of any registration form which is in use in the district, or as a separate form, an identical copy of the form contained in division (B) of this section. When the form is returned to the school with Part I or Part II completed, the school shall keep the form on file, and shall send the form to any school of a city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district to which the pupil is transferred. Upon request of his a pupil's parent, authorities of the school in which the pupil is enrolled may permit the parent to make changes in a previously filed form, or to file a new form. If a parent does not wish to give such written permission, he the parent shall indicate in the proper place on the form the procedure he the parent wishes school authorities to follow in the event of a medical emergency involving his the parent's child. Even if a parent gives written consent for emergency medical treatment, when a pupil becomes ill or is injured and requires emergency medical treatment while under school authority, or while engaged in an extra-curricular activity authorized by the appropriate school authorities, the authorities of his the pupil's school shall make reasonable attempts to contact the parent before treatment is given. The school shall present the pupil's emergency medical authorization form or copy thereof to the hospital or practitioner rendering treatment. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability on any school official or school employee who, in good faith, attempts to comply with this section. (B) The emergency medical authorization form provided for in division (A) of this section is as follows: "EMERGENCY MEDICAL AUTHORIZATION School ____________________ Student Name __________________ ___________________________ Address _______________________ ___________________________ _______________________________ ___________________________ Telephone _____________________ Purpose - To enable parents and guardians to authorize the provision of emergency treatment for children who become ill or injured while under school authority, when parents or guardians cannot be reached. Residential Parent or Guardian Mother's Name _____________ Daytime Phone _________________ Father's Name _____________ Daytime Phone _________________ Other's Name ______________ Daytime Phone _________________ Name of Relative or Childcare Provider ____________________________ Relationship __________________ Address ____________________ Phone _________________________ PART I OR II MUST BE COMPLETED PART I - TO GRANT CONSENT I hereby give consent for the following medical care providers and local hospital to be called: Doctor _____________________ Phone _________________________ Dentist ____________________ Phone _________________________ Medical Specialist _________ Phone _________________________ Local Hospital _____________ Emergency Room Phone __________ In the event reasonable attempts to contact me have been unsuccessful, I hereby give my consent for (1) the administration of any treatment deemed necessary by above-named doctor, or, in the event the designated preferred practitioner is not available, by another licensed physician or dentist; and (2) the transfer of the child to any hospital reasonably accessible. This authorization does not cover major surgery unless the medical opinions of two other licensed physicians or dentists, concurring in the necessity for such surgery, are obtained prior to the performance of such surgery. Facts concerning the child's medical history including allergies, medications being taken, and any physical impairments to which a physician should be alerted: Date ______________________ Signature of Parent/Guardian _________________________________ Address _____________________ _________________________________ PART II - REFUSAL TO CONSENT I do NOT give my consent for emergency medical treatment of my child. In the event of illness or injury requiring emergency treatment, I wish the school authorities to take the following action: Date ___________________ Signature of Parent/Guardian __________________________________ Address _________________________________ __________________________________" Sec. 3313.96. (A) As used in this section, "minor," "missing child," and "missing children" have the same meanings as in section 2901.30 of the Revised Code. (B) Each board of education shall develop within its district informational programs for students, parents, and community members relative to missing children issues and matters. Each of these boards may request copies of the informational materials acquired or prepared by the missing children clearinghouse pursuant to section 109.65 of the Revised Code and may request assistance from the clearinghouse in developing its programs. The principal or chief administrative officer of a nonpublic school in this state may develop within his the principal's or officer's school informational programs relative to missing children issues and matters for students, parents, and community members. The principal or officer may request copies of the informational materials acquired or prepared by the missing children clearinghouse and may request assistance from the clearinghouse in developing its programs. (C) Each board of education may develop a fingerprinting program for students and minors within the district. The principal or chief administrative officer of a nonpublic school in this state may develop a fingerprinting program for students of the school. If developed, the program shall be developed in conjunction with law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction within the school district or where the nonpublic school is located and, in the case of a local school district, in conjunction with the governing board of the educational service center. Such law enforcement agencies shall cooperate fully with the board or nonpublic school in the development of its fingerprinting program. If developed, the fingerprinting program shall be developed for the sole purpose of providing a means by which a missing child might be located or identified and shall be operated on the following basis: (1) No student or minor shall be required to participate in the program. (2) In order for a student or minor to participate in the program, the parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or other person responsible for the student or minor shall authorize the student's or minor's participation by signing a form that shall be developed by the board of education or by the principal or chief administrative officer of the nonpublic school, for the program. (3) The fingerprinting of students or minors shall be performed by members of the associated law enforcement agencies on fingerprint sheets provided to the school districts or nonpublic schools by the bureau of criminal identification and investigation pursuant to section 109.58 of the Revised Code or on fingerprint sheets or cards otherwise acquired. (4) All fingerprint cards shall be given to the parents, parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or other person responsible for a student or minor after the fingerprinting of the student or minor. No copy of a fingerprinting shall be retained by a law enforcement agency, school, school district, or any other person except the student or minor's parent, guardian, or legal custodian. (5) The name, sex, hair and eye color, height, weight, and date and place of birth of the student or minor shall be indicated on the fingerprint sheet or card. (6) The fingerprinting program developed pursuant to this section shall be offered on a periodic basis. Parents, guardians, legal custodians, and residents of the districts or in the communities served by the schools shall be notified periodically of the program and its purpose. These notifications may be given by means of memoranda or letters sent to these persons, by newspaper articles, or by other reasonable means. (D) This section does not affect any fingerprinting programs for minors that are provided by private organizations or governmental entities other than school districts. Sec. 3313.98. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.19 and division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, the provisions of this section and sections 3313.981 to 3313.983 of the Revised Code that apply to a city school district do not apply to a joint vocational or cooperative education school district unless expressly specified. (A) As used in this section and sections 3313.981 to 3313.983 of the Revised Code: (1) "Parent" means either of the natural or adoptive parents of a student, except under the following conditions: (a) When the marriage of the natural or adoptive parents of the student has been terminated by a divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment or the natural or adoptive parents of the student are living separate and apart under a legal separation decree and the court has issued an order allocating the parental rights and parenting responsibilities with respect to the student, "parent" means the residential designated parent and legal custodian as designated by the court except that "parent" means either parent when the court issues issued a shared parenting decree prior to the effective date of this amendment or approves a parenting plan under sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code. (b) When a court has granted temporary or permanent custody of the student to an individual or agency other than either of the natural or adoptive parents of the student, "parent" means the legal custodian of the child. (c) When a court has appointed a guardian for the student, "parent" means the guardian of the student. (2) "Native student" means a student entitled under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code to attend school in a district adopting a resolution under this section. (3) "Adjacent district" means a city, exempted village, or local school district having territory that abuts the territory of a district adopting a resolution under this section. (4) "Adjacent district student" means a student entitled under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code to attend school in an adjacent district. (5) "Adjacent district joint vocational student" means an adjacent district student who enrolls in a city, exempted village, or local school district pursuant to this section and who also enrolls in a joint vocational school district that does not contain the territory of the district for which that student is a native student and does contain the territory of the city, exempted village, or local district in which the student enrolls. (6) "Poverty line" means the poverty line established by the director of the United States office of management and budget as revised by the secretary of health and human services in accordance with section 673(2) of the "Community Services Block Grant Act," 95 Stat. 1609, 42 U.S.C.A. 9902, as amended. (7) "IEP" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Other district" means a city, exempted village, or local school district having territory outside of the territory of a district adopting a resolution under this section. (9) "Other district student" means a student entitled under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code to attend school in an other district. (10) "Other district joint vocational student" means a student who is enrolled in any city, exempted village, or local school district and who also enrolls in a joint vocational school district that does not contain the territory of the district for which that student is a native student in accordance with a policy adopted under section 3313.983 of the Revised Code. (11) "Active duty member" means a member of the armed forces of the United States who is on full-time duty. (12) "Armed forces" means the United States army, navy, air force, space force, marine corps, and coast guard. (B)(1) Subject to division (I) of this section, the board of education of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall adopt a resolution establishing for the school district one of the following policies: (a) A policy that entirely prohibits the enrollment of students from adjacent districts or other districts, other than students for whom tuition is paid in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code; (b) A policy that permits enrollment of students from all adjacent districts in accordance with policy statements contained in the resolution; (c) A policy that permits enrollment of students from all other districts in accordance with policy statements contained in the resolution. (2) A policy permitting enrollment of students from adjacent or from other districts, as applicable, shall provide for all of the following: (a) Application procedures, including deadlines for application and for notification of students and the superintendent of the applicable district whenever an adjacent or other district student's application is approved. (b) Procedures for admitting adjacent or other district applicants free of any tuition obligation to the district's schools, including, but not limited to: (i) The establishment of district capacity limits by grade level, school building, and education program; (ii) A requirement that all native students wishing to be enrolled in the district will be enrolled and that any adjacent or other district students previously enrolled in the district shall receive preference over first-time applicants; (iii) Procedures to ensure that an appropriate racial balance is maintained in the district schools. (C) Except as provided in section 3313.982 of the Revised Code, the procedures for admitting adjacent or other district students, as applicable, shall not include: (1) Any requirement of academic ability, or any level of athletic, artistic, or other extracurricular skills; (2) Limitations on admitting applicants because of disability, except that a board may refuse to admit a student receiving services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, if the services described in the student's IEP are not available in the district's schools; (3) A requirement that the student be proficient in the English language; (4) Rejection of any applicant because the student has been subject to disciplinary proceedings, except that if an applicant has been suspended or expelled by the student's district for ten consecutive days or more in the term for which admission is sought or in the term immediately preceding the term for which admission is sought, the procedures may include a provision denying admission of such applicant. (D)(1) Each school board permitting only enrollment of adjacent district students shall provide information about the policy adopted under this section, including the application procedures and deadlines, to the superintendent and the board of education of each adjacent district and, upon request, to the parent of any adjacent district student. (2) Each school board permitting enrollment of other district students shall provide information about the policy adopted under this section, including the application procedures and deadlines, upon request, to the board of education of any other school district or to the parent of any student anywhere in the state. (E) Any school board shall accept all credits toward graduation earned in adjacent or other district schools by an adjacent or other district student or a native student. (F)(1) No board of education may adopt a policy discouraging or prohibiting its native students from applying to enroll in the schools of an adjacent or any other district that has adopted a policy permitting such enrollment, except that a district may object to the enrollment of a native student in an adjacent or other district in order to maintain an appropriate racial balance. (2) If a board objects to enrollment of native students under this division, any adjacent or other district shall refuse to enroll such native students unless tuition is paid for the students in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code. An adjacent or other district enrolling such students may not receive funding for those students in accordance with section 3313.981 of the Revised Code. (G) The department of education and workforce shall monitor school districts to ensure compliance with this section and the districts' policies. The department may adopt rules requiring uniform application procedures, deadlines for application, notification procedures, and record-keeping requirements for all school boards that adopt policies permitting the enrollment of adjacent or other district students, as applicable. If the department adopts such rules, no school board shall adopt a policy that conflicts with those rules. (H) A resolution adopted by a board of education under this section that entirely prohibits the enrollment of students from adjacent and from other school districts does not abrogate any agreement entered into under section 3313.841 or 3313.92 of the Revised Code or any contract entered into under section 3313.90 of the Revised Code between the board of education adopting the resolution and the board of education of any adjacent or other district or prohibit these boards of education from entering into any such agreement or contract. (I) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) A policy adopted by a city, exempted village, or local school district board of education under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section shall permit any student who is not a native student of the district to enroll in the district if both of the following apply: (a) The student's parent is an active duty member of the armed forces stationed in the state. (b) The student's parent provides to the district a copy of the parent's official written order verifying the parent's status as an active duty member of the armed forces. (2) In enrolling a student pursuant to division (I) of this section, a district shall comply with procedures prescribed under divisions (B)(2) and (C) of this section, except as provided in division (I)(6) of this section. In addition, the district shall not require tuition to be paid for the student's enrollment in the district. (3) A student who, pursuant to this division, enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(a) of this section and who is not a native student of that district shall, for the purposes of sections 3313.981, 3315.18, 3317.03, and 3318.011 of the Revised Code, be considered as an "other district student" who enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(c) of this section. Such student also shall receive transportation services under section 3313.981 of the Revised Code in the same manner as an "other district student." (4) A student who, pursuant to this division, enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(b) of this section and who is not a native student of the district or an adjacent district shall, nevertheless, be considered an "adjacent district student" for the purposes of sections 3313.981, 3315.18, and 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (5) A student who, pursuant to this division, enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(b) of this section and whose parent is subsequently discharged or released from active duty shall be permitted to attend school in that district and receive transportation services under section 3313.981 of the Revised Code in the same manner as an "other district student" for the remainder of the school year in which the parent is discharged or released from active duty. After the conclusion of that school year, that student shall not be eligible under this division, as long as the student does not have a parent on active duty. (6) A school district that enrolls a student under division (I) of this section, or that enrolls a student described in division (I)(1) of this section under division (B)(1)(c) of this section, shall not require the student to comply with any application deadline established under division (B)(2) of this section. (J) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit or require the board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district to exclude any native student of the district from enrolling in the district. Sec. 3319.321. (A) No person shall release, or permit access to, the directory information concerning any students attending a public school to any person or group for use in a profit-making plan or activity. Notwithstanding division (B)(4) of section 149.43 of the Revised Code, a person may require disclosure of the requestor's identity or the intended use of the directory information concerning any students attending a public school to ascertain whether the directory information is for use in a profit-making plan or activity. (B) No person shall release, or permit access to, personally identifiable information other than directory information concerning any student attending a public school, for purposes other than those identified in division (C), (E), (G), or (H) of this section, without the written consent of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of each such student who is less than eighteen years of age, or without the written consent of each such student who is eighteen years of age or older. (1) For purposes of this section, "directory information" includes a student's name, address, telephone listing, date and place of birth, major field of study, participation in officially recognized activities and sports, weight and height of members of athletic teams, dates of attendance, date of graduation, and awards received. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(2)(b) of this section, no school district board of education shall impose any restriction on the presentation of directory information that it has designated as subject to release in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232q, as amended, to representatives of the armed forces, business, industry, charitable institutions, other employers, and institutions of higher education unless such restriction is uniformly imposed on each of these types of representatives, except that if a student eighteen years of age or older or a student's parent, guardian, or legal custodian has informed the board that any or all such information should not be released without such person's prior written consent, the board shall not release that information without such person's prior written consent. (b) The names and addresses of students in grades ten through twelve shall be released to a recruiting officer for any branch of the United States armed forces who requests such information, except that such data shall not be released if the student or student's parent, guardian, or legal custodian submits to the board a written request not to release such data. Any data received by a recruiting officer shall be used solely for the purpose of providing information to students regarding military service and shall not be released to any person other than individuals within the recruiting services of the armed forces. (3) Except for directory information and except as provided in division (E), (G), or (H) of this section, information covered by this section that is released shall only be transferred to a third or subsequent party on the condition that such party will not permit any other party to have access to such information without written consent of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, or of the student who is eighteen years of age or older. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any parent of a student may give the written parental consent required under this section. Where parents are separated or divorced, the written parental consent required under this section may be obtained from either parent, subject to any agreement between such parents or court order governing the rights of such parents. In the case of a student whose legal guardian is in an institution, a person independent of the institution who has no other conflicting interests in the case shall be appointed by the board of education of the school district in which the institution is located to give the written parental consent required under this section. (5)(a) A parent or legal custodian of a student who is not the student's residential parent, upon request, shall be permitted access to any records or information concerning the student under the same terms and conditions under which access to the records or information is available to the residential parent of that student, provided that the access of the parent who is not the residential parent or legal custodian is subject to any agreement between the parents and legal custodian, to division (F) of this section, and, to the extent described in division (B)(5)(b) of this section, is subject to any court order issued pursuant to section 3109.051 sections 3109.0516 to 3109.0519 of the Revised Code and any other court order governing the rights of the parents or legal custodian. (b) If the residential parent or legal custodian of a student has presented the keeper of a record or information that is related to the student with a copy of an order issued under division (H)(1) of section 3109.051 3109.057 of the Revised Code that limits the terms and conditions under which the other parent who is not the residential parent or legal custodian of the student is to have access to records and information pertaining to the student or with a copy of any other court order governing the rights of the parents or legal custodian that so limits those terms and conditions, and if the order pertains to the record or information in question, the keeper of the record or information shall provide access to the other parent who is not the residential parent or legal custodian only to the extent authorized in the order. If the residential parent has presented the keeper of the record or information with such an order, the keeper of the record shall permit the other parent or legal custodian who is not the residential parent to have access to the record or information only in accordance with the most recent such order that has been presented to the keeper by the residential parent or the parent who is not the residential parent. (C) Nothing in this section shall limit the administrative use of public school records by a person acting exclusively in the person's capacity as an employee of a board of education or of the state or any of its political subdivisions, any court, or the federal government, and nothing in this section shall prevent the transfer of a student's record to an educational institution for a legitimate educational purpose. However, except as provided in this section, public school records shall not be released or made available for any other purpose. Fingerprints, photographs, or records obtained pursuant to section 3313.96 or 3319.322 of the Revised Code, or pursuant to division (E) of this section, or any medical, psychological, guidance, counseling, or other information that is derived from the use of the fingerprints, photographs, or records, shall not be admissible as evidence against the minor who is the subject of the fingerprints, photographs, or records in any proceeding in any court. The provisions of this division regarding the administrative use of records by an employee of the state or any of its political subdivisions or of a court or the federal government shall be applicable only when the use of the information is required by a state statute adopted before November 19, 1974, or by federal law. (D) A board of education may require, subject to division (E) of this section, a person seeking to obtain copies of public school records to pay the cost of reproduction and, in the case of data released under division (B)(2)(b) of this section, to pay for any mailing costs, which payment shall not exceed the actual cost to the school. (E) A principal or chief administrative officer of a public school, or any employee of a public school who is authorized to handle school records, shall provide access to a student's records to a law enforcement officer who indicates that the officer is conducting an investigation and that the student is or may be a missing child, as defined in section 2901.30 of the Revised Code. Free copies of information in the student's record shall be provided, upon request, to the law enforcement officer, if prior approval is given by the student's parent, guardian, or legal custodian. Information obtained by the officer shall be used solely in the investigation of the case. The information may be used by law enforcement agency personnel in any manner that is appropriate in solving the case, including, but not limited to, providing the information to other law enforcement officers and agencies and to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for purposes of computer integration pursuant to section 2901.30 of the Revised Code. (F) No person shall release to a parent of a student who is not the student's residential designated parent and legal custodian pursuant to division (B) of section 3109.044 of the Revised Code or to any other person, or permit a parent of a student who is not the student's residential designated parent and legal custodian or permit any other person to have access to, any information about the location of any elementary or secondary school to which a student has transferred or information that would enable the parent who is not the student's residential designated parent and legal custodian or the other person to determine the location of that elementary or secondary school, if the elementary or secondary school to which the student has transferred and that requested the records of the student under section 3313.672 of the Revised Code informs the elementary or secondary school from which the student's records are obtained that the student is under the care of a shelter for victims of domestic violence, as defined in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code. (G) A principal or chief administrative officer of a public school, or any employee of a public school who is authorized to handle school records, shall comply with any order issued pursuant to division (D)(1) of section 2151.14 of the Revised Code, any request for records that is properly made pursuant to division (D)(3)(a) of section 2151.14 or division (A) of section 2151.141 of the Revised Code, and any determination that is made by a court pursuant to division (D)(3)(b) of section 2151.14 or division (B)(1) of section 2151.141 of the Revised Code. (H) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a principal of a public school, to the extent permitted by the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," shall make the report required in section 3319.45 of the Revised Code that a pupil committed any violation listed in division (A) of section 3313.662 of the Revised Code on property owned or controlled by, or at an activity held under the auspices of, the board of education, regardless of whether the pupil was sixteen years of age or older. The principal is not required to obtain the consent of the pupil who is the subject of the report or the consent of the pupil's parent, guardian, or legal custodian before making a report pursuant to section 3319.45 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3321.01. (A)(1) As used in this chapter, "parent," "guardian," or "other person having charge or care of a child" means either parent unless the parents are separated or divorced or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent or legal custodian who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child. If the child is in the legal or permanent custody of a person or government agency, "parent" means that person or government agency. When a child is a resident of a home, as defined in section 3313.64 of the Revised Code, and the child's parent is not a resident of this state, "parent," "guardian," or "other person having charge or care of a child" means the head of the home. A child between six and eighteen years of age is "of compulsory school age" for the purpose of sections 3321.01 to 3321.13 of the Revised Code. A child under six years of age who has been enrolled in kindergarten also shall be considered "of compulsory school age" for the purpose of sections 3321.01 to 3321.13 of the Revised Code unless at any time the child's parent or guardian, at the parent's or guardian's discretion and in consultation with the child's teacher and principal, formally withdraws the child from kindergarten. The compulsory school age of a child shall not commence until the beginning of the term of such schools, or other time in the school year fixed by the rules of the board of the district in which the child resides. (2) In a district in which all children are admitted to kindergarten and the first grade in August or September, a child shall be admitted if the child is five or six years of age, respectively, by the thirtieth day of September of the year of admittance, or by the first day of a term or semester other than one beginning in August or September in school districts granting admittance at the beginning of such term or semester. A child who does not meet the age requirements of this section for admittance to kindergarten or first grade, but who will be five or six years old, respective, prior to the first day of January of the school year in which admission is requested, shall be evaluated for early admittance in accordance with district policy upon referral by the child's parent or guardian, an educator employed by the district, a preschool educator who knows the child, or a pediatrician or psychologist who knows the child. Following an evaluation in accordance with a referral under this section, the district board shall decide whether to admit the child. If a child for whom admission to kindergarten or first grade is requested will not be five or six years of age, respectively, prior to the first day of January of the school year in which admission is requested, the child shall be admitted only in accordance with the district's acceleration policy adopted under section 3324.10 of the Revised Code. (3) Notwithstanding division (A)(2) of this section, beginning with the school year that starts in 2001 and continuing thereafter the board of education of any district may adopt a resolution establishing the first day of August in lieu of the thirtieth day of September as the required date by which students must have attained the age specified in that division. (4) After a student has been admitted to kindergarten in a school district or chartered nonpublic school, no board of education of a school district to which the student transfers shall deny that student admission based on the student's age. (B) As used in division (C) of this section, "successfully completed kindergarten" means that the child has completed the kindergarten requirements at one of the following: (1) A public or chartered nonpublic school; (2) A kindergarten class that is both of the following: (a) Offered by a child care provider licensed under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code; (b) If offered after July 1, 1991, is directly taught by a teacher who holds one of the following: (i) A valid educator license issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code; (ii) A Montessori preprimary credential or age-appropriate diploma granted by the American Montessori society or the association Montessori internationale; (iii) Certification determined under division (F) of this section to be equivalent to that described in division (B)(2)(b)(ii) of this section; (iv) Certification for teachers in nontax-supported schools pursuant to section 3301.071 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, no school district shall admit to the first grade any child who has not successfully completed kindergarten. (2) Notwithstanding division (A)(2) of this section, any student who has successfully completed kindergarten in accordance with section (B) of this section shall be admitted to first grade. (D) The scheduling of times for kindergarten classes and length of the school day for kindergarten shall be determined by the board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district. (E) Any kindergarten class offered by a child care provider or school described by division (B)(1) or (B)(2)(a) of this section shall be developmentally appropriate. (F) Upon written request of a child care provider described by division (B)(2)(a) of this section, the department of education and workforce shall determine whether certification held by a teacher employed by the provider meets the requirement of division (B)(2)(b)(iii) of this section and, if so, shall furnish the provider a statement to that effect. (G) As used in this division, "all-day kindergarten" has the same meaning as in section 3321.05 of the Revised Code. (1) A school district that is offering all-day kindergarten for the first time or that charged fees or tuition for all-day kindergarten in the 2012-2013 school year may charge fees or tuition for a student enrolled in all-day kindergarten in any school year following the 2012-2013 school year. The department shall adjust the district's average daily membership certification under section 3317.03 of the Revised Code by one-half of the full-time equivalency for each student charged fees or tuition for all-day kindergarten under this division. If a district charges fees or tuition for all-day kindergarten under this division, the district shall develop a sliding fee scale based on family incomes. (2) The department shall conduct an annual survey of each school district described in division (G)(1) of this section to determine the following: (a) Whether the district charges fees or tuition for students enrolled in all-day kindergarten; (b) The amount of the fees or tuition charged; (c) How many of the students for whom tuition is charged are eligible for free lunches under the "National School Lunch Act," 60 Stat. 230 (1946), 42 U.S.C. 1751, as amended, and the "Child Nutrition Act of 1966," 80 Stat. 885, 42 U.S.C. 1771, as amended, and how many of the students for whom tuition is charged are eligible for reduced price lunches under those acts; (d) How many students are enrolled in traditional half-day kindergarten rather than all-day kindergarten. Each district shall report to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, the information described in divisions (G)(2)(a) to (d) of this section. The department shall issue an annual report on the results of the survey and shall post the report on its web site. The department shall issue the first report not later than April 30, 2008, and shall issue a report not later than the thirtieth day of April each year thereafter. Sec. 3323.143. If a child with a disability's custodial designated parent and legal custodian has made a unilateral placement of the child, the parent shall be responsible for payment of tuition to the program or facility the child is attending as a result of that placement as long as the district of residence has offered a free appropriate public education to that child. As used in this section, "unilateral placement" means withdrawing a child with a disability from a program or facility operated by the district of residence or from a program or facility with which the district of residence has arranged for education of the child and instead enrolling that child in another program or facility that is not a home, as defined in section 3313.64 of the Revised Code, or that is not a facility or program available to the child pursuant to an open enrollment policy under section 3313.98 or 3313.983 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3328.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Board of trustees" means the board of trustees established for a college-preparatory boarding school in accordance with section 3328.15 of the Revised Code. (B) "Child with a disability," "IEP," and "school district of residence" have the same meanings as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Eligible student" means a student who is entitled to attend school in a participating school district; is at risk of academic failure; is from a family whose income is below two hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, as defined in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code; meets any additional criteria prescribed by agreement between the department of education and workforce and the operator of the college-preparatory boarding school in which the student seeks enrollment; and meets at least two of the following additional conditions: (1) The student has a record of in-school disciplinary actions, suspensions, expulsions, or truancy. (2) The student has not attained at least a proficient score on the state achievement assessments in English language arts, reading, or mathematics prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, after those assessments have been administered to the student at least once, or the student has not attained at least a score designated by the board of trustees of the college-preparatory boarding school in which the student seeks enrollment under this chapter on an end-of-course examination in English language arts or mathematics prescribed under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (3) The student is a child with a disability. (4) The student has been referred for academic intervention services. (5) The student's head of household is a single parent. As used in this division and in division (C)(6) of this section, "head of household" means a person who occupies the same household as the student and who is financially responsible for the student. (6) The student's head of household is not the student's custodial designated parent and legal custodian. (7) A member of the student's family has been imprisoned, as defined in section 1.05 of the Revised Code. (D) "Entitled to attend school" means entitled to attend school in a school district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (E) "Formula ADM," "category one through six special education ADM," and "state education aid" have the same meanings as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (F) "Operator" means the operator of a college-preparatory boarding school selected under section 3328.11 of the Revised Code. (G) "Participating school district" means either of the following: (1) The school district in which a college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter is located; (2) A school district other than one described in division (G)(1) of this section that, pursuant to procedures adopted by the department under section 3328.04 of the Revised Code, agrees to be a participating school district so that eligible students entitled to attend school in that district may enroll in a college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter. Sec. 3332.25. (A) As used in this section: (1) "On-campus student housing" means a dormitory or other student residence that is owned or operated by or located on the campus of a school subject to this chapter. (2) "Parent" means either parent, except that if one parent or legal custodian has sole custodybeen designated the designated parent and legal custodian, "parent" means the designated parent and legal custodian with custody. "Parent" also includes a guardian or, in the absence of a parent or guardian, another person who has accepted responsibility for the care of the student. (B) Beginning with the academic year that commences on or after July 1, 2005, a school subject to this chapter shall not permit a student to reside in on-campus student housing unless the student, or, if the student is younger than eighteen years of age, the student's parent, discloses to the school whether the student has been vaccinated against meningococcal meningitis and hepatitis B by submitting to the school the meningitis and hepatitis B vaccination status statement described in division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code or a meningitis status statement form provided by the school that meets the requirements of division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code. The statement may be submitted in written form or, if the school has a secure web site, in electronic form. (C) On receipt of an application for residence in on-campus student housing, a school subject to this chapter shall do both of the following: (1) Inform the student of the disclosure requirement; (2) Provide the student in either written or, if the school has a secure web site, electronic form the meningitis and hepatitis B vaccination status statement described in division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code or a meningitis status statement form provided by the school that meets the requirements of division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code. (D) This section does not require a school to provide or pay for a meningococcal meningitis or hepatitis B vaccination for any student. Sec. 3333.26. (A) Any citizen of this state who has resided within the state for one year, who was in the active service of the United States as a soldier, sailor, nurse, or marine between September 1, 1939, and September 2, 1945, and who has been honorably discharged from that service, shall be admitted to any school, college, or university that receives state funds in support thereof, without being required to pay any tuition or matriculation fee, but is not relieved from the payment of laboratory or similar fees. (B)(1) As used in this section: (a) "Volunteer firefighter" has the meaning as in division (B)(1) of section 146.01 of the Revised Code. (b) "Public service officer" means an Ohio firefighter, volunteer firefighter, police officer, member of the state highway patrol, employee designated to exercise the powers of police officers pursuant to section 1545.13 of the Revised Code, or other peace officer as defined by division (B) of section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, or a person holding any equivalent position in another state. (c) "Qualified former spouse" means the former spouse of a public service officer, or of a member of the armed services of the United States, who is the custodial designated parent and legal custodian of a minor child of that marriage pursuant to an order allocating the parental rights and parenting responsibilities for care of the child issued pursuant to section sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code. (d) "Operation enduring freedom" means that period of conflict which began October 7, 2001, and ends on a date declared by the president of the United States or the congress. (e) "Operation Iraqi freedom" means that period of conflict which began March 20, 2003, and ends on a date declared by the president of the United States or the congress. (f) "Combat zone" means an area that the president of the United States by executive order designates, for purposes of 26 U.S.C. 112, as an area in which armed forces of the United States are or have engaged in combat. (2) Subject to division (D) of this section, any resident of this state who is under twenty-six years of age, or under thirty years of age if the resident has been honorably discharged from the armed services of the United States, who is the child of a public service officer killed in the line of duty or of a member of the armed services of the United States killed in the line of duty during operation enduring freedom or operation Iraqi freedom, and who is admitted to any state university or college as defined in division (A)(1) of section 3345.12 of the Revised Code, community college, state community college, university branch, or technical college shall not be required to pay any tuition or any student fee for up to four academic years of education, which shall be at the undergraduate level, or a certificate program as prescribed under division (E) of this section. A child of a member of the armed services of the United States killed in the line of duty during operation enduring freedom or operation Iraqi freedom is eligible for a waiver of tuition and student fees under this division only if the student is not eligible for a war orphans and severely disabled veterans' children scholarship authorized by Chapter 5910. of the Revised Code. In any year in which the war orphans and severely disabled veterans' children scholarship board reduces the percentage of tuition covered by a war orphans and severely disabled veterans' children scholarship below one hundred per cent pursuant to division (A) of section 5910.04 of the Revised Code, the waiver of tuition and student fees under this division for a child of a member of the armed services of the United States killed in the line of duty during operation enduring freedom or operation Iraqi freedom shall be reduced by the same percentage. (3) Subject to division (D) of this section, any resident of this state who is the spouse or qualified former spouse of a public service officer killed in the line of duty, and who is admitted to any state university or college as defined in division (A)(1) of section 3345.12 of the Revised Code, community college, state community college, university branch, or technical college, shall not be required to pay any tuition or any student fee for up to four academic years of education, which shall be at the undergraduate level, or a certificate program as prescribed under division (E) of this section. (4) Any resident of this state who is the spouse or qualified former spouse of a member of the armed services of the United States killed in the line of duty while serving in a combat zone after May 7, 1975, and who is admitted to any state university or college as defined in division (A)(1) of section 3345.12 of the Revised Code, community college, state community college, university branch, or technical college, shall not be required to pay any tuition or any student fee for up to four years of academic education, which shall be at the undergraduate level, or a certificate program as prescribed under division (E) of this section. In order to qualify under division (B)(4) of this section, the spouse or qualified former spouse shall have been a resident of this state at the time the member was killed in the line of duty. (C) Any institution that is not subject to division (B) of this section and that holds a valid certificate of registration issued under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code or a valid license issued under Chapter 4713. of the Revised Code, or that is nonprofit and has a certificate of authorization issued under section 1713.02 of the Revised Code, or that is a private institution exempt from regulation under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code as prescribed in section 3333.046 of the Revised Code, which reduces tuition and student fees of a student who is eligible to attend an institution of higher education under the provisions of division (B) of this section by an amount indicated by the chancellor of higher education shall be eligible to receive a grant in that amount from the chancellor. Each institution that enrolls students under division (B) of this section shall report to the chancellor, by the first day of July of each year, the number of students who were so enrolled and the average amount of all such tuition and student fees waived during the preceding year. The chancellor shall determine the average amount of all such tuition and student fees waived during the preceding year. The average amount of the tuition and student fees waived under division (B) of this section during the preceding year shall be the amount of grants that participating institutions shall receive under this division during the current year, but no grant under this division shall exceed the tuition and student fees due and payable by the student prior to the reduction referred to in this division. The grants shall be made for two certificate programs or four years of undergraduate education of an eligible student. (D) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 3333.31 of the Revised Code, for the purposes of divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section, the child, spouse, or qualified former spouse of a public service officer or a member of the armed services of the United States killed in the line of duty shall be considered a resident of this state for the purposes of this section if the child, spouse, or qualified former spouse was a resident of this state at the time that the public service officer or member of the armed services was killed. However, no child, spouse, or qualified former spouse of a public service officer or a member of the armed services of the United States killed in the line of duty shall be required to be a resident of this state at the time the public service officer or member of the armed services of the United States was killed in order to receive benefits under divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section. (E) A child, spouse, or qualified former spouse of a public service officer or a member of the armed services killed in the line of duty shall receive benefits for a certificate program in accordance with division (B) or (C) of this section, except that a particular child, spouse, or qualified former spouse shall not receive benefits for: (1) More than two certificate programs; (2) A total number of academic credits or instructional hours equivalent to more than four academic years; (3) For any particular academic year, an amount that is greater than eight thousand dollars. Sec. 3345.85. (A) As used in this section: (1) "On-campus student housing" means a dormitory or other student residence that is owned or operated by, or located on the campus of a state institution of higher education. (2) "Parent" means either parent, except that if one parent or legal custodian has sole custodybeen designated the designated parent and legal custodian, "parent" means the designated parent with custody and legal custodian. "Parent" also includes a guardian or, in the absence of a parent or guardian, another person who has accepted responsibility for the care of the student. (B) Beginning with the academic year that commences on or after July 1, 2005, a state institution of higher education shall not permit a student to reside in on-campus student housing unless the student, or, if the student is younger than eighteen years of age, the student's parent, discloses to the institution whether the student has been vaccinated against meningococcal meningitis and hepatitis B by submitting to the institution the meningitis and hepatitis B vaccination status statement described in division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code or a meningitis status statement form provided by the institution that meets the requirements of division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code. The statement may be submitted in written form or, if the institution has a secure web site, in electronic form. (C) On receipt of an application for residence in on-campus student housing, a state institution of higher education shall do both of the following: (1) Inform the student of the disclosure requirement; (2) Provide the student in either written or, if the institution has a secure web site, electronic form the meningitis and hepatitis B vaccination status statement described in division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code or a meningitis status statement form provided by the institution that meets the requirements of division (B) of section 3701.133 of the Revised Code. (D) This section does not require an institution to provide or pay for a meningococcal meningitis or hepatitis B vaccination for any student. Sec. 3701.503. As used in sections 3701.504 to 3701.509 of the Revised Code: (A) "Parent" means either parent, unless the parents are separated or divorced or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent or legal custodian who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian. (B) "Guardian" has the same meaning as in section 2111.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Custodian" means, except as used in division (A) of this section, a government agency or an individual, other than the parent or guardian, with legal or permanent custody of a child as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (D) "Hearing screening" means the identification of newborns and infants who may have a hearing impairment, through the use of a physiologic test. (E) "Hearing evaluation" means evaluation through the use of audiological procedures by an audiologist or physician. (F) "Hearing impairment" means a loss of hearing in one or both ears in the frequency region important for speech recognition and comprehension. (G) "Newborn" means a child who is less than thirty days old. (H) "Infant" means a child who is at least thirty days but less than twenty-four months old. (I) "Freestanding birthing center" means any facility in which deliveries routinely occur, regardless of whether the facility is located on the campus of another health care facility. (J) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (K) "Audiologist" means an individual authorized under section 4753.07 of the Revised Code to practice audiology. (L) "Hospital" means a hospital that has a maternity unit or newborn nursery. (M) "Maternity unit" means any unit or place in a hospital where women are regularly received and provided care during all or part of the maternity cycle, except that "maternity unit" does not include an emergency department or similar place dedicated to providing emergency health care. (N) "Board of health" means the board of health of a city or general health district or the authority having the duties of a board of health under section 3709.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3780.33. Liabilities and immunities. (A) The holder of a license, as defined in section 4776.01 of the Revised Code, or other license, certification, or registration issued by any professional board in the state of Ohio, or pursuant to section 2923.125 of the Revised Code, are not subject to disciplinary action solely for engaging in professional or occupational activities related to adult use cannabis in accordance with this chapter, for owning or providing professional assistance to prospective or licensed adult use operators, adult use testing laboratories or to other individuals for activity in accordance with this chapter, or for obtaining, possessing, transporting, or using adult use cannabis in accordance with this chapter. (B) Unless there is clear and convincing evidence that a child is unsafe, the use, possession, or administration of adult use cannabis in accordance with this chapter shall not be the sole or primary basis for any either of the following: (1) An adjudication under section 2151.28 of the Revised Code determining that a child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child; (2) An allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities under section sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code; or (3) A parenting time order under section 3109.051 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, the use or possession of adult use cannabis in accordance with this chapter shall not be used as a reason for disqualifying an individual from medical care or from including an individual on a transplant waiting list. (D) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, the use, possession, administration, cultivation, processing, testing, dispensing, transporting, sale, delivery, or transferring of adult use cannabis in accordance with this chapter shall not be used as the sole or primary reason for taking action under any criminal or civil statute. (E) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, when an adult use consumer engages in activities related to adult use cannabis in compliance with this chapter, such activities alone do not constitute sufficient basis for conducting a field sobriety test on the individual or for suspending the individual's driver's license. To conduct any field sobriety test, a law enforcement officer must have an independent, factual basis giving reasonable suspicion that the individual is operating a vehicle under the influence of adult use cannabis or with a prohibited concentration of marijuana in the person's whole blood, blood serum, plasma, breath, or urine. (F) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, an individual's status as an adult use consumer shall not be used as the sole or primary basis for rejecting the individual as a tenant unless the rejection is required by federal law. Notwithstanding this division, a landlord may prohibit the consumption of cannabis by combustion so long as such prohibition is included in the applicable lease agreement. (G) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, the use or possession of adult use cannabis in accordance with this chapter shall not be used as a reason for disqualifying an individual from a public benefit program administered by any state or local authority, or for otherwise denying an individual a public benefit administered by the state or any locality. (H) This chapter does not do any of the following: (1) Permit the use, possession, cultivation, processing, dispensing, or transportation of adult use cannabis other than as authorized by this chapter; (2) Permit the cultivation, processing, and dispensing of adult use cannabis by any person unless licensed as an adult use cannabis operator by the division of cannabis control except as authorized under this chapter; (3) Permit the use, cultivation, dispensing, or processing of adult use cannabis on federal, state, or locally owned land located in the state of Ohio; (4) Require any public place to accommodate an individual's use of adult use cannabis; (5) Prohibit any public place from accommodating an individual's use of adult use cannabis; or (6) Restrict research related to cannabis at a state university, academic medical center, or private research and development organization as part of a research protocol approved by an institutional review board or equivalent entity. (I) It is the public policy of the state of Ohio that contracts related to adult use cannabis operators and adult use cannabis testing laboratories are enforceable. Sec. 3796.24. (A) The holder of a license, as defined in section 4776.01 of the Revised Code, is not subject to professional disciplinary action solely for engaging in professional or occupational activities related to medical marijuana. (B) Unless there is clear and convincing evidence that a child is unsafe, the use, possession, or administration of medical marijuana in accordance with this chapter shall not be the sole or primary basis for any of the following: (1) An adjudication under section 2151.28 of the Revised Code determining that a child is an abused, neglected, or dependent child; (2) An allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities under section 3109.04 sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code; (3) A parenting time order under section 3109.051 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, the use or possession of medical marijuana in accordance with this chapter shall not be used as a reason for disqualifying a patient from medical care or from including a patient on a transplant waiting list. (D) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, the use, possession, administration, cultivation, processing, testing, or dispensing of medical marijuana in accordance with this chapter shall not be used as the sole or primary reason for taking action under any criminal or civil statute in the forfeiture or seizure of any property or asset. (E) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, a person's status as a registered patient or caregiver is not a sufficient basis for conducting a field sobriety test on the person or for suspending the person's driver's license. To conduct any field sobriety test, a law enforcement officer must have an independent, factual basis giving reasonable suspicion that the person is operating a vehicle under the influence of marijuana or with a prohibited concentration of marijuana in the person's whole blood, blood serum, plasma, breath, or urine. (F) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, a person's status as a registered patient or caregiver shall not be used as the sole or primary basis for rejecting the person as a tenant unless the rejection is required by federal law. (G) This chapter does not do any of the following: (1) Require a physician to recommend that a patient use medical marijuana to treat a qualifying medical condition; (2) Permit the use, possession, or administration of medical marijuana other than as authorized by this chapter; (3) Permit the use, possession, or administration of medical marijuana on federal land located in this state; (4) Require any public place to accommodate a registered patient's use of medical marijuana; (5) Prohibit any public place from accommodating a registered patient's use of medical marijuana; (6) Restrict research related to marijuana conducted at a state university, academic medical center, or private research and development organization as part of a research protocol approved by an institutional review board or equivalent entity. Sec. 3902.13. (A) A plan of health coverage determines its order of benefits using the first of the following that applies: (1) A plan that does not coordinate with other plans is always the primary plan. (2) The benefits of the plan that covers a person as an employee, member, insured, or subscriber, other than a dependent, is the primary plan. The plan that covers the person as a dependent is the secondary plan. (3) When more than one plan covers the same child as a dependent of different parents who are not divorced or separated, the primary plan is the plan of the parent whose birthday falls earlier in the year. The secondary plan is the plan of the parent whose birthday falls later in the year. If both parents have the same birthday, the benefits of the plan that covered the parent the longer is the primary plan. The plan that covered the parent the shorter time is the secondary plan. If the other plan's provision for coordination of benefits does not include the rule contained in this division because it is not subject to regulation under this division, but instead has a rule based on the gender of the parent, and if, as a result, the plans do not agree on the order of benefits, the rule of the other plan will determine the order of benefits. (4)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(4)(b) of this section, if more than one plan covers a person as a dependent child of divorced or separated parents, benefits for the child are determined in the following order: (i) The plan of the parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child; (ii) The plan of the spouse of the parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child; (iii) The plan of the parent who is not the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child. (b) If the specific terms of a court decree state that one parent is responsible for the health care expenses of the child, the plan of that parent is the primary plan. A parent responsible for the health care pursuant to a court decree must notify the insurer or health insuring corporation of the terms of the decree. (5) The primary plan is the plan that covers a person as an employee who is neither laid off or retired, or that employee's dependent. The secondary plan is the plan that covers that person as a laid-off or retired employee, or that employee's dependent. (6) If none of the rules in divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section determines the order of benefits, the primary plan is the plan that covered an employee, member, insured, or subscriber longer. The secondary plan is the plan that covered that person the shorter time. (B) When a plan of health coverage is determined to be a secondary plan it acts to provide benefits in excess of those provided by the primary plan. (C) The secondary plan shall not be required to make payment in an amount which exceeds the amount it would have paid if it were the primary plan, but in no event, when combined with the amount paid by the primary plan, shall payments by the secondary plan exceed one hundred per cent of expenses allowable under the provisions of the applicable policies and contracts. (D) A third-party payer may require a beneficiary to file a claim with the primary plan before it determines the amount of its payment obligation, if any, with regard to that claim. (E) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a plan to make a payment until it determines whether it is the primary plan or the secondary plan and what benefits are payable under the primary plan. (F) A plan may obtain any facts and information necessary to apply the provisions of this section, or supply this information to any other third-party payer or provider, or any agent of such third-party payer or provider, without the consent of the beneficiary. Each person claiming benefits under the plan shall provide any information necessary to apply the provisions of this section. (G) If the amount of payments made by any plan is more than should have been paid, the plan may recover the excess from whichever party received the excess payment. (H) No third-party payer shall administer a plan of health coverage delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after June 29, 1988, unless such plan complies with this section. (I)(1) A third-party payer that is subject to this section and has reason to believe payment has been made by another third-party payer for the same service may request from that third-party payer, and shall be provided by the third-party payer, such data as necessary to determine whether duplicate payment has been made. (2) A third-party payer that meets the criteria of a secondary payer in accordance with this section may seek repayment of any duplicate payment that may have been made from the person to whom it made payment. If the person who received the duplicate payment is a provider, absent a finding of a court of competent jurisdiction that the provider has engaged in civil or criminal fraudulent activities, the request for the return of any duplicate payment shall be made within three years after the close of the provider's fiscal year in which the duplicate payment has been made. (J) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the prohibition of section 3923.37 of the Revised Code. (K)(1) No third-party payer shall knowingly fail to comply with the order of benefits as set forth in division (A) of this section. (2) No primary plan shall direct or encourage an insured to use the benefits of a secondary plan that results in a reduction of payment by such primary plan. (L) Whoever violates division (K) of this section is deemed to have engaged in an unfair and deceptive insurance act or practice under sections 3901.19 to 3901.26 of the Revised Code, and is subject to proceedings pursuant to those sections. Sec. 3924.47. If a child has health care coverage through a health insurer of a noncustodial parent who is not the designated parent and legal custodian, the health insurer shall do all of the following: (A) Provide such information to the custodial designated parent and legal custodian of the child as may be necessary for the child to obtain benefits through the coverage; (B) Permit the custodial designated parent and legal custodian, or a provider with the approval of the custodial designated parent and legal custodian, to submit claims for covered services without the approval of the noncustodial parent who is not the designated parent and legal custodian; (C) Make payment on claims submitted in accordance with division (B) of this section directly to the custodial designated parent and legal custodian, the provider, or the department of job and family services. Sec. 5104.017. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the operation of type A family child care homes, including parent cooperative type A homes, part-time type A homes, and drop-in type A homes. The rules shall reflect the various forms of child care and the needs of children receiving child care. The rules shall include the following: (A) Submission of a site plan and descriptive plan of operation to demonstrate how the type A home proposes to meet the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter for the initial license application; (B) Standards for ensuring that the physical surroundings of the type A home are safe and sanitary, including the physical environment, the physical plant, and the equipment of the type A home; (C) Standards for the supervision, care, and discipline of children receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the type A home; (D) Standards for a program of activities, and for play equipment, materials, and supplies, to enhance the development of each child; however, any educational curricula, philosophies, and methodologies that are developmentally appropriate and that enhance the social, emotional, intellectual, and physical development of each child shall be permissible; (E) Admissions policies and procedures; (F) Health care policies and procedures, including procedures for the isolation of children with communicable diseases; (G) First aid and emergency procedures; (H) Procedures for discipline and supervision of children; (I) Standards for the provision of nutritious meals and snacks; (J) Procedures for screening children, including any necessary physical examinations and the immunizations required pursuant to section 5104.014 of the Revised Code; (K) Procedures for screening employees, including any necessary physical examinations and immunizations; (L) Methods for encouraging parental participation in the type A home and methods for ensuring that the rights of children, parents, and employees are protected and that the responsibilities of parents and employees are met; (M) Procedures for ensuring the safety and adequate supervision of children traveling off the premises of the type A home while under the care of a type A home employee; (N) Procedures for record keeping, organization, and administration; (O) Procedures for issuing, denying, and revoking a license that are not otherwise provided for in Chapter 119. of the Revised Code; (P) Inspection procedures; (Q) Procedures and standards for setting initial license application fees; (R) Procedures for receiving, recording, and responding to complaints about type A homes; (S) Procedures for enforcing section 5104.04 of the Revised Code; (T) A standard requiring the inclusion of a current department of children and youth toll-free telephone number on each type A home license that any person may use to report a suspected violation by the type A home of this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter; (U) Requirements for the training of administrators and child care staff members in first aid, in prevention, recognition, and management of communicable diseases, and in child abuse recognition and prevention; (V) Standards providing for the needs of children who have disabilities or who require treatment for health conditions while the child is receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the type A home; (W) Standards for the maximum number of children per child care staff member; (X) Requirements for the amount of usable indoor floor space for each child; (Y) Requirements for safe outdoor play space; (Z) Qualifications and training requirements for administrators and for child care staff members, which shall not include requiring an administrator or child care staff member to hold or obtain a bachelor's, master's, or doctoral degree; (AA) Procedures for granting a parent or legal custodian who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, or a legal custodian or guardian access to the type A home during its hours of operation; (BB) Minimum requirements for instructional time for type A homes rated through the step up to quality program established pursuant to section 5104.29 of the Revised Code; (CC) Any other procedures and standards necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter regarding type A homes. Sec. 5104.018. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the licensure of type B family child care homes. The rules shall provide for safeguarding the health, safety, and welfare of children receiving child care or publicly funded child care in a licensed type B family child care home and shall include all of the following: (A) Requirements for the type B home to notify parents with children in the type B home that the type B home is certified as a foster home under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code; (B) Standards for ensuring that the type B home and the physical surroundings of the type B home are safe and sanitary, including physical environment, physical plant, and equipment; (C) Standards for the supervision, care, and discipline of children receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the home; (D) Standards for a program of activities, and for play equipment, materials, and supplies to enhance the development of each child; however, any educational curricula, philosophies, and methodologies that are developmentally appropriate and that enhance the social, emotional, intellectual, and physical development of each child shall be permissible; (E) Admission policies and procedures; (F) Health care, first aid and emergency procedures; (G) Procedures for the care of sick children; (H) Procedures for discipline and supervision of children; (I) Nutritional standards; (J) Procedures for screening children, including any necessary physical examinations and the immunizations required pursuant to section 5104.014 of the Revised Code; (K) Procedures for screening administrators and employees, including any necessary physical examinations and immunizations; (L) Methods of encouraging parental participation and ensuring that the rights of children, parents, and administrators are protected and the responsibilities of parents and administrators are met; (M) Standards for the safe transport of children when under the care of administrators; (N) Procedures for issuing, denying, or revoking licenses; (O) Procedures for the inspection of type B homes that require, at a minimum, that each type B home be inspected prior to licensure to ensure that the home is safe and sanitary; (P) Procedures for record keeping and evaluation; (Q) Procedures for receiving, recording, and responding to complaints; (R) Standards providing for the needs of children who have disabilities or who receive treatment for health conditions while the child is receiving child care or publicly funded child care in the type B home; (S) Requirements for the amount of usable indoor floor space for each child; (T) Requirements for safe outdoor play space; (U) Qualification and training requirements for administrators and employees, which shall not include requiring an administrator or employee to hold or obtain a bachelor's, master's, or doctoral degree; (V) Procedures for granting a parent who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian, or a legal custodian or guardian access to the type B home during its hours of operation; (W) Requirements for the type B home to notify parents with children in the type B home that the type B home is certified as a foster home under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code; (X) Minimum requirements for instructional time for type B homes rated through the step up to quality program established pursuant to section 5104.29 of the Revised Code; (Y) Any other procedures and standards necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter regarding licensure of type B homes. Sec. 5104.039. (A) Any parent who is the residential parent and or legal custodian of a child enrolled in a child care center and any custodian or guardian of such a child shall be permitted unlimited access to the center during its hours of operation for the purposes of contacting their children, evaluating the care provided by the center, evaluating the premises of the center, or for other purposes approved by the director. A parent of a child enrolled in a child care center who is not the child's residential parent shall be permitted unlimited access to the center during its hours of operation for those purposes under the same terms and conditions under which the residential parent of that child is permitted access to the center for those purposes. However, the access of the a parent who is not the residential parent or legal custodian is subject to any agreement between the parents or legal custodian and, to the extent described in division (B) of this section, is subject to any terms and conditions limiting the right of access of the parent who is not the residential parentor legal custodian, as described in division (I) of section 3109.051 sections 3109.0521 to 3109.0524 of the Revised Code, that are contained in a parenting time order or decree issued under that sectionparenting plan under section 3109.044 of the Revised Code, section 3109.12 of the Revised Code, or any other provision of the Revised Code. (B) If a parent who is the residential parent or legal custodian of a child has presented the administrator or the administrator's designee with a copy of a parenting time order plan that limits the terms and conditions under which the other parent who is not the residential parent or legal custodian is to have access to the center, as described in division (I) of section 3109.051 sections 3109.0521 to 3109.0524 of the Revised Code, the parent who is not the residential parent or legal custodian shall be provided access to the center only to the extent authorized in the order. If the residential parent or legal custodian has presented such an order, the other parent who is not the residential parent or legal custodian shall be permitted access to the center only in accordance with the most recent order that has been presented to the administrator or the administrator's designee by the residential parent or the parent who is not the residential parentlegal custodian. (C) Upon entering the premises pursuant to division (A) or (B) of this section, the parent who is the residential parent and or legal custodian, the parent who is not the residential parent, or the custodian or guardian shall notify the administrator or the administrator's designee of the parent's, custodian's, or guardian's presence. Sec. 5107.02. As used in this chapter: (A) "Adult" means an individual who is not a minor child. (B) "Assistance group" means a group of individuals treated as a unit for purposes of determining eligibility for and the amount of assistance provided under Ohio works first. (C) "Custodian" means an individual who has legal custody, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code, of a minor child or comparable status over a minor child created by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state. (D) "Domestic violence" means being subjected to any of the following: (1) Physical acts that resulted in, or threatened to result in, physical injury to the individual; (2) Sexual abuse; (3) Sexual activity involving a dependent child; (4) Being forced as the caretaker relative of a dependent child to engage in nonconsensual sexual acts or activities; (5) Threats of, or attempts at, physical or sexual abuse; (6) Mental abuse; (7) Neglect or deprivation of medical care. (E) "Guardian" means an individual that is granted authority by a probate court pursuant to Chapter 2111. of the Revised Code, or a court of competent jurisdiction in another state, to exercise parental rights and parenting responsibilities over a minor child to the extent provided in the court's order and subject to residual parental rights of the minor child's parents. (F) "LEAP program" means the learning, earning, and parenting program conducted under section 5107.30 of the Revised Code. (G) "Minor child" means either of the following: (1) An individual who has not attained age eighteen; (2) An individual who has not attained age nineteen and is a full-time student in a secondary school or in the equivalent level of vocational or technical training. (H) "Minor head of household" means a minor child who is either of the following: (1) Is married, pregnant, and a member of an assistance group that does not include an adult; (2) Is married and is a parent of a child included in the same assistance group that does not include an adult. (I) "Ohio works first" means the program established by this chapter known as temporary assistance for needy families in Title IV-A. (J) "Payment standard" means the amount specified in rules adopted under section 5107.05 of the Revised Code that is the maximum amount of cash assistance an assistance group may receive under Ohio works first from state and federal funds. (K) "Specified relative" means the following individuals who are age eighteen or older: (1) The following individuals related by blood or adoption: (a) Grandparents, including grandparents with the prefix "great," "great-great," or "great-great-great"; (b) Siblings; (c) Aunts, uncles, nephews, and nieces, including such relatives with the prefix "great," "great-great," "grand," or "great-grand"; (d) First cousins and first cousins once removed. (2) Stepparents and stepsiblings; (3) Spouses and former spouses of individuals named in division (K)(1) or (2) of this section. (L) "Title IV-A" or "Title IV-D" means Title IV-A or Title IV-D of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C. 301, as amended. Sec. 5120.652. To participate in the prison nursery program, each eligible inmate selected by the department shall do all the following: (A) Agree in writing to do all the following: (1) Comply with any program, educational, counseling, and other requirements established for the program by the department of rehabilitation and correction; (2) If eligible, have the child participate in the medicaid program or a health insurance program; (3) Accept the normal risks of childrearing; (4) Abide by any court decisions regarding the allocation of parental rights and parenting responsibilities with respect to the child. (B) Assign to the department any rights to support from any other person, excluding support assigned pursuant to section 5107.20 of the Revised Code and medical support assigned pursuant to section 5160.38 of the Revised Code; (C) Specify with whom the child is to be placed in the event the inmate's participation in the program is terminated for a reason other than release from imprisonment. Sec. 5120.653. An inmate's participation in the prison nursery program may be terminated by the department of rehabilitation and correction if one of the following occurs: (A) The inmate fails to comply with the agreement entered into under division (A) of section 5120.652 of the Revised Code. (B) The inmate's child becomes seriously ill, cannot meet medical criteria established by the department of rehabilitation and correction for the program, or otherwise cannot safely participate in the program. (C) A court issues an order that designates a person other than the inmate as the child's residential designated parent and legal custodian. (D) A juvenile court, in an action brought pursuant to division (A)(2) of section 2151.23 of the Revised Code, grants custody of the child to a person other than the inmate. (E) An order is was issued pursuant to section 3109.04 of the Revised Code, as that section existed prior to the amendment of this section, granting shared parenting of the child or an allocation of parenting responsibilities is issued under sections 3109.04 to 3109.0498 of the Revised Code. (F) An order of disposition regarding the child is issued pursuant to division (A)(2), (3), or (4) of section 2151.353 of the Revised Code granting temporary, permanent, or legal custody of the child to a person, other than the inmate, or to a public children services agency or private child placing agency. (G) The inmate is released from imprisonment. Sec. 5123.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Chief medical officer" means the licensed physician appointed by the managing officer of an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities with the approval of the director of developmental disabilities to provide medical treatment for residents of the institution. (B) "Chief program director" means a person with special training and experience in the diagnosis and management of persons with developmental disabilities, certified according to division (C) of this section in at least one of the designated fields, and appointed by the managing officer of an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities with the approval of the director to provide habilitation and care for residents of the institution. (C) "Comprehensive evaluation" means a study, including a sequence of observations and examinations, of a person leading to conclusions and recommendations formulated jointly, with dissenting opinions if any, by a group of persons with special training and experience in the diagnosis and management of persons with developmental disabilities, which group shall include individuals who are professionally qualified in the fields of medicine, psychology, and social work, together with such other specialists as the individual case may require. (D) "Education" means the process of formal training and instruction to facilitate the intellectual and emotional development of residents. (E) "Habilitation" means the process by which the staff of the institution assists the resident in acquiring and maintaining those life skills that enable the resident to cope more effectively with the demands of the resident's own person and of the resident's environment and in raising the level of the resident's physical, mental, social, and vocational efficiency. Habilitation includes but is not limited to programs of formal, structured education and training. (F) "Health officer" means any public health physician, public health nurse, or other person authorized or designated by a city or general health district. (G) "Home and community-based services" means medicaid-funded home and community-based services specified in division (A)(1) of section 5166.20 of the Revised Code provided under the medicaid waiver components the department of developmental disabilities administers pursuant to section 5166.21 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in section 5123.0412 of the Revised Code, home and community-based services provided under the medicaid waiver component known as the transitions developmental disabilities waiver are to be considered to be home and community-based services for the purposes of this chapter, and Chapters 5124. and 5126. of the Revised Code, only to the extent, if any, provided by the contract required by section 5166.21 of the Revised Code regarding the waiver. (H) "ICF/IID" and "ICF/IID services" have the same meanings as in section 5124.01 of the Revised Code. (I) "Indigent person" means a person who is unable, without substantial financial hardship, to provide for the payment of an attorney and for other necessary expenses of legal representation, including expert testimony. (J) "Institution" means a public or private facility, or a part of a public or private facility, that is licensed by the appropriate state department and is equipped to provide residential habilitation, care, and treatment for persons with intellectual disabilities. (K) "Licensed physician" means a person who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code authorizing the person to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while in the performance of the officer's official duties. (L) "Managing officer" means a person who is appointed by the director of developmental disabilities to be in executive control of an institution under the jurisdiction of the department of developmental disabilities. (M) "Medicaid case management services" means case management services provided to an individual with a developmental disability that the state medicaid plan requires. (N) "Intellectual disability" means a disability characterized by having significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning existing concurrently with deficiencies in adaptive behavior, manifested during the developmental period. (O) "Person with an intellectual disability subject to institutionalization by court order" means a person eighteen years of age or older with at least a moderate level of intellectual disability and in relation to whom, because of the person's disability, either of the following conditions exists: (1) The person represents a very substantial risk of physical impairment or injury to self as manifested by evidence that the person is unable to provide for and is not providing for the person's most basic physical needs and that provision for those needs is not available in the community; (2) The person needs and is susceptible to significant habilitation in an institution. (P) "Moderate level of intellectual disability" means the condition in which a person, following a comprehensive evaluation, is found to have at least moderate deficits in overall intellectual functioning, as indicated by a full-scale intelligence quotient test score of fifty-five or below, and at least moderate deficits in adaptive behavior, as determined in accordance with the criteria established in the fifth edition of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders published by the American psychiatric association. (Q) "Developmental disability" means a severe, chronic disability that is characterized by all of the following: (1) It is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or a combination of mental and physical impairments, other than a mental or physical impairment solely caused by mental illness, as defined in division (A) of section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (2) It is manifested before age twenty-two. (3) It is likely to continue indefinitely. (4) It results in one of the following: (a) In the case of a person under three years of age, at least one developmental delay, as defined in rules adopted under section 5123.011 of the Revised Code, or a diagnosed physical or mental condition that has a high probability of resulting in a developmental delay, as defined in those rules; (b) In the case of a person at least three years of age but under six years of age, at least two developmental delays, as defined in rules adopted under section 5123.011 of the Revised Code; (c) In the case of a person six years of age or older, a substantial functional limitation in at least three of the following areas of major life activity, as appropriate for the person's age: self-care, receptive and expressive language, learning, mobility, self-direction, capacity for independent living, and, if the person is at least sixteen years of age, capacity for economic self-sufficiency. (5) It causes the person to need a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or other type of care, treatment, or provision of services for an extended period of time that is individually planned and coordinated for the person. "Developmental disability" includes intellectual disability. (R) "State institution" means an institution that is tax-supported and under the jurisdiction of the department of developmental disabilities. (S) "Residence" and "legal residence" have the same meaning as "legal settlement," which is acquired by residing in Ohio for a period of one year without receiving general assistance prior to July 17, 1995, under former Chapter 5113. of the Revised Code, without receiving financial assistance prior to December 31, 2017, under former Chapter 5115. of the Revised Code, or assistance from a private agency that maintains records of assistance given. A person having a legal settlement in the state shall be considered as having legal settlement in the assistance area in which the person resides. No adult person coming into this state and having a spouse or minor children residing in another state shall obtain a legal settlement in this state as long as the spouse or minor children are receiving public assistance, care, or support at the expense of the other state or its subdivisions. For the purpose of determining the legal settlement of a person who is living in a public or private institution or in a home subject to licensing by the department of job and family services, the department of mental health and addiction services, or the department of developmental disabilities, the residence of the person shall be considered as though the person were residing in the county in which the person was living prior to the person's entrance into the institution or home. Settlement once acquired shall continue until a person has been continuously absent from Ohio for a period of one year or has acquired a legal residence in another state. A woman who marries a man with legal settlement in any county immediately acquires the settlement of her husband. The legal settlement of a minor is that of the parents, surviving parent, sole parent, parent who is designated the residential designated parent and legal custodian by a court, other adult having permanent custody awarded by a court, or guardian of the person of the minor, provided that: (1) A minor female who marries shall be considered to have the legal settlement of her husband and, in the case of death of her husband or divorce, she shall not thereby lose her legal settlement obtained by the marriage. (2) A minor male who marries, establishes a home, and who has resided in this state for one year without receiving general assistance prior to July 17, 1995, under former Chapter 5113. of the Revised Code or assistance from a private agency that maintains records of assistance given shall be considered to have obtained a legal settlement in this state. (3) The legal settlement of a child under eighteen years of age who is in the care or custody of a public or private child caring agency shall not change if the legal settlement of the parent changes until after the child has been in the home of the parent for a period of one year. No person, adult or minor, may establish a legal settlement in this state for the purpose of gaining admission to any state institution. (T)(1) "Resident" means, subject to division (T)(2) of this section, a person who is admitted either voluntarily or involuntarily to an institution or other facility pursuant to section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code subsequent to a finding of not guilty by reason of insanity or incompetence to stand trial or under this chapter who is under observation or receiving habilitation and care in an institution. (2) "Resident" does not include a person admitted to an institution or other facility under section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code to the extent that the reference in this chapter to resident, or the context in which the reference occurs, is in conflict with any provision of sections 2945.37 to 2945.402 of the Revised Code. (U) "Respondent" means the person whose detention, commitment, or continued commitment is being sought in any proceeding under this chapter. (V) "Working day" and "court day" mean Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, and Friday, except when such day is a legal holiday. (W) "Prosecutor" means the prosecuting attorney, village solicitor, city director of law, or similar chief legal officer who prosecuted a criminal case in which a person was found not guilty by reason of insanity, who would have had the authority to prosecute a criminal case against a person if the person had not been found incompetent to stand trial, or who prosecuted a case in which a person was found guilty. (X) "Court" means the probate division of the court of common pleas. (Y) "Supported living" and "residential services" have the same meanings as in section 5126.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5153.16. (A) Except as provided in section 2151.422 of the Revised Code, in accordance with rules adopted under section 5153.166 of the Revised Code, and on behalf of children in the county whom the public children services agency considers to be in need of public care or protective services, the public children services agency shall do all of the following: (1) Make an investigation concerning any child alleged to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child; (2) Enter into agreements with the parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody of any child, or with the department of children and youth, department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, department of developmental disabilities, other department, any certified organization within or outside the county, or any agency or institution outside the state, having legal custody of any child, with respect to the custody, care, or placement of any child, or with respect to any matter, in the interests of the child, provided the permanent custody of a child shall not be transferred by a parent to the public children services agency without the consent of the juvenile court; (3) Enter into a contract with an agency providing prevention services in an effort to prevent neglect or abuse, to enhance a child's welfare, and to preserve the family unit intact when referring a family for prevention services under division (J) of section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. (4) Accept custody of children committed to the public children services agency by a court exercising juvenile jurisdiction; (5) Provide such care as the public children services agency considers to be in the best interests of any child adjudicated to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child the agency finds to be in need of public care or service; (6) Provide social services to any unmarried girl adjudicated to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child who is pregnant with or has been delivered of a child; (7) Make available to the children with medical handicaps program of the department of health at its request any information concerning a child with a disability found to be in need of treatment under sections 3701.021 to 3701.028 of the Revised Code who is receiving services from the public children services agency; (8) Provide temporary emergency care for any child considered by the public children services agency to be in need of such care, without agreement or commitment; (9) Find certified foster homes, within or outside the county, for the care of children, including children with disabilities from other counties attending special schools in the county; (10) Subject to the approval of the board of county commissioners and the department of children and youth, establish and operate a training school or enter into an agreement with any municipal corporation or other political subdivision of the county respecting the operation, acquisition, or maintenance of any children's home, training school, or other institution for the care of children maintained by such municipal corporation or political subdivision; (11) Acquire and operate a county children's home, establish, maintain, and operate a receiving home for the temporary care of children, or procure certified foster homes for this purpose; (12) Enter into an agreement with the trustees of any district children's home, respecting the operation of the district children's home in cooperation with the other county boards in the district; (13) Cooperate with, make its services available to, and act as the agent of persons, courts, the department of children and youth, the department of health, and other organizations within and outside the state, in matters relating to the welfare of children, except that the public children services agency shall not be required to provide supervision of or other services related to the exercise of parenting time rights granted under a parenting plan pursuant to section 3109.051 3109.044 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code or companionship or visitation rights granted pursuant to section 3109.0513109.054, 3109.11, or 3109.12 of the Revised Code unless a juvenile court, pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code, or a common pleas court, pursuant to division (E)(6) of section 3113.31 of the Revised Code, requires the provision of supervision or other services related to the exercise of the parenting time rights or companionship or visitation rights; (14) Make investigations at the request of any superintendent of schools in the county or the principal of any school concerning the application of any child adjudicated to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child for release from school, where such service is not provided through a school attendance department; (15) Administer funds provided under Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 94 Stat. 501 (1980), 42 U.S.C.A. 671, as amended, in accordance with rules adopted under section 5180.42 of the Revised Code; (16) In addition to administering Title IV-E adoption assistance funds, enter into agreements to make adoption assistance payments under section 5153.163 of the Revised Code; (17) Implement a system of safety and risk assessment, in accordance with rules adopted by the director of children and youth, to assist the public children services agency in determining the risk of abuse or neglect to a child; (18) Enter into a plan of cooperation with the board of county commissioners under section 307.983 of the Revised Code and comply with each fiscal agreement the board enters into under section 307.98 of the Revised Code that include family services duties of public children services agencies and contracts the board enters into under sections 307.981 and 307.982 of the Revised Code that affect the public children services agency; (19) Make reasonable efforts to prevent the removal of an alleged or adjudicated abused, neglected, or dependent child from the child's home, eliminate the continued removal of the child from the child's home, or make it possible for the child to return home safely, except that reasonable efforts of that nature are not required when a court has made a determination under division (A)(2) of section 2151.419 of the Revised Code; (20) Make reasonable efforts to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan approved under division (E) of section 2151.417 of the Revised Code and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child; (21) Administer a Title IV-A program identified under division (A)(4)(c) or (h) of section 5101.80 of the Revised Code that the department of children and youth provides for the public children services agency to administer under the department's supervision pursuant to section 5101.801 of the Revised Code; (22) Administer the kinship permanency incentive program created under section 5180.52 of the Revised Code under the supervision of the director of children and youth; (23) Provide independent living services pursuant to sections 2151.81 to 2151.84 of the Revised Code; (24) File a missing child report with a local law enforcement agency upon becoming aware that a child in the custody of the public children services agency is or may be missing. (B) The public children services agency shall use the system implemented pursuant to division (A)(17) of this section in connection with an investigation undertaken pursuant to division (G)(1) of section 2151.421 of the Revised Code to assess both of the following: (1) The ongoing safety of the child; (2) The appropriateness of the intensity and duration of the services provided to meet child and family needs throughout the duration of a case. (C) Except as provided in section 2151.422 of the Revised Code, in accordance with rules of the director of children and youth, and on behalf of children in the county whom the public children services agency considers to be in need of public care or protective services, the public children services agency may do the following: (1) Provide or find, with other child serving systems, specialized foster care for the care of children in a specialized foster home, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, certified under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code; (2)(a) Except as limited by divisions (C)(2)(b) and (c) of this section, contract with the following for the purpose of assisting the agency with its duties: (i) County departments of job and family services; (ii) Boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services; (iii) County boards of developmental disabilities; (iv) Regional councils of political subdivisions established under Chapter 167. of the Revised Code; (v) Private and government providers of services; (vi) Managed care organizations and prepaid health plans. (b) A public children services agency contract under division (C)(2)(a) of this section regarding the agency's duties under section 2151.421 of the Revised Code may not provide for the entity under contract with the agency to perform any service not authorized by the department's rules. (c) Only a county children services board appointed under section 5153.03 of the Revised Code that is a public children services agency may contract under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. If an entity specified in division (B) or (C) of section 5153.02 of the Revised Code is the public children services agency for a county, the board of county commissioners may enter into contracts pursuant to section 307.982 of the Revised Code regarding the agency's duties. Sec. 5180.14. (A) As used in this section and sections 5180.15, 5180.16, and 5180.17 of the Revised Code: (1) "Child care center," "type A family child care home," and "licensed type B family child care home" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Child care facility" means a child care center, a type A family child care home, or a licensed type B family child care home. (3) "Foster caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (4) "Freestanding birthing center" has the same meaning as in section 3701.503 of the Revised Code. (5) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in section 3722.01 of the Revised Code to which either of the following applies: (a) The hospital has a maternity unit. (b) The hospital receives for care infants who have been transferred to it from other facilities and who have never been discharged to their residences following birth. (6) "Infant" means a child who is less than one year of age. (7) "Maternity unit" means the distinct portion of a hospital in which maternity services are provided. (8) "Other person responsible for the infant" includes a foster caregiver. (9) "Parent" means either parent, unless the parents are separated or divorced or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent or legal custodian who is the residential designated parent and legal custodian of the child. "Parent" also means a prospective adoptive parent with whom a child is placed. (10) "Shaken baby syndrome" means signs and symptoms, including, but not limited to, retinal hemorrhages in one or both eyes, subdural hematoma, or brain swelling, resulting from the violent shaking or the shaking and impacting of the head of an infant or small child. (B) The director of children and youth shall establish the shaken baby syndrome education program by doing all of the following: (1) Developing educational materials that present readily comprehendible information on shaken baby syndrome; (2) Making available on the department of children and youth web site in an easily accessible format the educational materials developed under division (B)(1) of this section; (3) Annually assessing the effectiveness of the shaken baby syndrome education program by doing all of the following: (a) Evaluating the reports received pursuant to section 5180.405 of the Revised Code; (b) Reviewing the content of the educational materials to determine if updates or improvements should be made; (c) Reviewing the manner in which the educational materials are distributed, as described in section 5180.15 of the Revised Code, to determine if modifications to that manner should be made. (C) In meeting the requirements under division (B) of this section, the director shall develop educational materials that, to the extent possible, minimize administrative or financial burdens on any of the entities or persons listed in section 5180.15 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 109.65, 313.121, 1713.55, 1733.242, 2108.81, 2111.08, 2151.011, 2151.23, 2151.33, 2151.90, 2301.03, 2307.50, 2317.02, 2701.03, 2705.031, 2901.30, 3101.041, 3105.011, 3105.21, 3105.63, 3105.65, 3109.03, 3109.04, 3109.043, 3109.05, 3109.051, 3109.052, 3109.054, 3109.055, 3109.06, 3109.061, 3109.09, 3109.11, 3109.12, 3109.401, 3109.41, 3109.42, 3109.43, 3109.44, 3109.47, 3109.48, 3109.50, 3109.51, 3109.52, 3109.53, 3109.55, 3109.56, 3109.58, 3109.60, 3109.65, 3109.66, 3109.68, 3109.74, 3111.13, 3111.26, 3111.381, 3113.31, 3119.01, 3119.06, 3119.07, 3119.08, 3119.24, 3119.82, 3119.87, 3119.964, 3125.03, 3125.06, 3125.43, 3127.01, 3127.11, 3127.23, 3127.35, 3310.51, 3313.205, 3313.64, 3313.666, 3313.672, 3313.712, 3313.96, 3313.98, 3319.321, 3321.01, 3323.143, 3328.01, 3332.25, 3333.26, 3345.85, 3701.503, 3780.33, 3796.24, 3902.13, 3924.47, 5104.017, 5104.018, 5104.039, 5107.02, 5120.652, 5120.653, 5123.01, 5153.16, and 5180.14 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 3109.041, 3109.042, and 3109.053 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. Upon the enactment of this act, the General Assembly requests each court with jurisdiction over domestic relations matters to review and update the court's local rules regarding parenting time to comply with the act's provisions, including section 3109.401 of the Revised Code. Section 5. Section 2151.23 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended by H.B. 110, H.B. 281, H.B. 518, and S.B. 288, all of the 134th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as presented in this act.